TO THE PEOPLE OF VIRGINIA.
The
part I bore in the transactions which form
the subject of the following narrative, is my voucher
for its authenticity. My admiration of the gallant
people, whose struggle for freedom I witnessed and
partook; the cherished friendships contracted among
them, at a time of life when the heart is warm, and
under circumstances which called all its best feelings
into action; and, above all, the connexion then
formed, which has identified me with Virginia, and
which, during the last five years, has been the source
of all my happiness; are my inducements to
dedicate
this work to you. The approbation which, in
acknowledging, more than rewarded my humble
services, is my warrant for hoping, that this tribute
of grateful veneration will be favorably received.
Among those whom Virginia, at this time, honors
with high places in her councils, I see, with pride,
the names of many with whom I once stood, shoulder
to shoulder, in the eye of danger. Of my regard
for these, this is not the place to speak, for
they
are
not thus to learn my sentiments concerning them.
The record of their praise, and the reward of their
glorious deeds, is on the page of history.
But there are others who will die without their
fame, and whose names will sink with them into the
tomb, of whose unpretending devotion to their native
country I am proud to testify. They belong to that
class, peculiar to a society whose institutions are
based on domestic slavery; the honest, brave, hardy,
and high-spirited peasantry of Virginia. Among
them, I saw examples of simple virtue and instinctive
patriotism; and from their lips I heard lessons of
that untaught wisdom, which finds its place in minds
uncorrupted by artificial systems of education, and
undebased by abject and menial occupations. The
names of Jacob Schwartz and Christian Witt deserve
to live in history. But the narrative, in which I
have endeavored to preserve them, will, in after
times, be classed among romances. Such is the
fate of all men, whose deeds shame the vaunted
achievements of those the world calls great.
Be it so. It is not the less my duty to testify of
what I have witnessed. Remembering the virtues
which I saw displayed by such, I take pride in
dedicating to the
whole
people of Virginia, in all
ranks and classes, this imperfect record of what I
witnessed in her late glorious struggle.
E. W. S.
P. S. My date reminds me that this is the
anniversary
of that glorious day, on which Virginia first
declared herself an independent State. May its
auspicious return ever find you FREE, HAPPY, and
GLORIOUS!1
CHAPTER I.
And whomsoe'er, along the path you meet,
Bears in his cap the badge of crimson hue,
Which tells you whom to shun, and whom to greet.
Byron
.
Toward
the latter end of the month of October,
1849, about the hour of noon, a horseman was seen
ascending a narrow valley at the eastern foot of the
Blue Ridge. His road nearly followed the course of
a small stream, which, issuing from a deep gorge of
the mountain, winds its way between lofty hills, and
terminates its brief and brawling course in one of
the larger tributaries of the Dan. A glance of the eye
took in the whole of the little settlement that lined
its banks, and measured the resources of its
inhabitants
.
The different tenements were so near to each
other as to allow but a small patch of arable land to
each. Of manufactures there was no appearance,
save only a rude shed at the entrance of the valley,
on the door of which the oft repeated brand of the
horse-shoe gave token of a smithy. There too the
rivulet, increased by the innumerable springs which
afforded to every habitation the unappreciated, but
inappreciable luxury of water, cold, clear and
sparkling
,
had gathered strength enough to turn a tiny mill.
Of trade there could be none. The bleak and
rugged
barrier, which closed the scene on the west, and
the narrow road, fading to a foot-path, gave
assurance
to the traveller that he had here reached the
ne
plus ultra
of social life in that direction.
Indeed, the appearance of discomfort and poverty
in every dwelling well accorded with the scanty
territory
belonging to each. The walls and chimneys of
unhewn logs, the roofs of loose boards laid on long
rib-poles, that projected from the gables, and held
down by similar poles placed above them, together
with the smoked and sooty appearance of the whole,
betokened an abundance of timber, but a dearth of
every thing else. Contiguous to each was a sort of
rude garden, denominated, in the ruder language of
the country, a truck-patch. Beyond this lay a
small field, a part of which had produced a crop of
oats, while on the remainder the Indian corn still
hung on the stalk, waiting to be gathered. Add to
this a small meadow, and the reader will have an
outline equally descriptive of each of the little farms
which, for the distance of three miles, bordered the
stream.
But, though the valley thus bore the marks of a
crowded population, a deep stillness pervaded it.
The visible signs of life were few. Of sounds there
were none. A solitary youngster, male or female,
alone was seen loitering about every door. These,
as the traveller passed along, would skulk from
observation
,
and then steal out, and, mounting a fence,
indulge their curiosity, at safe distances, by looking
after him.
At length he heard a sound of voices, and then a
shrill whistle, and all was still. Immediately, some
half a dozen men, leaping a fence, ranged themselves
across the road and faced him. He observed that
each, as he touched the ground, laid hold of a rifle
that leaned against the enclosure, and this
circumstance
drew his attention to twenty or more of these
formidable weapons, ranged along in the same
position
.
The first impulse of the traveller was to draw
a pistol; but seeing that the men, as they posted
themselves, rested their guns upon the ground and
leaned upon them, he quietly withdrew his hand from
his holster. It was plain that no violence was
intended
,
and that this movement was nothing but a
measure of precaution, such as the unsettled
condition
of the country required. He therefore advanced
steadily but slowly, and, on reaching the party,
reined
in his horse, and silently invited the intended parley.
The men, though somewhat variously attired, were
all chiefly clad in half-dressed buck-skin. They
seemed to have been engaged in gathering corn in
the adjoining field. Their companions, who still
continued
the same occupation, seemed numerous enough
(including women and boys, of both of which there
was a full proportion,) to have secured the little crop
in a few hours. Indeed, it would seem that the whole
working population of the neighborhood, both male
and female, was assembled there.
As the traveller drew up his horse, one of the men,
speaking in a low and quiet tone, said, We want
a word with you, stranger, before you go any farther.
As many as you please, replied the other, for
I am tired and hungry, and so is my horse; and I am
glad to find some one, at last, of whom I may hope
to purchase something for both of us to eat.
That
you can have quite handy, said the
countryman
,
for we have been gathering corn, and were
just going to our dinner. If you will only just 'light,
sir, one of the boys can feed your horse, and you
can take such as we have got to give you.
The invitation was accepted; the horse was taken
in charge by a long-legged lad of fifteen, without hat
or shoes; and the whole party crossed the fence
together
.
At the moment, a man was seen advancing toward
them, who, observing their approach, fell back a few
steps, and threw himself on the ground at the foot
of a large old apple-tree. Around this were
clustered
a motley group of men, women, and boys, who
1*
opened and made way for the stranger. He advanced,
and, bowing gracefully, took off his forage cap, from
beneath which a quantity of soft curling flaxen hair
fell over his brow and cheeks. Every eye was now
fixed on him, with an expression rather of interest
than mere curiosity. Every countenance was serious
and composed, and all wore an air of business,
except
that a slight titter was heard among the girls,
who, hovering behind the backs of their mothers,
peeped through the crowd, to get a look at the
handsome
stranger.
He was indeed a handsome youth, about twenty
years of age, whose fair complexion and regular
features
made him seem yet younger. He was tall,
slightly, but elegantly formed, with a countenance in
which softness and spirit were happily blended. His
dress was plain and cheap, though not unfashionable.
A short grey coat, waistcoat, and pantaloons, that
neatly fitted and set off his handsome person,
showed
by the quality of the cloth that his means were
limited; or that he had too much sense to waste, in
foppery, that which might be better expended in the
service of his suffering country. But, even in this
plain dress, he was apparelled like a king in
comparison
with the rustics that surrounded him; and his
whole air would have passed him for a gentleman, in
any dress and any company, where the constituents
of that character are rightly understood.
In the present assembly there seemed to be none,
indeed, who could be supposed to have had much
experience
in that line. But dignity is felt, and
courtesy
appreciated by all, and the expression of
frankness
and truth is every where understood.
As the youth approached, the man at the foot of
the tree arose, and returned the salutation, which
seemed unheeded by the rest. He advanced a step
or two, and invited the stranger to be seated. This
action, and the looks turned toward him by the
others, showed that he was in authority of some sort
among them. With him, therefore, our traveller
concluded
that the proposed conference was to be held.
There was nothing in his appearance which would
have led a careless observer to assign him any
preeminence
.
But a second glance might have
discovered
something intellectual in his countenance, with
less of boorishness in his air and manner than the rest
of the company displayed. In all, indeed, there was
the negative courtesy of that quiet and serious
demeanor
which solemn occasions impart to the rudest
and most frivolous. It was plain to see that they had
a common purpose, and that neither ferocity nor
rapacity
entered into their feeling toward the
new-comer
.
Whether he was to be treated as a friend or
an enemy, obviously depended on some high
consideration
,
not yet disclosed.
He was at length asked whence he came, and
answered
from the neighborhood of Richmond. From
which side of the river?From the north side.
Did he know any thing of Van Courtlandt?His
camp was at Bacon's branch, just above the town.
What force had he?
I cannot say, certainly, he replied, but
common
fame made his numbers about four thousand.
Is that all, on both sides of the river? said his
interrogator.
O, no! Col. Loyal's regiment is at Petersburg,
and Col. Coles's at Manchester; each about five
hundred strong; and there is a piquet on the Bridge
island.
Did you cross there?
I did not.
Where then? he was asked.
I can hardly tell you, he replied, it was at a
private ford, several miles above Cartersville.
Was not that mightily out of the way? What
made you come so far around?
It was safer travelling on that side of the river.
Then the people on that side of the river are
your friends?
No. They are not. But, as they are all of a
color there, they would let me pass, and ask no
questions
,
as long as I travelled due west. On this side,
if you are one man's friend, you are the next man's
enemy; and I had no mind to answer questions.
You seem to answer them now mighty freely.
That is true. I am like a letter that tells all it
knows as soon as it gets to the right hand; but it
does not want to be opened before that.
And how do you know that you have got to the
right hand now?
Because I know where I am.
And where are you?
Just at the foot of the Devil's Back-bone,
replied
the youth.
Were you ever here before?
Never in my life.
How do you know then where you are? asked
the mountaineer.
Because the right way to avoid questions is to
ask none. So I took care to know all about the
road, and the country, and the place, before I left
home.
And who told you all about it?
Suppose I should tell you, answered the young
man, that Van Courtlandt had a map of the
country
made, and gave it to me.
I should say, you were a traitor to him, or a spy
upon us, was the stern reply.
At the same moment, a startled hum was heard
from the crowd, and the press moved and swayed for
an instant, as if a sort of spasm had pervaded the
whole mass.
You are a good hand at questioning, said the
youth, with a smile, but, without asking a single
question, I have found out all I wanted to know.
And what was that? asked the other.
Whether you were friends to the Yorkers and
Yankees, or to poor old Virginia.
And which
are
we for? added the laconic
mountaineer
.
For
old Virginia for ever
, replied the youth,
in a tone in which exultation rung through a deeper
emotion, that half stifled his voice.
It reached the hearts of his auditors, and was
echoed
in a shout that pealed along the mountain sides
their proud war-cry of
Old Virginia for ever
.
The leader looked around in silence, but with a
countenance
that spoke all that the voices of his comrades
had uttered.
Quiet boys, said he, never shout till the war
is endedunless it be when you see the enemy.
Then turning again to the traveller, he said, And
how did you know we were for old Virginia?
I knew it by the place where I find you. I heard
it in
your voice;
I saw it in
their eyes;
and I felt in in
my heart;
said the young man, extending his hand.
His inquisitor returned the cordial pressure with
an iron grasp, strong, but not convulsive, and went
on: You are a sharp youth, said he, and if you
are of the right metal that will hold an edge, you
will make somebody feel it. But I don't know
rightly
yet who that is to be, only just I will say, that if
you are not ready to live and die by old Virginia,
your heart and face are not of the same color, that's
all.
He then resumed his steady look, and quiet tone,
and added, You must not make me forget what I
am about. How
did
you learn the way here?
I can answer that
now;
said the youth. I
learned it from Captain Douglas.
Captain Douglas! exclaimed the other. If
you were never here before, you have never seen him
since he knew it himself.
True enough; was the reply. But I have
heard from him.
I should like to see his letter.
I have no letter.
How then?
Go with me to my horse, and I will show you.
The youth, accompanied by his interrogator, now
returned toward the fence. Many of the crowd
were about to follow; but the chief (for such he
seemed) waved them back-with a silent motion of
his hand, while a glance of meaning at two of the
company invited them to proceed. As soon as the
stranger reached his horse, he drew out, from
between
the padding and seat of his saddle, a paper
closely folded. On opening this, it was found to be
a map of his route from Richmond to a point in the
mountains, a few miles west of the spot where they
stood. On this were traced the roads and streams,
with the names of a few places, written in a hand
which was known to the leader of the mountaineers
to be that of Captain Douglas. A red line marked
the devious route the traveller had been directed to
pursue.
He said that, after crossing the river, between
Lynchburg and Cartersville, to avoid the parties of
the enemy stationed at both places, he had lain by,
until dark, at the house of a true Virginian. Then,
turning south, and riding hard all night, he had
crossed
the Appomattox above Farmville, (which he
avoided
for a like reason,) and, before day, had left behind
him all the hostile posts and scouting parties. He
soon reached the Staunton river, and, having passed
it, resumed his westward course in comparative safety.
You know this hand, said he to the chief, and
now, I suppose, you are satisfied.
I am satisfied, replied the other, and glad to
see you. I have not a doubt about you, young man,
and you are heartily welcome among usto all we
can give youand that an't muchand all we can do
for you; and that will depend upon whether stout
hearts, and willing minds, and good rifles can help you.
But you said you were hungry; so, I dare say, you'll
be glad enough of a part of our sorry dinner.
CHAPTER II.
Heus! etiam Mensas consumimus
.
Virgil
.
Returning
to the party which they had left, they
found the women in the act of placing their meal
before
them, under the apple-tree. There was a patch
of grass there, but no shade; nor was any needed in
that lofty region; the frost had already done it's work
by stripping the trees of their leaves, and letting in
the welcome rays of the sun through the naked
branches. The meal consisted of fresh pork and
venison, roasted or broiled on the coals, which looked
tempting enough, though served up in wooden trays.
There were no knives but such as each hunter carries
in his belt. Our traveller's dirk supplied the place of
one to him. Their plates were truly classical,
consisting
of cakes of Indian corn, baked in the ashes,
so that, like the soldiers of neas, each man ate up
his platter before his hunger was appeased.
Our traveller, though sharp-set, could not help
perceiving
a woful inspidity in his food, for which his
entertainer apologized. We ha'nt got no salt to
give you, stranger, said he. The little that's
made on the waters of Holston, is all used there;
and what comes by way of the sound is too dear for
2
the like of us, that fight one half the year, and work
the other half, and then with our rifles in our hands.
As long as we let the Yankees hold James river, we
must make up our minds to eat our hogs when they
are fat, and to do without salt to our bread. But it
is not worth grumbling about; and bread without
salt is more than men deserve that will give up their
country without fighting for it.
When the meal was finished, our traveller,
expressing
a due sense of the courtesy of his entertainers,
asked what was to pay, and proposed to continue his
journey.
As to what you are to pay, my friend, said the
spokesman of the party, in the same cold, quiet tone,
that is just nothing. If you come here by Captain
Douglas's invitation, you are one of us; and if you
do not, we are bound to find you as long as we keep
you. But, as to your going just yet, it is quite
against our rules.
How is that? asked the traveller, with some
expression of impatience.
That is what I cannot tell you; replied the
other.
But what right, exclaimed the youththen
checking himself, he added: But I see you mean
nothing but what is right and prudent; and you must
take your own way to find out all you wish to know
about me. But I thought you said you did not
doubt me.
No more I do, replied the other; but that is
not the thing. May be, our rules are not satisfied,
though I am.
And what are your rules?
It is against rule to tell them, said the
mountaineer
,
drily. But make yourself easy, stranger.
We mean you no harm, and I will see and have
every thing laid straight before sun-rise. You are
heartily welcome. Such as we've got we give you;
and that is better than you will find where you are
going. For our parts, except it be for salt, we are
about as well off here as common; because there is
little else we use that comes from foreign parts.
I dare say, it will go hard with you for a while, sir;
but, if your heart's right, you will not mind it, and
you will soon get used to it.
It would be a great shame, said the youth, if
I cannot bear for a while what you have borne for
life.
Yes, said the other, that is the way
people
talk. But (axing your pardon, sir,) there an't
no sense in it. Because the longer a man bears a
thing, the less he minds it; and after a while, it an't
no hardship at all. And that's the way with the poor
negroes that the Yankees pretended to be so sorry
for, and tried to get them to rise against their
masters
.
There's few of them, stranger, but what's
happier than I am; but I should be mighty unhappy,
if you were to catch me now, in my old days, and
make a slave of me. So when the Yankees want to set
the negroes free, and to make me a slave, they want to
put us both to what we are not fit for. And so it
will be with you for a while, among these mountains,
sleeping on the ground, and eating your meat
without
salt, or bread either, may be. But after a while
you will not mind it. But as to whether it is to be
long or short, young man, you must not think about
that. You have no business here, if you have not
made up your mind to stand the like of that for life;
and may be that not so mighty long neither.
At this moment a signal from the road gave notice
of the approach of a traveller; and the leader of the
mountaineers, accompanied by his guest, went
forward
in obedience to it. But, before he reached the
fence, he saw several of the party leap it, and run
eagerly forward to meet the new-comer. A little
man now appeared, walking slowly and wearily,
whose dress differed but little from that of the
natives
;
and who bore, like them, a rifle, with its
proper
accompaniments of knife, tomahawk and
powderhorn
.
His arrival awakened a tumult of joy among
the younger persons present, while he whom I have
designated as the chief stood still, looking toward
him with a countenance in which an expression of
thoughtful interest was mingled with a sort of quiet
satisfaction, and great kindness and good will. Yet
he moved but a step to meet him, and extending his
hand, said, in his usual cold tone, How is it,
Schwartz? to which the other, in a voice somewhat
more cherry, replied Well; how is it with you
Witt? Well, was the grave answer.
The two now drew apart to converse privately
together
.
Crossing the road, they seated themselves
on the fence in front of the stranger, so that during
their conference they could keep an eye on him.
Who is this you have got here? asked Schwartz.
A young fellow that says he wants to go to the
camp, replied the other.
Has he got the word and signs?
No. He does not know any thing about it. I
have a notion he is a friend of the captain's.
What makes you think so?
He has got a paper in the captain's hand-write
to show him the way. But there's no name to it;
and if there was, I could not tell that he was the man.
Sure and sartain the captain wrote the paper, but
then somebody may have stolen it. A man that
knows as much about the country as he does, after
looking at that paper and travelling by it away here,
is the last man we ought to let go any farther, or
know any more, unless he is of the right sort.
I should like to see that paper; said Schwartz.
Here it is, replied his companion. I don't
much mistrust the young fellow; but I did not like
to let him have it again till I knew more.
Schwartz now looked at the paper and enquired
the stranger's name.
2*
I did not ask his name, said Witt, because
he could just tell me what name he pleased. As
there was no name on the paper, it did not make any
odds. Besides, I wanted to be civil to him, and
your high gentlemen down about Richmond are
affronted sometimes if you ask their names. The
young fellow is all right, or all wrong, any how; and
his name don't make any odds. If the captain
knows him, when he sees him, it's all one what his
name is.
But I know, said Schwartz, who ought to
have that paper; and if he don't answer to that name
it's no use troubling the captain with him.
I should be sorry for any harm to him, said
Witt, for he is a smart lad; and if he is not a true
Virginian, then he is the greatest hypocrite that ever
was born.
They now recrossed the road, and Schwartz,
addressing
the stranger, said, I must make so bold,
young man, as to ask your name.
The young fellow colored, and, turning to Witt,
said, I thought you were satisfied, and done asking
questions.
So I was, said Witt, but there is a reason for
asking your name now, that I did not know of. I
owe you nothing but good will, young man, added
he with earnest solicitude; and if your name is
what I hope it is, be sure by all means and tell the
truth; for there is but one name in the world that
will save your neck.
Then I shall tell you no name at all, rejoined
the youth, somewhat appalled at this startling
intimation
.
Why did not you ask me at once, when I
was in the humor to keep nothing from you. I was
willing to answer any civil question, or indeed any
question
you
would have put to me, but I will not
submit
to be examined, over and over, by every
chance-comer
.
There's where you are wrong, young man,
replied
Witt. This is no
chance-comer
.
He is my
head man, and I am just nobody when he is here.
Surprised at this ascription of authority to the
diminutive
and mean-looking new-comer, our traveller
looked at him again, and was confirmed in a
resolution
to resist it. He had patiently borne to be
questioned
by Witt, who had something of an air of
dignity. He was a tall, clean-limbed, and powerful
man, of about forty, remarkable for the sobriety of
his demeanor, and the thoughtful gravity of his
countenance. The other was a little, old fellow, not
less than sixty years of age, in whose manner and
carriage there was nothing to supply the want of
dignity in his diminutive form and features. A sharp
little black eye was the only point about him to
attract
attention: and in that the youth thought he saw
an impertinent and knowing twinkle, which rendered
his inquiries yet more offensive.
I thought, said he to Witt, that Captain
Douglas was your captain.
So he is, was his reply. That is, he
commands
all here. But that is only so long as we
choose. I did not tell you this was my
captain
. He
is no
captain
, nor
lieutenant
, nor
ensign
neither. But
all of us here follow him; and, when he is away, the
rest follow me.
You all follow
him!
said the traveller, looking
contemptuously on the puny figure before him.
To be sure they do; said Schwartz, with a
quizzieal smile, and answering the stranger's thoughts.
To be sure they do. Don't you see I am the
likeliest
man here?
I cannot say I do, said the youth, offended at
the impertinent manner of the question.
Well, I am the strongest man in the whole
company
.
I should hardly think that; replied the traveller,
scornfully.
Any how, then, I
am
the biggest, rejoined
Schwartz, laughing. That you must own. What!
do you dispute that too? Well then, look here,
stranger! I ha'nt got no commission, and these
men are as free as I am. What
do
you think makes
them obey my orders?
I really cannot say, replied the young man.
Well, said Schwartz, it is a curious
business
,
and well worth your considering; because, you
see, I have a notion if you could find that out, you
would find out a pretty good reason why you ought
to tell me your name. But that is your business.
Some name you must have, and the right one too.
And you see, stranger, it makes no odds whether it is
no name or the wrong one. It is all the same thing;
because, if you are the man that ought to have that
paper, you would tell your name in a minute.
Do
you
know who ought to have it? asked the
youth.
May be I do, said Schwartz.
Question for question, said the other.
Do
you know?
I do.
Well, then, my name is Arthur Trevor. Is that
right?
That's as it may be, said Schwartz. But
now I want to know how you came by this paper.
What need you care about that, if I am the
person
that ought to have it.
Just because I want to know if you
are
the one
that ought have it.
I tell you, replied the youth, that my name is
Arthur Trevor.
But
I
do not
know
that it is, replied Schwartz,
carelessly.
Do you doubt my word, then? exclaimed the
youth; his eye flashing, and the blood rushing to his
face, as if it would burst through his clear skin.
Look here, stranger, said Schwartz, in a tone
of quiet expostulation; I don't mean no offence,
and you'll think so too, if you'll just look at it rightly;
because, you see, I don't know who you are. I don't
doubt Arthur Trevor's word; and, if you are Arthur
Trevor, I don't doubt your word. Now, if you have
my way to show that you are Arthur Trevor you
have but to do it, and it will set all as straight as if I
had axed you ten thousand pardens.
But I have no means of showing it, said the
young amn, in some perplexity. I took care to
bring nothing with me to show who I am. The
name of Trevor might have brought me into trouble
in some parts of the country.
That is true enough; replied Schwartz, and so
I asked you how you came by the paper, because I
know how Arthur Trevor should have come by it;
and, if you got it that way, why than you are the
very man.
By this time the youth saw the folly of his anger,
and answered, calmly, that he got it from a man he
never saw before.
What sort of a man was he? asked Schwartz.
Nothing uncommon, except that he was lame
Did he give you any thing else at the same
time?
Yes; he gave me this; said the youth,
producing
a dirty piece of paper, on which were scrawled
these words:
Sur. If you hav occashun to go of a jurney,
carry
this with you, bekase it mout be of sum sarvice to
you.
Well, said Schwartz, that will do. You are
Arthur Trevor, sure enough. And I reckon, Witt,
you would have said so too, if you had seen this.
Witt looked at the paper, and merely nodded
assent
.
Well, said the young man, now I suppose I
may go on to my friend.
Not just yet, said Schwartz.
Why so? asked the youth, again relapsing into
petulance.
Just because you could not get there, was the
answer.
Why not, said he, after finding my way
thus far.
For the same reason that you could not have got
any farther if I had not come. You would meet
with rougher customers than these between here and
the camp. Come, come, my son. You must learn
to take things easy. The captain has not got a
better
friend than me in the world; nor you neither, if
you did but know all. And, you see, you are going
to a new trade; and I thought I would just give you
a lesson. Now you may see, that, when you mean
nothing but what is fair and honorable, (and
you
always
know how that is,) the naked truth is your best
friend; and then, the sooner it comes the better. I
am pretty much of an old fox; and I reckon I have
told more lies than you ever dreamed of, but, for all
that, I have seen the day when the truth was better
than the cunningest lie that ever was told. And
then again, it an't no use to mind what a man says
when he don't know you; because, you see, it an't
you he is talking to, but just a stranger.
But I have travelled desperate hard to-day,
Witt, continued Schwartz; and I must push on to
the camp to-night. So just give me a mouthful, and
I'll be off, and pilot Mr. Trevor through among the
guards.
My horse is at your service, as you are tired,
said Arthur, whose feelings toward his new
acquaintance
were now quite mollified.
I have had riding enough for one day, said
Schwartz; and was glad enough to get to where I
could leave my horse. It an't much good a horse
will do you, or me either, where we are going. By
the time we climb to the top of the Devil's
Back-bone
,
you'll be more tired than me; and the horse
will be worst off of any.
He now told one of the boys to make ready
Arthur's
horse, and, snatching a hasty morsel, seized his
rifle. It will not do, said he, to starve when
a man is on fatigue, and it will not do to eat too
much. And see here, Witt, added he, taking him
apart, and speaking in a low tone, if a
long-legged
,
red-headed fellow comes along here, and tells
you he is from Currituck, and seems to think he
knows all the signs, never let him find out but what
he does. Only just make an excuse to keep him a
while, and send a runner on to me, that I may have
time to get out of the way, because he must not see
me. Then you can start him off again with a couple
of fellows to show him the way.
3
CHAPTER III.
The forest's shady scene,
Where things that own not man's dominion dwell,
And mortal foot hath ne'er or rarely been.
Byron
.
The travellers now moved off together, Arthur
walking, and leading his horse. They soon reached
a point where a sharp ridge, jutting like a buttress
from the side of the mountain, came down abruptly
to the very bank of the rivulet. Up this ridge, not
unaptly called the Devil's Back-bone, the path
led. Leaning, as it were, against the mountainits
position, the narrow, ridgy edge along which the
traveller
clambered, and the rough nodules which
interrupted
the ascent, like the notches in a hen's ladder,
gave it no small resemblance to this housewifely
contrivance
.
The steep descent on either hand into
deep dells, craggy and hirsute with stinted trees
bristling
from the sides, together with the similarity of
these same nodules to the joints of the spine, had
suggested a name strictly descriptive of the place.
The ruggedness, steepness, and vast height of the
ascent, would naturally provoke some spiteful
epithet
;
and were the spot to be named again, a
hundred
to one it would receive the same name, and no
other.
At the summit of this narrow stair, the travellers
stopped to take breath, and look back on the scene
below. Arthur, who was at the romantic age when
young men are taught to affect an enthusiasm for the
beauties of nature, and to prate about hues and scents,
and light and shade, and prospects in all the variety
of the grand, the beautiful, and the picturesque, had
been feasting his imagination with the thought of the
glorious view to be seen from the pinnacle before
him. Like an epicure about to feast on turtle, who
will not taste a biscuit beforehand lest he should
spoil his dinner, so our young traveller steadily kept
his face toward the hill as he ascended it. Even
when he stopped to take breath, he was careful not
to look behind. Schwartz, on the contrary, who was
in advance, always faced about on such occasions,
filling the pauses with conversation, and looking as
if unconscious of the glorious scene over which his
eye glanced unheeding. Arthur was vexed to see
such indifference, and wondered whether this was
the effect of use, or of the total absence of a faculty
of which poets so much delight to speak.
At length the summit was attained; and now the
youth looked around in anticipated exultation. At
first he felt bound to admire, and, forgetting the
unromantic
character of his matter-of-fact companion,
exclaimed: Oh! how grand! How beautiful!
For my part, said Schwartz, indifferently, I
cannot say that I see any thing at all rightly, except
it be the little branch down there, with its patches of
meadow and corn-fields, and its smoky cabins. In
the spring of the year, when you cannot see the
cabins
for the shaders, and the corn, and oats, and
meadow
is all of a color, it looks mightily like a little
green snake. What it is like just now, I cannot say,
as I never saw one of them snakes half-scaled, and
with a parcel of warts on his back: but I have a
notion
he would look pretty much so. As to any thing
elsethere
is
something there, to be sure, but what
it is, I am sartain I could never tell, if I did not
know. And as to the distance I hear some folks talk
aboutwhy the farther you look, the less you see,
that's all; until you get away yonder, t'other side of
nowhere; and then you see just nothing at all.
But the vastness of the view! said Arthur.
The idea of immensity!
As to that, replied Schwartz, you have only
just to look right up, and you can look a heap
farther
,
and still see nothing. All the difference is,
you know it is nothing; and down there, you know
there is something, and you cannot see what it is.
I am afraid your eyes are bad, said Arthur.
I cannot see as well as I could once, replied
Schwartz; but if there was any thing to be seen
down there, I should be right apt to see it. I have
clomb this hill, Mr. Trevor, when I could see the
head of a nail in a target fifty yards off, and drive it
with my rifle; and I don't think I saw any thing
more then than. I do now; and that is only just
because
there an't nothing there to see.I God! but
there is, though! There's that chap a coming along;
and I must see the Captain, and tell him all about it
before he comes.
I see nobody, said Arthur.
That is because you don't look in the right
place, replied Schwartz. Look along the road.
I don't see the road, except just at the foot of
the mountain.
Well! Look through the sights of my rifle.
There! Don't you see a man on horseback?
I see something moving, said Arthur; but I
cannot tell what it is.
Well, said Schwartz, when he comes, you'll
see it's a man riding on a white horse, and then, may
be, you'll think if there was any thing else there, I
could see that too.
He now sounded a small whistle, which hung
by a leathern thong from his shoulder-belt. The
signal was answered from the point of a projecting
crag which jutted out from the face of the cliff, not
more than fifty yards off. At the same moment, a
man was seen to rise up from behind a rock, which
had hitherto concealed him; though, from his
lookout
place, he must have had a distinct view of our
travellers from the moment they left the valley. He
now approached and accosted Schwartz in a manner
which showed that he had already recognized him.
3*
Schwartz returned the salutation, and, pointing out
the man on the white horse, said: If that fellow
should happen to get by without
their
seeing him, I
want you just to fall in with him, like as if you was a
hunting, and so go with him to the piquet. Never
let on but he knows all the signs, and keep with
him: and when you get him to the piquet, make him
believe that is the camp, and that the Captain will be
there after a while; and so keep him there till the
Captain comes.
Having said this, he again turned his eye toward
the object moving below, and gazed intently for a
few minutes. Arthur, in the mean time, was left to
admire the prospect, and soon began to suspect that
Schwartz's ideas of the picturesque were not so far
wrong. Indeed, there is nothing to admire from the
spot, but the road that leads to it. From the foot of
the mountain to the coast, there is an expanse of
nearly three hundred miles, with no secondary ridges.
As seen from that elevation, the whole is level to the
eye, and presents one sheet of unbroken forest.
Arthur
found time to correct his preconceptions by the
testimony of his own senses, while Schwartz
continued
to observe the movements of the distant
traveller
.
At last he said: That will do. They have
stopped him; and he will not get away to-night.
They now moved on quietly through a forest of
lofty chestnuts, and along a path which wound its
way among the scorched trunks of innumerable trees,
prostrated by the fires that annually sweep through
such uninhabited fracts. The soil seemed fertile,
and abounding in luxuriant though coarse pasturage;
and the high table-land of the mountain was more
level than the peopled district below. Yet all was
solitary and silent; nor was a vestige of habitation
seen for miles. On inquiring the cause of this, Arthur
was told that the country, at that elevation, was too
cold to be inviting, as nothing would grow there but
grass and oats, and that it was all shingled over with
conflicting patents.
They that claim the land, said Schwartz, will
not go to law about it with one another: because
they would have to survey it, and that would cost a
mint of money; so they all club to keep it as a
summer
range for their stock. It belongs to
some
of
them, and that is enough.
He had not long done speaking, when he
suddenly
stopped, and, raising his rifle, fired, and began
quietly to load again.
What did you shoot at? asked Arthur, looking
in the direction of the shot.
A monstrous fine buck, replied Schwartz.
Where is he? I did not see him.
You did not look in the right place. He is down
and kicking; and I always like to load my gun before
I go up to them, because, you see, a deer, when he is
wounded, is as dangerous as a
painter
.
A
painter!
said Arthur. What harm is there
in a painter, more than another man?
O! said Schwartz, laughing, it an't no man
at all. I don't just rightly know how you high
larnt gentlemen call his name, but he is as ugly a
varmint as you'd wish to see; most like a big cat.
Sometimes the drotted Yankees gets hold of them
and puts them in a cage; and then they call them
tigers. I God! I catched a young one once and
sold him to one of these fellows; and the next time
I seed him, he was carrying the cretur about with
him for a show. And he did not remember me; and
so I axed him what it was; and he said 'twas an
Effrican tiger right from Duck river! Lord! how
the folks did laugh; 'cause you see, sir, Duck river
is just a little way down here in Tennessee, not over
five hundred miles off; and Effrica, they tell me, is
away t'other side of the herring-pond, where the
negurs
come from.
By this time the rifle was loaded, and they
advanced
toward the fallen deer. They were quite near
before Arthur discovered him; and, at the moment,
the animal (a noble buck of ten branches) recovered
himself so far as to regain his feet. He still
staggered
,
but the sudden sight of his enemy seemed, at
once, to stiffen his limbs with horror, and give them
strength to support him. In an instant his
formidable
antlers were pointed; and, with eyes glaring and
blood-shot, and his hair all turned the wrong way, he
was in act to spring forward. At the instant, the
report
of the rifle was again heard, and, pitching on
the points of his horns, he turned fairly heels over
head, and lay with his legs in air, and quivering in
death. Schwartz now drew his knife across the
animal's
throat, and proceeded to disembowel him, when
Arthur asked what he would do with the carcass.
I'll just hang him up in a sapling, said he,
till I meet one of our men. There ought to be one
close by, and I can send him for him. Where there's
a hundred mouths to feed, such a buck as this is a
cash article.
At this moment, the snapping of a dry stick caught
his ear; and, looking up, he saw a man approaching.
I don't know that fellow, said he, looking hard at
him. But it's all one. I can make him know me.
The usual salutation now passed, and the stranger
said: If I may be so bold, stranger, I'd be glad to
know what parts you are from?
From Passamaquoddy, said Schwartz.
Can you tell me the price of skins down there
away?
Twenty-five cents and a quarter a pound,
replied
Schwartz.
A few more simple questions and out-of-the-way
answers were exchanged, when Schwartz, addressing
the other, in an under tone, said: You are one of the
new recruits, I reckon? The other nodded; and
Schwartz went on to ask their number. Being told
they were fifty, he said, gravely: Now, there you
are wrong. You are right enough to pass me, after
I gave you the word; but then that's no reason you
should tell me any thing. I just asked you, you see,
to give you a 'caution; cause a fellow might come
along here that would give you the word as straight
as any body, and be a spy all the time. So the right
way would be, just to pass him and keep dark, that's
the rule; and, by the time he'd find out how many
men we've got, may be he'd find out something else
he would not like quite so well. But come, let us
take the deer up to the road, and you can walk your
post and watch it, till I can send somebody for it
from the piquet.
The sturdy mountaineer at once shouldered the
animal
;
and, striding along to the road, threw him down,
and quietly betook himself to eating the chestnuts that
covered the ground. The traveller moved on, and
presently came to the piquet.
Here was a small party quartered in a rude and
ruinous cabin, near which was an enclosure around a
beautiful fountain, that welled up from a natural basin
of stone. In this were confined twenty or thirty calves.
A few horses were piqueted at hand, and the sides
of the adjoining hills were covered with a numerous
herd of fat cattle, browsing on the faded, but still
succulent vegetation. The time was come when they
should have been driven down for the winter, to the
farms of their owners below, but they were left here
that the men might have the use of the milk. Should
their hunting at any time prove unsucessful, there
was always a beef at hand.
Here Schwartz was known, and joyfully
welcomed
.
He stopped only to tell of the deer, and moved
on. You have a curious system here, said Arthur;
I see the people here know you, but how did you
manage with that new recruit. I watched you, and
I did not see you give him any sign, and he did not
ask for a countersign.
That is all because you don't know what foolish
answers I gave to his questions. You see, we ha'nt
got no countersign rightly; 'cause you see, when I
stop a man, I want to know who he is, but I don't
want to tell him any thing about myself. But if I
ax a man for the countersign, just so I might as well
tell him I am on guard at once. So we've just got,
may be, twenty simple questions; and when we ask
them, our own folks know what answer to give, and
the answer is sure to be one that nobody would give
unless he was in the secret.
And pray how did you find out that I was Arthur
Trevor?
O! nothing easier, sir. That man, that gave
you the map, was not no more lame than you. But
I told him to be sure and not give it to nobody but
you, and then to limp so as you'd be sure to notice it.
You see, it was I that was to try fall in with you,
and pilot you; but, after that, I got upon another
scheme. As to the other paper, that was to serve you
with our folks, because there was a mark there you
did not notice, that any of them would know; and
then they would be middling sure you were the man
you said you were. They would have been civil to
you, and let you pass, but then they would have sent
a man or two to the camp with you. And now, Mr.
Trevor,
here is
something that I
can
see, and I have a
notion it's worth looking at.
While he was yet speaking, Arthur's ears had been
saluted by a brawling sound, which he now recognized
as the rush of water. Turning his head toward it,
he perceived that it proceeded from a deep and shaggy
dell, which the path was now approaching, and along
the verge of which it presently wound. Here the
plain broke sheer down into a gulph of vast depth,
at the bottom of which a considerable stream was
seen. It dashed rapidly along, pouring it's sparkling
waters over successive barriers of yellow rock, that
sent up a golden gleam from beneath the crystal sheet
that covered them. The mountain-pine, the fir, the
kalmia, and numberless other evergreens, which
nearly
filled the gorge, afforded only occasional glimpses
of the water; while they set off the picturesque
appearance
of so much as they permitted to be seen.
As they advanced, they came to a part where the
trees had been cut from the brow of the cliff; and,
several of those below having been removed, a clearer
view was afforded.
Here, at the depth of two hundred feet, figures
were seen moving to and fro, while, right opposite,
under a beetling cliff, that screened them from above,
were groups clustered around fires, kindled against the
rock, behind a rude breast-work of logs. The whole
breadth of the stream was here exposed to view,
apparently
twenty or thirty yards wide. Though
shallow
,
by reason of its rapidity it seemed to pour a
vast volume of water.
Standing on the brow of the cliff, Schwartz now
uttered a shout, and immediately half a dozen men,
seizing their rifles, moved up the glen, and were soon
hidden under the bank on which the travellers stood.
They now went on, and presently reached a point at
which the path, turning short to the left, dived into
the abyss, leading down a rugged ledge that sloped
along the face of the cliff, in the direction opposite
to that of their approach. It reached the very bottom,
nearly under the point from which the shout of
Schwartz had given notice of his presence. Here he
stopped; and, requesting Arthur to wait a moment,
he descended. He had not gone far before his name
was repeated by a dozen voices, and immediately he
was heard to say: Yes, it is Schwartz; and I have a
friend with me.
Bring him down, was the answer; upon which
Schwartz, returning, requested Arthur to follow him,
and mind his footing. Arthur obeyed, and
descended
,
not without some appearance of danger,
sometimes
leaping and sometimes crawling, until he
reached
the group stationed at the foot of this rude
stairway
.
Here let us leave him for a while, and go back
to enquire who and whence he was.
4
CHAPTER IV.
Handmaid of Prudence, Fortune comes
Prompt to her bidding, ready to fulfil
Her mistress' pleasure; whether she demand
The treasures of the South, the applause of men,
Or the calm sunshine of domestic bliss,
Lo! they are hers!
Anonymous
.
Arthur Trevor
was the youngest son of a
gentleman
who resided in the neighborhood of
Richmond
.
He was a man in affluent circumstances, and
had long and honorably filled various important and
dignified stations in the service of his native State.
Endowed with handsome talents, an amiable
disposition
,
and all the accomplishments that can adorn a
gentleman, he added to these the most exemplary
virtues. His influence in society had, of course,
been great, and though now, at the age of seventy,
withdrawn from public life, his opinions were enquired
of, and his counsel sought, by all who had access to
him. Through life he had been remarkable for
firmness
,
and yet more for prudence. The steadiness of
his principles could never be questioned, but, it was
thought, he had sometimes deemed it wise to
compromise
,
when men of less cautious temper would
have found safety in prudent boldness.
To this temperament had been attributed his
conduct
in regard to the politics of the last twenty years.
Bred up in the school of State rights, and thoroughly
imbued with its doctrines, he had, even before that
time, been accustomed to look, with a jealous eye,
on the progressive usurpations of the Federal
Government
.
In the hope of arresting these, he had
exerted more than his usual activity in aiding to put
down the younger Adams, and to elevate his
successor
.
Though no candidate for the spoils of victory,
no man rejoiced more sincerely in the result of that
contest; and, until the emanation of the
proclamation
of December, 1832, he had given his hearty
approbation
,
and steady, though quiet support, to the
administration of Andrew Jackson.
From that moment he seemed to look with fearful
bodings on the affairs of his country. His
disapprobation
of that instrument was expressed with as
much freedom and force as was consistent with his
habitual reserve and moderation. He was, indeed,
alarmed into a degree of excitement unusual with
him, and might have gone farther than he did, had
he not found that others were disposed to go, as he
thought, too far. He had entirely disapproved the
nullifying ordinance of South Carolina; and, though
he recognized the right of secession, he deprecated
all thought of resorting to that remedy. He was
aware that many of his best friends, thinking that
its necessity would be eventually felt by all, feared
that that conviction might come too late. They
remarked
the steady tendency of Federal measures to
weaken the mal-content States in the South, and to
increase the resources of their northern oppressors
and those of the General Government. Hence they
feared, that whenever Virginia, or any other of the
slave-holding States, should find itself driven to
secession
,
the other party, in the confidence of superior
strength, might be tempted forcibly to resist the
exercise
of the right. They thus arrived at the
conclusion
that separation (which they deemed
inevitable
)
to be peaceable, must be prompt.
These ideas had been laid before Mr. Trevor, and,
in proportion to the urgency with which they were
pressed, was his alarm and his disposition to adhere
to the Union. He, at last, had brought himself to
believe union, on any terms, better than disunion,
under any circumstances. As the lesser evil,
therefore
,
he determined to forget the proclamation, and,
striving to reconcile himself to all the acts of the
administration
,
he regarded every attempt to unite the
South, in support of a southern president, as a
prelude
to the formation of a southern confederacy. By
consequence, he became a partisan of Martin Van
Buren; and united with Ritchie, and others of the
same kidney, in endeavoring to subdue the spirit, and
tame down the State pride of Virginia. These
endeavors
,
aided by the lavish use of federal patronage
in the State, were so far successful, that when, at the
end of Van Buren's second term, he demanded a
third election, she alone, in the South, supported his
pretensions.
By the steady employment of the same pernicious
influences, the elections throughout the State had
been so regulated, as to produce returns of a majority
of members devoted to the views of the usurper.
This had continued until the spring of 1848, at which
time the results of the elections were essentially the
same which had taken place since the memorable
1836; when Virginia, at one stroke of the pen,
expunged
her name from the chronicles of honor,
expunged
the history of all her glories,
expunged
herself
.
From that time the land of Washington, and
Henry, and Mason, of Jefferson, Madison, and
Randolph
,
sunk to the rank of a province, administered
and managed by the Riveses and Ritchies, the
Barbours
and Stevensons, the Watkinses and
Wilsons
,
whose chance to be remembered in history
depends
,
like that of Erostratus, on the glories of that
temple of liberty which they first desecrated and then
destroyed.
Where once the Csars dwelt,
There dwelt, tuneless, the birds of night.
From some cause, not understood at the time, an
unexpected reaction had taken place between the
spring elections and the recurrence of that
form
of
presidential election in the fall, the observance of
which was still deemed necessary to display, and, by
4*
displaying, to perpetuate the usurper's power. This
reaction appeared to show itself chiefly in those
counties heretofore most distinguished for their
loyalty
.
It would have seemed as if the spirit of John
Randolph had risen from the sleep of death, and
walked abroad through the scenes where his
youthful
shoulders had received the mantle of
his
eloquence
from the hand of Henry. For the first time,
in twelve years, the vote of Virginia was recorded
against the re-election of Martin Van Buren to the
presidential throne.
But not the less subservient were the proceedings
of the Legislature elected for his use, the spring
before
.
Yet enough had been done to justify the hope
that the ancient spirit of old Virginia would yet show
itself in the descendants of the men who had defied
Cromwell, in the plenitude of his power, and had cast
off the yoke of George the Third, without waiting
for the co-operation of the other colonies. At the
same time, the power and the will of a fixed majority
in the North, to give a master to the South, had been
made manifest. It was clearly seen, too, that he had
determined to use the power thus obtained, and to
administer the government solely with a view to the
interest of that sectional faction, by which he had
been supported.
V victis!
Woe to the
vanquished
!
was the word. It had gone forth; and
northern cupidity and northern fanaticism were seen
to march, hand in hand, to the plunder and
desolation
of the South.
Under these circumstances, the southern States
had been, at length, forced to see that the day for
decisive
action had arrived. They therefore
determined
no longer to abide the obligations of a
constitution
,
the forms of which alone remained, and having,
by a movement nearly simultaneous, seceded from
the Union, they had immediately formed a southern
confederacy. The suddenness of these measures
was less remarkable than the prudence with which
they had been conducted. The two together left
little doubt that there had been a preconcert among
the leading men of the several States, arranging
provisionally
what should be done, whenever
circumstances
should throw power into hands of those
whom, at the bidding of the usurper, the people had
once driven from their councils. It is now known
that there was such concert. Nor was it confined to
the seceding States alone. In Virginia, also, there
were men who entered into the same views. But
while the President believed that no decisive step
would be taken by the more southern States
without
her co-operation, he had devoted all his power,
direct and indirect, to control and influence her
elections
.
Of tumultuary insurrection he had no fear.
The organized operation of the State Government
was what he dreaded. By this alone could the
measure
of secession be effected; and this was
effectually
prevented by operating on the elections of
members
of the Legislature. From the November vote
on the presidential election, less evil had been
apprehended
,
and less pains had been taken to control it.
In consequence of this, something more of the real
sentiments of the people had been allowed to appear
on that occasion; and, from this manifestation, the
more southern States were encouraged to hope for
the ultimate accession of Virginia to their
confederacy
.
They had therefore determined to wait for her
no longer, but to proceed to the execution of their
plan, leaving her to follow.
The disposition of the usurper, at first, was to treat
them as revolted provinces; and to take measures for
putting down, by force, their resistance to his
authority
.
But circumstances, to be mentioned hereafter,
made it impolitic to resort to this measure. But
these did not operate to prevent him from using the
most efficacious means to prevent Virginia from
following
their example. Though restrained from
attacking
them, nothing prevented him from affecting
to fear an attack
from
them. This gave a pretext
for raising troops; and the position of Virginia, as
the frontier State, afforded an excuse for stationing
them within her borders. Under these pretences,
small corps were established in many of the
disaffected
counties. Should the presence of these be
ineffectual to secure the return of delegates devoted
to the crown, an ultimate security was taken against
the action of the Legislature. Richmond, the seat of
government, became the head-quarters of the army
of observation, as it was called, and, surrounded by
this, the mock deliberations of the General Assembly
were to be held.
The money thus thrown into the country seduced
the corrupt, while terror subdued the timid. On Mr.
Trevor, who was neither, these things had a contrary
effect. He now, when it was too late, saw and
lamented
the error of his former overcaution. He now
began to suspect that they had been right who had
urged him, eighteen years before, to lend his aid in
the work of arousing the people to a sense of their
danger, and preparing them to meet it as one man.
CHAPTER V.
A sponge that soaks up the King's countenance.
Hamlet
.
Among
those who had been most prompt to take
this view of the subject, and most vehement in
recommending
it, was a younger brother of Mr. Trevor.
In all, but the great essentials of moral worth, this
gentleman was the very reverse of his brother. The
difference was, perhaps, mainly attributable to the
character of his intellect. Quick in conception, and
clear in his views, he was strong in his convictions,
and habitually satisfied with his conclusions. This,
added to a hasty temper, gave him the appearance
and character of a man rash, inconsiderate, and
precipitate
,
always in advance of the progress of public
opinion, and too impatient to wait for it. His ill
success in life seemed to justify this construction.
Though eminently gifted by nature, and possessing
all the advantages of education, he had never
occupied
any of those stations in which distinction is to
be gained. In his private affairs, he had been alike
unprosperous. Though his habits were not
expensive
,
his patrimony had been but little increased by
his own exertions. He had married a lady of
handsome
property, but had added little to it. With only
two daughters, he had not the means of endowing
them with more than a decent competency; while
his elder brother, with a family of a dozen children,
had educated the whole, had provided handsomely
for such as had set out in life, and retained the
wherewithal
to give the rest nearly as much as the children
of the younger could expect. In short, the career of
Mr. Hugh Trevor had been one of uninterrupted
prosperity
.
In all his undertakings he had been
successful
.
Wealth had flowed into his coffers, and honors
had been showered on his head. When the eye
saw him, then it blessed him. Men pointed him
out to their children, and said to them: Copy his
example, and follow in his steps.
The life of Bernard, the younger brother, had been
passed in comparative obscurity. Beloved by a few,
but misunderstood by many, his existence was
unknown
to the multitude, and unheeded by most who
were aware of it. They, indeed, who knew him
well, saw in him qualities which, under discreet
regulation
,
might have won for him distinction and
affluence. None knew him better, and none saw this
more clearly, than his elder brother. No man gave
him more credit for talent and honor, or less for
prudence
and common sense. A habit of doubting the
correctness of his opinions, and condemning his
measures, had thus taken possession of the mind of
Mr. Hugh Trevor: and, as the quick and intuitive
Bernard was commonly the first to come to a
conclusion
,
the knowledge of that created, in the other, a
predisposition to arrive at a different result. In
proportion
as the one was clear, so did the other doubt.
When the former was ardent, the latter was always
cold; and in all matters in which they had a
common
interest, the cautious foresight of Hugh never
failed to see a lion in the path which Bernard wished
to pursue. They were the opposite poles of the same
needle. The clear convictions of the latter on the
subject of secession, had shaken the faith of the
former in his own, and had finally driven him to the
conclusion already intimated, that
union, on any
terms
, was better than disunion,
under any
circumstances
.
The same habit of thinking had retarded the
change, which the events of the last three years had
been working in the mind of Mr. Hugh Trevor. His
native candor and modesty made it easy for him to
believe that he had been wrong, and, being convinced
of error, to admit it. But a corollary from this
admission
would be, that the inconsiderate and
imprudent
Bernard had, all the time, been right. Of the
correctness of such an admission Mr. Trevor felt an
habitual diffidence, that made him among the last to
avow a change of opinion which, perhaps,
commenced
in no mind sooner than in his. But the
change was now complete, and it brought to the
conscientious old gentleman a conviction that on
him, above all men, it was incumbent to spare no
means in his power to remove the mischiefs of which
he felt his own supineness to have been in part the
cause.
He was now a private man; but he had sons. To
have given a direction to their political course, might
not have been difficult. But, in the act of repenting
an acknowledged error, how could he presume so far
on his new convictions, as to endeavor to bind them
on the minds of others? Was it even right to use
any portion of his paternal influence for the purpose
of giving to the future course of his children's lives
such a tendency as might lead them into error, to
the disappointment of their hopes, and perhaps to
crime? The answer to these questions led to a
determination
to leave them to their own thoughts,
guided by such lights as circumstances might throw
upon these important subjects.
It happened unfortunately, that, about the time of
Mr. Van Buren's accession to the presidency, his
eldest son had just reached that time of life when it
is necessary to choose a profession. Without any
particular purpose of devoting him to the army, he
had been educated at West Point. The favor of
President Jackson had offered this advantage, which,
by the father of so large a family, was not to declined.
But the young man acquired a taste for military life,
and, as there was no man in Virginia whom the new
President was more desirous to bind to his service
5
than Mr. Hugh Trevor, his wishes had been
ascertained
,
and the ready advancement of his son was the
consequence. The promotion of Owen Trevor had
accordingly been hastened by all means consistent
with the rules of the service. Even these were
sometimes
violated in his favor. In one instance, he had
been elevated over the head of a senior officer of
acknowledged
merit. The impatience of this
gentleman
,
which tempted him to offer his resignation, had
been soothed by a staff appointment, accompanied by
an understanding that he should not, unnecessarily,
be placed under the immediate command of young
Trevor. The latter, at the date of which we speak,
had risen to the command of a regiment, which was
now encamped in the neighborhood of Washington,
in daily expectation of being ordered on active duty.
Colonel Owen Trevor had received his first
impressions
,
on political subjects, at a time when
circumstances
made his father anxious to establish in his
mind a conviction that union was the one thing
needful. To the maintenance of this he had taught
him to devote himself, and, overlooking his allegiance
to his native State, to consider himself as the sworn
soldier of the Federal Government. It was certainly
not the wish of Mr. Trevor to teach his son to
regard
Virginia merely as a municipal division of a
great consolidated empire. But while he taught him
to act on precepts which seemed drawn from such
premises, it was natural that the young man should
adopt them.
He did adopt them. He had learned to deride the
idea of State sovereignty; and his long residence in
the North had given him a disgust at all that is
peculiar
in the manners, habits, institutions, and
character
of Virginia. Among his boon companions
he had been accustomed to express these
sentiments
;
and, being repeated at court, they had made
him a favorite there. He had been treated by the
President with distinguished attention. He seemed
honored, too, with the personal friendship of that
favorite
son, whom he had elevated to the chief
command
of the army. Him he had consecrated to the
purple; proposing to cast on him the mantle of his
authority, so as to unite, in the person of his
chosen successor, the whole military and civil power
of the empire.
It was impossible that a young man, like Col.
Trevor
,
should fail to feel himself flattered by such notice.
He had been thought, when a boy, to be
warm-hearted
and generous, and his devotion to his patrons,
which was unbounded, was placed to the account of
gratitude by his friends. The President, on his part,
was anxiously watching for an opportunity to reward
this personal zeal, which is so strong a
recommendation
to the favor of the great. It was intimated to
Col. Trevor that nothing was wanting to ensure him
speedy promotion to the rank of brigadier, but some
act of service which might be magnified, by a
pensioned
press, into a pretext for advancing him
beyond
his equals in rank. Apprised of this, he burned
for active employment, and earnestly begged to be
marched to the theatre of war.
This theatre was Virginia. But he had long since
ceased to attribute any political personality to the
State, and it was a matter of no consequence to him
that the enemies, against whom he was to act, had
been born or resided there. Personally they were
strangers to him; and he only knew them as men
denying the supremacy of the Federal Government,
and hostile to the President and his intended
successor
.
One person, indeed, he might possibly meet in arms,
whom he would gladly avoid. His younger brother,
Douglas Trevor, had been, like himself, educated at
West Point, had entered the army, and served some
years. Having spent a winter at home, it was
suspected
that he had become infected with the
treasonable
heresies of southern politicans. He had resigned
his commission and travelled into South Carolina.
The effect of this journey on his opinions was not a
matter of doubt. Letters had been received from
him, by his brother and several young officers of his
own regiment, avowing a total change of sentiment.
These letters left no doubt, that should Virginia
declare
for secession, or even in case of collison
between
the Southern League and the old United States,
he would be found fighting against the latter. The
avowal of such sentiments and purposes had so
excited
the displeasure of the Colonel, that he had cut
short the correspondence by begging that he might
never again be reminded that he was the brother of a
traitor. His letter, to this effect, being laid before
the commander-in-chief, had given the most decisive
proof of the zeal of one brother and the defection
of the other.
How this had been brought about, Colonel Trevor
knew not. He was not aware of any alteration in
his father's sentiments; and, indeed, Douglas himself
had not been so, at the time when he was awakened
to a sense of his country's wrongs and his own duty.
The change in his mind had been wrought by other
means; for his father was, at that time, doubting,
and, with him, to doubt was to be profoundly silent.
5*
CHAPTER VI.
The boy is grown
So like your brother that he seems his own.
Crabbe
.
Difference
of political opinion had produced no
estrangement between Mr. Hugh Trevor and his
brother, though it had interrupted their intercouse by
rendering it less agreeable. Men cannot take much
pleasure in each other's society, when the subject on
which both think and feel most deeply, is one on
which they widely differ. They accordingly saw
little
of each other, though an occasional letter passed
between them in token of unabated affection.
I believe I have mentioned that the children of Mr.
Bernard Trevor were both daughters. The eldest,
then seventeen years of age, had been invited to
spend with her uncle, in the vicinity of Richmond,
the winter of Douglas's furlough. He was at that
time about five-and-twenty. His long residence in
the North had not weaned him from his native State.
He had not been flattered into a contempt of every
thing Virginian. Neither his age nor rank gave him
consequence enough to be the object of that sort of
attention. Perhaps, too, it had been seen that he was
a less fit subject for it than his elder brother. Though
much the younger, he had a range, originality, and
independence of thought, of which the other was
incapable
.
Resting in the esteem of his friends and
the approbation of his own conscience, the applause
of the multitude, the flattery of sycophants, and the
seducing attentions of superiors, had small charms for
him. His heart had never ceased to glow at the name
of Virginia, and he returned to her as the wanderer
should return to the bosom of his hometo his
friendsto his native land. In appearance, manners,
and intelligence, he was much improved; in feeling,
the same warm-hearted, generous, unsophisticated
youth, as formerly.
In the meantime, his cousin Delia had already
reached his father's house, and was domesticated in
the family. There she found the younger brothers
and sisters of Douglas impatiently expecting his
arrival
;
and so much occupied with the thought of him,
that, had she been of a jealous disposition, she
might have deemed her welcome somewhat careless.
But she already knew her cousins, her uncle, and her
aunt. This was not the first time that their house was
her temporary home; and she had learned to consider
herself as one of the family. As such, she was
expected
to enter into all their feelings. Douglas was
their common favorite. During his long absence, his
heart had never cooled toward them. In this he
differed
widely from Owen, in whom the pleasures of
an idle life and the schemes of ambition had left
little
thought of the simple joys of his childhood's
home. The contrast between him and Douglas, in
this respect, rendered the latter yet more popular with
the single-hearted beings who were impatiently
waiting his return.
Do you remember brother Douglas? said
Virginia
Trevor, (a girl one year younger than Delia.)
Mamma says you were a great pet with him, when
a child, and used to call him your Douglas.
I could not have been more than three years old
at the time you speak of, said Delia; but I have
heard of it so often, that I seem to myself to
remember
him. But, of course, I do not remember him.
And, of course, he does not remember you,
said Mrs. Trevor. At least he would not know
you. But I doubt if he ever has forgotten you, as
you were then. He was to be your husband, you
know; and your father gave him a set of rules to
walk by. He was to do so and so, and to be so and
so; and Harry Sanford was to be his model. He said
nothing about it; but Sanford and Merton was
hardly ever out of his hands, and we could see that
he was always trying to square his conduct by
your father's maxims. I believe in my heart it made
a difference in the boy; and that is the reason why
he is less like his own father, and more like yours,
than any of the rest of my boys.
I shall certainly love him, then, said Delia; her
eyes filling as she spoke, if he is like my dear old
father.
Indeed, and you may, said Mrs. Trevor; but,
for all that, I would rather have him like his own
father
.
But you must not be affronted, Delia; you
know I claim the right to brag about my old man,
and to set him up over every bodyeven the
President
himself.
I never saw the President, said Delia, but I
should be sorry to compare my father with him.
I can assure you, replied the aunt, there are
very few men that would
bear
the comparison. O!
he is the most elegant, agreeable old gentleman, that
ever I saw.
Except my uncle, said Delia, smiling.
Pshaw! Yes, to be sure. I always except
him.
I
will not except
my father
, said Delia,
gravely
.
I should not like to hear him and Martin Van
Buren praised in the same breath.
Well, my dear, said the good-humored old
lady, we must not quarrel about it. But you must
take care not to talk so before Douglas, because he is
the President's soldier.
I thought, said Delia, he was in the service
of the United States.
Well! and is not that all the same thing?
I
do
not pretend to know any thing about it, but my
husband
says so, and that is enough for me.
Mr. Trevor, who had sat by the while, listening,
with grave complacency, now said: I am afraid you
don't report me truly, my dear. Then, extending
his hand to Delia, he drew her gently to him, and
placing her on his knee, kissed her. You are a good
girl, said he, and shall love and honor your father
as much as you please. He is a noble, generous
man, and a wise man too. I would to God, added
he, sighing heavily, that I had had half his wisdom.
Why, bless my soul, Mr. Trevor! exclaimed his
wife, what does this mean?
Nothing, replied he, but a just compliment
to the self-renouncing generosity and far-sighted
sagacity
of my brother.
Saying this, he rose and left the room, while his
wife gazed after him in amazement. She had never
heard him say so much before, and now perceived that
he had thoughts that she was not apprised of.
Believing
him faultless and incapable of error, even when
he differed from himself, she at once concluded that
she had lost her cue, and determined to say no more
about politics until she recovered it. But he never
adverted to the subject again, in her presence, during
the whole winter; and her niece, consequently, heard
no farther allusion to it from her.
This was no unwelcome relief to Delia. She was
no politician; but she was not incapable of
understanding
what passed in her presence on the subject, except
when the interlocutors chose to mystify their meaning.
Her father, a man of no reserves, never spoke but with
a purpose of expressing his thoughts clearly and fully;
and no man better knew how to express them than
he. Though deficient, as I have said, in that cold
prudence which takes advantage of circumstances,
he was eminently gifted with that more vigorous
faculty
which makes them
. In the piping times of
peace, he was a man of no mark. But when society
was breaking up from its foundations, he was the
man with whom the timid and doubting would seek
safety and counsel. Infirmity had now overtaken
him, and he could do little more than think and
speak. Consulted by all the bold spirits who sought
to lift up, from the dust, the soiled and tattered
banner
of his native State, and spread it to the wind, he
never failed to converse freely with such, and often
in the presence of his daughters.
By this means, if he had not imbued them with his
opinions, or charged their minds with the arguments
by which he was accustomed to support them, he had
made them full partakers of his feelings. It
seemed
,
indeed, as if he had a purpose in this. What
that purpose was, time would show. One end,
at least, it answered. It increased their opinion of
his powers, their confidence in his wisdom, and their
love for his person. Mrs. Hugh Trevor herself did
not hold her husband's wisdom in more reverence
than was cherished by Delia for that of her father.
And never did man better deserve the confiding
affection of a daughter. He had been her principal
instructor from infancy. He had formed her mind;
he had trained her to self-command, and taught her
to find her happiness in virtue. Educated at home,
her manners were formed in a domestic circle
characterized
by refinement, and delicate, but frank
propriety
.
Her love of reading had been cultivated by
throwing books in her way; and, the taste once
formed, her attention had been directed to such as
might best qualify her for the duties of woman's only
appropriate station. Herein she had an example in
her mother; a lady of the old school, courteous and
gentle, but high-spirited, generous, and full of her
husband's enthusiasm in the cause of his country.
Mr. Bernard Trevor was, indeed, a man to be loved
passionately, if loved at all; and to shed the vivid
hue of his mind on those of his associates. It was
the delight of his wife to witness, and to cherish, the
dutiful affection and ardent admiration of her
daughters
for their father. The consequence was, that his
power over their thoughts, feelings, and inclinations
was unbounded.
It will be readily believed, that, in the mind of
Delia Trevor, thus pre-occupied, there was no room
for any very favorable predispositions toward a young
man, trained from his boyhood in the service of her
country's oppressors. She had heard his mother
speak of him as the sworn soldier of the arch-enemy
of her beloved Virginia; and a sentiment of
abhorrence
arose in her mind at the words. But she
reflected
that he was her cousin; the son of her good
uncle; the brother of her dearest friend; and, trying
to remember his fondness for her when a child, she
chided down the feeling of disgust, as unnatural and
wicked. But, after all this discipline of her own
mind, she found it impossible to think of him with
complacency, or to anticipate his arrival with
pleasure
.
Her imagination always painted him in the
hateful dress, which she had been taught to regard as
the badge of slaverythe livery of a tyrant. She
would try to love him, as a kinsman, but she never
could like him or respect him.
At length he made his appearance, and, to her great
relief, in the plain attire of a citizen. He was a
handsome youth, whose native grace had been
improved
by his military education, and in his manners
uniting the frankness of a boy with the polish and
elegance of an accomplished gentleman. Whether
he had been admonished by his father to respect the
feelings of his fair cousin, or had caught his reserve,
on the subject of politics, by contagion, she had no
means of knowing. Certain it is, that, on that
subject
,
he was uniformly silent, and Delia soon learned
to converse with him on other topics, without
dreading
an allusion to that. She thus saw him as he was,
and, by degrees, lost the prejudice which, for a time,
blinded her to any merit he might possess.
And he did possess great merit. A high sense of
6
honor, strict principles, great openness, and
generosity
,
were united in him with talents of no common
order. Quick, apprehensive, and clear in his
perceptions
,
there was a boldness, vividness, and
distinctness
in his thoughts and language, that
continually
reminded her of him she most loved and honored.
Of her father he frequently spoke with great
veneration
and affection. He remembered, as his mother
had conjectured, many of his uncle's precepts. He
frequently quoted them as of high authority with
him; and it was plain to see, that, cherished during
fourteen years, they had exercised a decided
influence
in the formation of his character. Indeed, it
might be doubted whether his imagination had ever
dismissed the idea, which had first disposed him to
lend a willing ear to the suggestions of his uncle.
That which was sport to the elder members of the
family, had seemed to him, at the time, a serious
business
.
The thought that the little girl, who loved to
hang on his neck and kiss him, might one day be his
wife, had certainly taken possession of his boyish
mind. How long he had consciously retained it
could not be known; but the traces of it were still
there, and were certainly not obliterated by the
change which time had wrought in his cousin.
Of her personal appearance I have said nothing.
Were I writing a novel, I should be bound, by all
precedent, to give an exact account of Delia's whole
exterior. Her person, her countenance, her hair, her
eyes, her complexion, should all be described, and
the whole summed up in a
tout ensemble
of surpassing
beauty. But, in this true history, I am unfortunately
bound down by facts, and I lament, that to the best
of my recollection, I shall not have occasion to speak
of a single female, in the progress of my narrative,
whose beauty can be made a theme of just praise. I
do sincerely lament this; for such is the constitution
of human nature, that female beauty influences the
heart and mind of man, even by report. We read, in
Oriental tales, of great princes deeply enamored of
descriptions. The grey eyes of Queen Elizabeth
have always made her unpopular with the youthful
reader; and the beauty of Mary of Scotland, three
hundred years after the worms have eaten her, still
continues to gild her history and gloss over her
crimes. I can say nothing so much in favor of the
beauty of Delia Trevor, as that she was good and
intelligent
,
reminding the reader of the sage adage of
Mrs. Dorothy Primrose, to wit: Handsome is, that
handsome does. I can only add, that, when I saw
her afterwards hanging on the arm of Douglas, and
looking up in his face with all the deep and
heartfelt
devotion of a woman's love, I saw enough of the
constituents of beauty to make her an object of love,
and enough of the soul of truth and tenderness to
make her seem transcendently beautiful in the eyes of
a lover.
I say this, to account for the fact that her cousin
Douglas soon found himself taking great pleasure in
her society, and anxious to please her, not more from
duty than inclination. He was, perhaps, chiefly
attracted
by her conversation, which was always
cheerful
,
sprightly, and intelligent. He may have yielded
to a spell of hardly less magic than that of beauty;
the spell of a voice melodious, distinct, articulate,
and richly flexible, varying its tones unconsciously
with every change and grade of thought or feeling.
It may have been the effect of what Byron would
call blind contact, and, the sage Mrs. Broadhurst
propinquity; or it may have been that his hour
was come. If one in ten of my married friends can
tell exactly how
he
came to fall in love with his wife,
I shall hold myself bound to inquire farther into this
matter.
But I do not mean to intimate that Lieutenant
Trevor, turning his back on the belles of Boston and
New York, and Philadelphia, and Baltimore, and
Washington, came home, and tumbled forthwith into
love with a plain country girl, just because she was
his cousin, and he had loved her when a child. I
do not mean to say he was in love with her at all.
He had a sincere affection for her; he liked her
conversation
;
he admired her talents much, and her
virtues
more. He liked very much to be with her, and
he was very much with her.
What came of this, the reader shall be told
when we have disposed of some matters of higher
concernment.
CHAPTER VII.
Nero fiddled while Rome was burning.
Douglas Trevor
reached his father's house just
after the Virginia Legislature had assembled. The
presidential election was just over, and the partisans
of Van Buren, exulting in their success, made their
leader the more hateful to his opponents by the
insolence
of their triumph. Though he had lost the vote
of Virginia, it will be remembered that he still
commanded
a majority in the Legislature, elected before
the revolution in public sentiment was complete.
The more recent expression of public sentiment
showed that the time was come when power must
be held by means far different from those by which
it had been acquired. Opinion, which at first had
been in their favor, was now against them.
Corruption
had for a time supplied the place; but the
fund of corruption was all insufficient to buy off the
important interests which were now roused to defend
themselves. To add to its efficiency by all
practicable
means, and to bring to its aid the arm of force,
was all that remained.
To organize measures for this purpose, and to
enrich
themselves from the profuse disbursement of
6*
public money, which formed a part of the plan of
operations, were the great objects which engaged the
minds of the majority in the Virginia Legislature.
But these, important as they were, could not entirely
wean them from those indulgences which, for many
years, had made Richmond, during the winter season,
the scene of so much revel and debauchery. To
these, as well as to personal intrigues and the
great interests of the faction, much time was given.
But the necessity of attending especially to the latter
was made daily more apparent by the startling
intelligence
which every mail brought from the South
and Southwest. The nearly simultaneous secession
of the States in that quarter, and the measures to be
taken for the formation of a southern confederacy,
were things which had been talked of until they
were no longer dreaded. But causes had gradually
wrought their necessary effects, and the ultimate
co-operation
of Virginia, if left to act freely, was now
sure.
I have already spoken of those men, in each of the
southern States, of cool heads, long views, and stout
hearts, who, watching the progress of events, had
clearly seen the point to which they tended. It is
not here that their names and deeds are to be
registered
.
They are already recorded in history, and
blazoned on the tomb of that hateful tyranny which
they overthrew. They had been discarded from the
service of the people, so long as the popularity of the
President had blinded the multitude to his
usurpations
.
The oppressions of the northern faction, and
the fierce assaults of rapacity and fanaticism, hounded
on by ambition to the destruction of the South, had
restored them to public favor. They had seen that
secession must come, and that, come when it might,
their influence would be proportioned to their past
disgraces. Presuming on this, they had consulted
much together. Not only had they sketched
provisionally
the plan of a southern confederacy, but
they had taken measures to regulate their relations
with foreign powers. One of their number, travelling
abroad, had been instructed to prepare the way for
the negotiation of a commercial treaty with Great
Britain. One of the first acts of the new
confederacy
was to invest him publicly with the diplomatic
character, and it was at once understood that
commercial
arrangements would be made, the value of
which would secure to the infant League all the
advantages
of an alliance with that powerful nation.
The designation of a gentleman, as minister, who
had so long, without any ostensible motive, resided
near the Court of St. James, left no doubt that all
things had been already arranged. The treaty soon
after promulgated, therefore, surprised nobody, except
indeed that some of its details were too obviously
beneficial to both parties to have been expected.
Not only in war, but in peace, do nations seem to
think it less important to do good to themselves than
to do harm to each other. The system of free trade
now established, which has restored to the South the
full benefit of its natural advantages, and made it
once more the most flourishing and prosperous
country
on earth; which has multiplied the manufactories
of Great Britain, and increased her revenue by an
increase of consumption and resources, even while
some branches of revenue were cut off; and which,
at the same time, has broken the power of her envious
rival in the North, and put an end for ever to that
artificial prosperity engendered by the oppression and
plunder of the southern States; is such an anomaly
in modern diplomacy, that the rulers at Richmond, or
even at Washington, might well have been surprised
at it. But the bare nomination of the plenipotentiary
was enough to leave no doubt that a treaty was
ready
for promulgation, and that its terms must be such
as to secure the co-operation of Great Britain.
But, while the leaders of the ruling faction thought
of these things, and anxiously consulted for the
preservation
of their power, there was still found among
the members of the Legislature the ordinary
proportion
of men who think of nothing but the enjoyment
of the present moment. Such men are often like
sailors in a storm, who, becoming desperate, break
into the spirit room, and drink the more eagerly
because
they drink for the last time. When the devil's
time is short, he has great wrath; and this point
in his character he always displays, whether he
exhibits
himself in the form of cruelty, rapacity, or
debauchery
.
The amusements, therefore, of the legislators
assembled
at Richmond suffered little interruption, and the
dinner and the galas, the ball and the theatre, and
the gaming-table, with revel, dissipation, and
extravagance
,
consumed the time of the servants of the
country, and swallowed up the wasted plunder of the
treasury.
Respected by all, beloved by individuals of both
parties, and courted by that to which he was
supposed
to belong, Mr. Hugh Trevor was an object of
the most flattering attention. His house was the
favorite resort of such as enjoyed the envied privilege
of the
entre
. His gallant and accomplished son was
the glass before which aspirants for court favor
dressed themselves. The budding youth of his
daughter
had, for years, been watched with impatient
anticipation
of the time when her hand might be seized as
the passport to present wealth and future honor.
Her cousin Delia was not recommended to
notice
by
all
these considerations; but the most
prevailing
of the whole was one that made her claims to
attention fully equal to those of Virginia. Her
father
,
though in comparatively humble circumstances,
could give with his daughter a handsomer dowry
than the elder and wealthier brother could afford with
his. He was notorious for generosity, and his
infirmities
made it probable that he was not long for this
world. Delia was therefore universally regarded as
an heiress. Add to this, that in the affection of her
uncle she seemed hardly to be postponed to his own
daughter, and it was obvious to anticipate that the
same influence which had procured office and
emolument
for himself and his sons, would be readily
exerted
in favor of her future husband.
It followed, that, whatever were the amusements of
the day, whether ball or theatre, or party of pleasure
by land or by water, the presence of Delia and
Virginia
was eagerly sought. The latter, simple and
artless, saw in all who approached her the friends
of her father. If she thought at all of political
differences
,
it was only to recognize in most of them the
adherents of the man to whose fortunes he had so long
attached himself, and
in
whose fortunes he had
flourished
.
To all, her welcome was alike cordial and
her smile always bright.
With Delia, the case was far different. Much
more conversant than her cousin with the politics of
the day, she was aware that her father was obnoxious
to many that she met. On some of those who sought
her favor, she knew that he looked with detestation
and scorn. To such she was as cold and repulsive
as a real lady can ever permit herself to be to one
who approaches her as a gentleman in genteel society.
The height of the modern mode would, indeed, have
countenanced in such cases that sort of negative
insolence
,
the practice of which is regarded as the most
decisive indication of high breeding. But she had
been trained in a different school. She had been
taught that,
in society
, self-respect is the first duty
of woman; and that the only inviolable safe-guard
for that, is a care never to offend the self-respect of
others.
Thus, while a part of those who approached her,
were made to feel that their attentions were not
acceptable
,
she never afforded them occasion to
complain
of any want of courtesy on her part. Without
being rebuffed, they felt themselves constrained to
stand aloof. There was nothing of which they could
complain; no pretext for resentmentno opening for
sarcasmno material for scandal.
But in proportion to the impotence of malice, so is
the malignity of its hoarded venom. All were aware
of the political opinions and connexions of Mr.
Bernard
Trevor; and it was easy to make remarks in
the presence of his daughter, not only offensive, but
painful to her feelings. To this purpose, no allusion
to him was necessary. It was enough to speak
injuriously
of those whom she knew to be his friends,
and whose public characters made them legitimate
subjects of applause or censure. By this, and other
means of the like character, she was always open to
annoyance; and to such means the dastard insolence
of those whom her coldness had repelled, habitually
resorted for revenge. On such occasions she
frequently
found that her cousin Douglas came to her
aid. Unrestrained by the considerations that imposed
silence on her, he was always ready to speak on
behalf
of the party attacked. If he could not
directly
vindicate, he would palliate or excuse. If even
this were inconsistent with his own opinions, he
would take occasion to speak approvingly of the
talents or private worth of those who were assailed.
Whether she regarded this as a proof of good
breeding
,
or of kindness to herself, or of an incipient change
in his opinions, such conduct always commanded her
gratitude and approbation.
CHAPTER VIII.
He was, in logic, a great critic,
Profoundly skilled in analytic.
He could distinguish and divide
A hair, 'twixt south and southwest side.
Hudibras
.
Among
those who had thus manifested a
disposition
to win the favor of Delia Trevor, was a young
man who had, not long since, entered public life
under
the auspices of a father, who, fifteen years before,
had openly bartered his principles for office. Besides
some talent, the son possessed the yet higher merit,
in the eyes of his superiors, of devotion to his party
and its leader. He never permitted himself to be
restrained
,
by any regard to time or place, from making
his zeal conspicuous. Taught, from his infancy, that
the true way to recommend his pretensiens was to
rate them highly himself, he seemed determined never
to exchange his place in the Legislature for any in the
gift of the Court, unless some distinguished station
should be offered to his acceptance. For any such, in
any department, he was understood to be a candidate.
At first, he supposed that a private intimation to
this effect, through his father, would be all sufficient.
But he was overlooked, and post after post, that he
7
would gladly have accepted, was conferred on others.
Fearful that he might be deemed deficient in zeal, he
redoubled his diligence, and with increased eagerness
sought every opportunity to display his talents and
his ardor in the service of his master. Still he
seemed
no nearer to his object. Whether it was thought
that he was most serviceable in his actual station, or
that the wily President deemed it a needless waste
of patronage to buy what was his by hereditary title
and gratuitous devotion, it is hard to say. The
gentleman sometimes seemed on the point of
becoming
malcontent; but his father, who had
trained
him in the school of Sir Pertinax McSycophant,
convinced him that more was to be got by booing,
and resolute subserviency and flattery of the great,
than in any other way. Under such impressions, he
would kindle anew the fervor of his zeal and send
up his incense in clouds. Again disappointed, and
sickening into the moroseness of hope deferred, he
would become moody and reserved, as if watching
for an opportunity of profitable defection.
Such an opportunity, at such a moment, had
seemed
to present itself in his acquaintance with Delin
Trevor. A connection with her seemed exactly suited
to his interested and ambidextrous policy. A
handsome
and amiable girl were items in the account of
secondary consideration. But her fortune was not to
be overlooked. Then, should his services, at length,
seem like to meet their long deserved reward, she
could be presented at court as the niece of Mr. Hugh
Trevor, the tried and cherished friend of the President.
Should the cold ingratitude of his superiors at length
drive him into the opposition for advancement, he
was sure of being well received as the son-in-law of
a patriot so devoted as Mr. Bernard Trevor.
Utrinque
paratus
, could he secure the hand of Delia, he felt
sure that he must win, let the cards fall as they
might.
Having taken this view of the subject, and
examined
it in all its bearings, he made up to Delia
with a directness which startled, and a confidence that
offended her. But the gentleman had little to
recommend
him to the favor of the fair. His person was
awkward, and disfigured by a mortal stoop. His
features
,
at once diminutive and irregular, were either
shrouded with an expression of solemn importance,
or set off by a smile of yet more offensive
self-complacency
.
His manners bore the same general
character
of conceit, alternately pert and grave; and his
conversation wavered between resolute, though
abortive
,
attempts at wit, and a sort of chopt logic,
elaborately employed in proving, by incontestible
arguments
,
what nobody ever pretended to deny. He
had been taught, by his learned and astute father, to
lay his foundations so deep that his arguments and
the patience of his hearers were apt to be exhausted
by the time he got back to the surface of things.
Yet he reasoned with great precision, and rarely
failed to establish, as unquestionable, the
premises
from which other men commonly
begin
to reason.
This talent, and this use of it, are more applauded
by the world than one would think. Men like to be
confirmed in their opinions; and, the fewer and more
simple these may be, the more grateful are they for
any thing that looks like a demonstration of their
truth. To a man whose knowledge of arithmetic
only extends to the profound maxim that two and
two make four, how gratifying to find a
distinguished
man condescending to prove it by elaborate
argument!
But ladies have little taste for these things, and
still less for the harsh dogmatism and fierce
denunciations
of hostile, but absent politicians, with which
Mr. P. Baker, the younger, occasionally varied his
discourse. To Delia, therefore, the gentleman, in
and of himself, and apart from all extrinsic
considerations
,
was absolutely disagreeable. His first
advances
drove her within the safe defences of female
pride and reserve. But when the manifest audacity
of his pretensions led her to think of him as the
supple
slave of power, as one who had prostituted
himself
to the service of his master, with an eagerness
which condemned his zeal to be its own reward, her
disgust increased to loathing, and her pride was
kindled into resentment. Without showing more of
these feelings than became her, she showed enough
to make her the object of his insolent and malignant
hatred. But she was fortified by her position in a
family which he dared not offend, and his paltry
malice found vent in such allusions to the politics of
the day as he knew must wound her.
Things were about coming to this pass, when
Douglas Trevor arrived. The first time he met Mr.
Baker in company with his cousin, he saw a
disposition
on his part to pay attentions which were
obviously
annoying to her. Both duty and inclination
impelled him to come to her relief; and, in doing
this, he awakened the jealousy and incurred the
displeasure
of the gentleman. But these were feelings
he had no mind to display toward one who wore a
sword, and especially toward the son of a man so
influential
at Washington as Mr. Hugh Trevor. He
accordingly drew off, in morose discomfiture, and
Delia, relieved from his offensive attentions, felt that
she owed her deliverance to her cousin. He was, of
course, bound to occupy the place at her side from
which he had driven Baker; and she was bound to
requite the service by making the duty he had
imposed
on himself as little irksome as possible. She
exerted herself to be agreeable, and succeeded so
well, that Douglas went to bed that night in the
firm belief that he had never passed a more pleasant
evening, or seen a girl of more charming manners
than Delia.
This circumstance led to a sort of tacit
convention
,
which established him in the character of her
7*
special attendant, in all parties where Mr. Baker
made his appearance. By an easy progress, this
engagement was extended to all societies and all
places. He knows little of human nature who needs
to be told the natural consequences of these things.
But, leaving the reader to form his own judgment,
and to anticipate such result as he may, my present
business is with the repulsed and irritated Baker.
Though it consoled his pride and self-love to impute
his discomfitures, not to any absolute dislike of
himself
,
but to a preference for another, there was nothing
in that preference to soothe his resentment. As
Douglas had, in the first instance, come somewhat
cavalierly between him and the object of his wishes,
he, perhaps, had reasonable grounds of displeasure
against him. But, as it might be quite inconvenient
to give vent to his feelings in that direction, they were
carefully repressed. In such assaults on those of the
lady, as her cousin might not observe, or might
think it unwise to notice, did his malice indulge
itself.
So matters stood when the astounding intelligence
reached Richmond, that a diplomatic agent from the
State of South Carolina had been long secretly
entertained
at the Court of St. James, and that he was
supposed to have negotiated an informal
arrangement
for a commercial treaty between that
government
and the confederacy then forming in the South.
Something was rumored as to the terms of the
contemplated treaty, which filled the whole northern
faction in Virginia with consternation. It was feared
that that State could not be withheld from joining
the Southern League, except by force, and that, in a
contest of force, she would be backed, not only by
the southern States, but by the power of Great
Britain.
CHAPTER IX.
If I had known he had been so cunning of fence, I'd have
seen him damned ere I had fought with him.
Old Play
.
It
was now the month of February; and a
pleasant
day had tempted our young people to a jaunt
of amusement to the head of the falls. Mr. Baker,
stealing away from his duties as a legislator, was one
of the party. Repulsed by Delia, he was beginning
an attempt on the heart of Virginia, of whose loyalty,
as the daughter of Mr. Hugh Trevor, he could
entertain
no doubt.
Here his reception would have been little better
than with the other, had not Virginia been held in
check by a respect for the supposed opinions of her
father. Born at the very moment when the good
old gentleman was in the act of making up his mind
to sacrifice the sovereignty of his native State to the
necessity of preserving the Union, he seemed to seize
on the opportunity of compensating the impiety to
which he felt himself driven, by giving to his infant
daughter the name he had so long cherished and
honored
.
It was a moment of one of those relentings
of the heart, in which nature asserts her supremacy,
and compels its homage to those whom we have
been accustomed to reverence and obey. If even the
prodigal or the traitor be subject to be so affected,
how much stronger must be such an impulse in the
mind of a pure and upright man, impelled by a sense
of duty to his country to dishonor her venerated
name. This poor tribute was as the kiss of peace
with which the executioner implores the pardon of
some illustrious victim of State policy, who is about
to bleed under his hand. Had he yielded to his
feelings
,
he would have taken up the self-accusing
lamentation
of the returning prodigal. But his sense
of duty was deep and abiding, and was always most
sure to command his exact obedience when the duty
was most painful. He could not doubt the correctness
of a conviction, which even his cherished devotion
to his native State could not make him shake off
entirely. In such a case, to doubt was, with him, to
be convinced.
But the name thus bestowed upon his daughter was
not without an effect on her mind. She knew little
of politics, but, from her very infancy, self-love had
made her jealous of the honor of the State whose
name she bore. The name itself was a spell of
power on the heart of Delia. It had disposed her
to love her cousin before she knew her. It had
drawn them together on their first acquaintance, and
had often been the theme of conversation between
them. Somewhat older, and much the superior in
intellectual power, Delia had, unwittingly, exercised
an influence over the mind of Virginia which inclined
her to listen favorably to all that could be urged
against the usurper's claim to a dominion, unchecked
by the authority of the State.
For more than a year past, Mr. Trevor had
himself
begun to doubt the wisdom of his former
opinions
.
Doubting, he was silent, but he had not been
unwilling to subject his daughter to the action of her
cousin's more vigorous mind. For many years, he
would as soon have exposed his children to the
contagion
of the plague, as permit them to visit their
uncle. During the last summer he had suffered
Arthur
and Virginia to spend a month with him; and he
was not sorry to observe that the former came home
with deeper thoughts than he chose to express. Of
their love and admiration of their uncle neither made
any secret. He was not only unlike their father, but
so unlike any other man, that he had been a curious
study to them during their whole visit. The
originality
of his thoughts, and the vividness with which
he expressed them, afforded them constant
amusement
.
He had that faculty of making truth look
like truth, in the exhibition of which the young mind
so much delights. Then he was so frank, so ardent,
and withal so kind, that it was impossible to know
and not to love him.
After all this, the reader will not be like to partake
of the surprise of Mr. Philip Baker, when he found,
on shifting his battery, that he was not much more
in favor with Virginia Trevor than with her cousin.
The consequence was, that whenever he attempted,
in company, to attach himself to the immediate party
of these young ladies, he was apt to find himself a
supernumerary. But, as Virginia had shown no
marked dislike to him, his vanity easily adopted the
idea that she considered him as the property of
Delia. He took some pains to undeceive her, and
would have been mortified at her unconcern on the
occasion, had he not thought some allowance should
be made for her indifference to a man who did but
take her as a
pis aller
. He did not, therefore, at once
withdraw himself from their
coterie
, but continued to
hang about, and take his part in conversation,
whenever
nothing particularly exclusive in the manner of
the interlocutors forbade it. He could not come
between whispers; but he could answer any
observation
that met his ear. Being, as I have said,
something between a proser and a declaimer, he
thought himself eloquent, and would seize occasions
to hold forth to the general edification, in a style
intended
to dazzle the bystanders.
On the day of which we speak, he had been in
close attendance on Virginia, until, rather by address
than by direct repulse, she had contrived to shake
him off. It so happened, that the rest of the
company
were all paired off, leaving him in the enviable
condition of a half pair of shears, when relief
appeared in the person of a gentleman just from
Richmond.
This gentleman, originally one of the devisers of
the
pic nic
, had staid behind for the mail, and now
arrived with the news alluded to in the last chapter.
Baker, being disengaged at the moment, was the first
to receive the intelligence, and he lost no time in
awakening the attention of the company by volleys of
oaths and imprecations. While he continued to
exercise
himself in calling down the vengeance of the
Eternal, according to the most approved formula of
the old court, on those whom he denounced as traitors,
the rest listened in amazement, disgust, or alarm, to
this boisterous effusion of his rage. At length, as
he stopped to take breath, Douglas availed himself
of the pause to ask what was the matter. The
whole story now came out, and Mr. Baker, having
put his audience in possession of his text, went on
with his discourse. Unmindful of the presence of
the ladies, he vented his wrath in language with
which I do not choose to stain my paper. Every
man who had held a conspicuous place among the
advocates of State rights for the last twenty years,
was condemned,
ex cathedra
. The dead were
especially
recommended to the tender mercies of the
devil, in whose clutches he supposed them to be;
while the living were indiscriminately devoted to the
same doom.
Against the person by whom the treaty was said
to have been negotiated, his wrath burned most
fiercely. In the midst of one of his most savage
denunciations of that gentleman, he happened to
recollect
having heard Delia speak of him as the
intimate
friend of her father. The thought turned his
eye upon her. She was already pale and trembling
with emotion, when she caught his insulting glance.
In an instant the blood gushed to her face, and tears
to her eyes. He saw it, and went on to comprehend in
his denunciation all the aiders, abettors, and
friends
of the
traitor
, whom in one breath he devoted to the
gallows.
This was more than Delia could bear, and more
than Douglas was disposed to suffer. He had caught
the glance which Baker had cast at his cousin; he
saw the effect on her feelings; he witnessed her
increasing
emotion, and felt it his duty to come to her
relief. He approached Baker, and passing him, as
if with no particular design, touched him gently, and
said in a low voice: Such language is improper in
this company.
How so, exclaimed Baker, aloud. I hope
there is no man here disposed to take the part of a
traitor.
Douglas turned, and, biting his lip, said in a tone
not loud, but from its distinctness and marked
emphasis
,
audible to all present: I spoke so as to be
heard by none but you, and invited you by a sign to
go apart where I might explain my meaning in
8
private. But, as you will have the explanation here,
I say, that
you know there is no man
here disposed
to take the part of a traitor. If you had thought
there was, sir, I suspect your denunciations would
have been less violent.
I don't understand you, sir, said Baker,
reddening
.
My meaning is as plain as becomes this
presence
,
said Douglas, coldly, and again walking
away. Baker looked around, and read in every eye
that he was expected to follow. He did so, and,
joining Douglas, they both walked on together.
I shall be glad to receive a farther explanation,
sir, said he in an agitated tone.
Speak lower, then, replied Douglas, calmly,
slipping his arm within that of Baker; and use no
gesture. My meaning is this: That he who is
regardless of the presence and feelings of a lady, is
not apt to overlook those of a man. To make my
meaning yet plainer, sir, your language would have
been more guarded, had my uncle been represented
here, not by a
daughter
, but by a
son
.
The quiet tone of Douglas's voice, the equivocal
meaning of the first words he had uttered, and the
pacific action intended to deceive those who looked on,
had calmed for a moment the alarm of Baker. He
had recovered himself before he was made to
perceive
what was really meant; and ere he had time to
reflect on his situation, the dangerous temptation of
a repartee assailed him. Glancing back at the
company
,
he said: If I may judge by appearances,
sir, you have the right as well as the inclination to
assume that character.
Douglas had turned his head, instinctively, as
Baker looked back, and saw that they had rounded a
point of rock, and were out of sight. In an instant,
he disengaged his arm with a push that nearly
threw the legislator down the bank, and stepping
back, glared upon him with an eye that instantly
brought the other to his senses. While he stood
blenching and cowering under this fierce glance,
Douglas recovered his self-command, and said, with
stern calmness: You had nearly made me forget
myself, sir. But we understand each other now.
Take a turn along the shore to compose yourself. I
will wait here for you, and we will return to the
company
together.
He seated himself on a rock, and the other obeyed
mechanically. How he succeeded in recovering his
composure is another affair. He walked on, and on,
and fain would he have followed the course of the
river to the mountain cave from which it issues, there
to hide himself from the consequences of his own
folly and impertinence. What would he not have
given to recall that last speech? Until then, he was
the party aggrieved. Douglas's offence against him
had not been so gross as to admit of no explanation;
and, to all appearance, an amicable one had been
given. The truth might not have come out until he
had had time to escape to his constituents; and before
the next session the affair might have been forgotten.
But now, Douglas had been insulted, and how he felt,
and how he would resent the insult, was awfully
certain.
Baker continued his walk so far, that the girls
became uneasy at the absence of the two young
men. They begged some of the gentlemen to go in
quest of them, but the request was evaded. At last,
they rose from their seats on the rocks, and declared
they would themselves go. They accordingly set
out, followed by the rest, and in a few yards came to
where Douglas was quietly seated on a flat stone,
and playing checks with pebbles on the smooth
sand.
Where is Mr. Baker? exclaimed Virginia,
eagerly.
Yonder he goes, replied Douglas, calmly. He
has a mind for a longer walk than I like; and I am
just waiting for him here. But I must not detain
you, girls. His taste for the picturesque will
probably
be satisfied by the time we get to our horses,
and he will soon overtake us.
He said this with an air so careless as to deceive
every person present but Delia. But the heart will
speak from the eye, and a glance at her, as she
searched his countenance, unconsciously said: I
have redressed you. Coloring deeply, she strove
to hide her emotion,taking his arm and busying
herself at the same time with the adjustment of her
veil. In spite of some undefined apprehensions, she
was grateful, relieved, and pleased; and a slight
pressure on the arm she held, spoke her feelings
perhaps as distinctly as they were understood by
herself.
Douglas returned the pressure with more energy.
The words of Baker yet tingled in his ears; and
while they burned with the insult, the pain was more
than soothed by the thoughts they had awakened.
Were then the day-dreams of his boyhood to become
realities? He was not, as yet, conscious of any but
a cousin's love for Delia. He could impute no other
feeling to her. But
should
this mutual affection
ripen into a more tender sentiment! With whom
could a man pass his days more happily, than with a
woman so intelligent, so amiable, so prudent, so
much a lady? He did not love her. But he felt
that to love her, and be beloved by her, would be a
happy lot. The slight weight she rested on his arm
was sweet to him. He wished the pressure was
heavier. But she walked on, self-poised, and with
a light and steady step over the rugged ground.
Was not that step more confident, because she felt
that he was there to aid her in case of need? Even
so, she seemed sufficient for herself in the resources
of her own mind. Yet had she needed and accepted,
and gratefully, though silently, acknowledged his
8*
protection. He was happy in having had occasion
to protect her. Was not she the happier for it
too? The heart will ask questions. Time gives the
answer.
CHAPTER X.
Oh! speak it not!
Let silence be the tribute of your homage!
The mute respect, that gives not woman's name
To the rude breath, which, trumpeting her praises,
Taints by applauding.
Anonymous
.
A few
days after, Douglas handed his cousin the
following paper:
Mr. Baker begs leave to throw himself on the
mercy of Miss Delia Trevor. He confesses his
offence against her on Saturday last. He admits,
with shame, that he did intend to wound her
feelings
,
and that he has nothing to offer in extenuation
of his offence. He does not even presume to ask a
pardon, which he acknowledges to be unmerited,
and respectfully tenders the only atonement in his
power, by assuring Miss Trevor that he will never
again, intentionally, offend her by his presence.
Signed,
Philip Baker
.
Delia read this curious document in silence, and,
on looking up, found that Douglas had left the room.
She ran after him, but he was gone, and for a day or
two avoided any opportunity for farther explanation.
At length she found one, and asked by what means
the paper had been procured.
By
proper
means, my dear coz, said he, if
the paper is a proper one.
Proper! exclaimed she, for me to receive,
certainly. But for him to give! Indeed, I pity any
poor wretch who can be so abject. I am glad, at
least, I am to see him no more. I should find it
hard to behave to him as becomes myself!
It would be hard, said Douglas, but as you
always will behave as becomes yourself, hard though
it be, it was right you should be spared the trial.
This
is
your doing then? said she.
No questions, coz, replied Douglas. I must
behave as becomes me too.
This put an effectual stop to farther inquiry, and
the slight concealment did but deepen Delia's sense
of the service Douglas had rendered her. While she
admired the delicacy which, at once, veiled and
adorned his chivalrous character; he, on his part
felt greater pleasure at having redressed her wrong,
because the affair had taken such a turn as to conceal
the part that he had acted. The ties thus formed in
secret, are doubly sacred and doubly sweet. The
heart involuntarily classes them with those chaste
mysteries which the vulgar eye must not profane.
They become the theme of thoughts which
sometimes
rise up, and kindle the check, and light the
eye, and then sink down again and hide themselves
deep in the silent breast.
But this privacy was destined to be invaded by
one person, at least; and that, the very one from
whom Douglas would most anxiously have concealed
the whole affair. Yet was there no person to whose
tenderness, delicacy, and affection for both parties, it
could have been more fitly confided. In short, Mr.
Trevor, one day, placed in the hands of his son a
letter
,
in the President's own hand-writing, of which the
following is a copy:
Washington
,
March 3d, 1849.
My dear sir
: I hasten to lay before you a piece
of information which touches you nearly. Though I
receive it at the hands of one who has the highest
claims to my confidence, I yet trust it will prove to
have originated in mistake.
It is said that your son, Lieutenant Trevor, on
receiving the news of the late treasonable
proceedings
of some of the southern States, openly
vindicated
them; and that he spoke freely in defence of
the principal agent in their most wicked attempt to
league themselves with the enemies of their country.
It is said, moreover, that, in doing this, he insulted
and fastened a quarrel on one, whom I have great
reason to esteem for his uniform devotion to the
Union. The regular course for such a charge against
an officer, holding a commission in the army of the
United States, is one which I would not willingly
pursue, in the case of the son of one of my earliest
and most cherished friends. As Lieutenant Trevor
is now at home, on furlough, I address this letter to
you, to be laid before him. I have no doubt he will
readily give the necessary explanations, and, in so
doing, afford me a new occasion for displaying that
regard for you and yours, with which I am,
Dear sir, your friend,
Martin Van Buren
.
Can you tell me what this means? said the
mild old gentleman to his son.
As I remember, replied Douglas, the
circumstances
under which I heard of the events alluded to,
I think, I can give a guess at the meaning. It
means that my cousin was insulted, in my presence,
and that I protected her, as was my duty.
And how does it happen that I never heard of
it? Who was the person, and what has become of
the affair?
It has all blown over, said Douglas, and I
had hardly expected it would ever be spoken of
again. Delia alone knew of it from me, as it was
right she should. I have never mentioned, nor has
my friend. I am sure she has not; and what the
other party can promise himself from the exposure, I
am sure I cannot tell.
The thing is now made public, at all events;
and both as your father and as the friend of the
President
,
it is right that I should know all about it.
Certainly, sir, replied Douglas, you shall
know all; and when you do, I need not explain why
I have never told you before.
He left the room, and soon returned with a bundle
of papers. From this he handed one to his father,
which proved to be a challenge, in the most approved
form, from him, the said Douglas Trevor, to Philip
Baker, Esq. Then came a proposition to discuss
from the other party; then a flat demand of apology,
or the alternative of, what is called, gentlemanly
satisfaction; then an offer to apologize; then the
paper we have already seen; and then the following:
Philip Baker declares, on his honor, that he
meant no offence to Lieutenant Trevor by any words
addressed to him on Saturday last; and that he
deeply regrets having spoken any which may have
sounded offensively in the ears of Lieutenant
Trevor
.
This will do, said Mr. Trevor. It only
shows that you have acted as became a soldier and
a gentleman. These papers show clearly that the
quarrel began in an insult to your cousin, which you
were bound to resent. This will be perfectly
satisfactory
to the President.
Doubtless it
would
be, said Douglas, promptly;
but so much of the affair as implicates my cousin's
name must go no farther.
But it is that, replied Mr. Trevor, which
shows the cause of the quarrel. The other papers
only show that you fancied an intention to insult
where none existed. This would tally too well with
what the President has heard.
Be it so, answered Douglas, calmly. If the
President is never satisfied till I furnish a paper
which is to blend my cousin's name with a
public
discussion, he must remain dissatisfied. I
cannot
help it. Better to have suffered the insult to
pass unnoticed, than to make a lady's name the
theme of guard-house wit.
Bless you, my noble boy, said the admiring
father. You are right, and there is no help for it.
But what shall I say to the President?
What you please. The
conclusions
you draw
from what you know, he is welcome to. The
facts
are with you.
Certainly, said Mr. Trevor, after a musing
pause; certainly he will trust in my general
assurance
that his information is,
to my certain knowledge
,
erroneous. This
will
do. It
must
be sufficient.
It
must
do, said Douglas, whether it will or
no. In the mean time, my dear sir, let me beg that
the affair may go no farther, even in the family.
Delia alone knows of it, and she only knows as
much as may be gathered from that paper, a
duplicate
of which is her's by right. I therefore beg
that you will say nothing about it, even to her.
And he did say nothing to her; but Douglas
observed
,
that that night, when she held up her lip for
his paternal kiss, the kind old gentleman gave it
with more than his usual tenderness. He held her
off, parted the hair from her forehead, gazed
earnestly
and affectionately upon her; and then, kissing
her again, bad God bless her, in a voice choked
with emotion. From that moment, she was to him
as a daughter.
9
CHAPTER XI.
That proud humilitythat dignified obedience.
Burke
.
The
visit of Delia to her uncle now drew to a close,
and she prepared for her return home. It was
settled
that she should be accompanied by Douglas,
Arthur, and Virginia, who were to spend a few
weeks with her father.
On the road, Douglas felt more and more the duty
and the privilege of being the protector of his cousin,
and, by the time they reached the end of their
journey
,
he had discovered that the latter was as precious
as the former was sacred. Some such thought had
stolen into his mind while he was yet at home, but
that was not the place to mention the subject to her;
and he had determined to impose upon himself the
most scrupulous restraint, until he should have
restored
her honorably to her father's arms.
Two days travel brought them to the residence of
Mr. Bernard Trevor, on the banks of the Roanoke.
They found him laid up with a fit of the gout, which,
while it confined him to the house, produced its
usual salutary effect on his general health. At the
sight of his daughter and her companions, his pain
was, for the moment, forgotten; and, flinging away
his flannels and crutches, he sprung to his feet and
caught her in his arms. At the same time, Arthur
and Virginia pressed forward for their welcome,
which they, in their turn, received.
Unfortunately, Mr. Trevor was not the only one
who forgot himself at the sight of Delia. Poor old
Carlo, starting from his slumbers on the
hearthrug
,
had recognized his young mistress, and was
manifesting his joy at her return with boisterous
fondness, when one of his feet saluted the inflamed
toe of his master. In an agony, which none but
they who have felt it can conceive, the old
gentleman
sunk into his chair. Here he remained for
some minutes, unconscious of every thing but his
sufferings, while the soft hand of his daughter
replaced
and soothed the tortured limb.
At length, recovering enough to look around, his
eye fell on Douglas, who stood aloof, waiting to be
introduced. Some little tag of military foppery,
which always clings to the undress of an officer,
satisfied Mr. Trevor who he was. Stretching out
his hand, he said: Ah! Douglas, my dear boy!
How glad I am to see you! But I ought not to
have recognized you, you dog! standing back there
with your hat under your arm, as if waiting your
turn of presentation at a levee. Perhaps you don't
remember me. I certainly should not have known
you, but for the circumstances under which I see
you. But what of that? Was it not yesterday you
were sitting on my knee, and hanging about my
neck? Yes, it was yesterday; though we have both
dreamed a great deal since. But dreams must give
way to realities; so let us vote it yesterday, and meet
to-day as we parted last night.
This singular
accoste
had the desired effect, and
Douglas felt, at once, as if he had been with his
uncle all his life.
You forget, my dear sir, said he, that I was
intercepted by one whose privilege, I am sure, you
would not have me dispute, though he has abused
it so cruelly.
You mean the dog? said Mr. Trevor. Poor
old Carlo! Come to your master, my poor fellow!
No; your privilege shall never be invaded. We
are both past service now, and must learn to
sympathize
with each other. If you cannot understand
the nature of a gouty toe, I hope I shall always have
heart enough to understand yours. Give me a rough
coat, or a black skin, for a true friend; one that will
not grudge any superior advantages that I may
possess
.
Tom, added he, in a tone of marked
gentleness
,
the fire is low. No, not yourself, old man,
he continued, as the negro whom he addressed
moved toward the door; not you, my good old
friend. Just ring the bell, and let one of those lazy
dogs in the kitchen bring in some wood. But why
don't you speak to your master Douglas? I am sure
you remember what cronies you were, when you
were teaching him to ride.
I'm mighty proud to see you, sir, said the old
man, taking the offered hand of Douglas, with an air
of affectionate humility. But it was not my place,
sir, added he, answering his master's words, to
speak first. I made sure master Douglas would
remember
me after a while.
[1]
[1]
I crave the forbearance of all critics, who have taken their
ideas of a Virginia house-servant from Csar Thompson, or any
such caricatures, for giving Tom's own words, and his own
pronunciation
of them. It is not my fault if there is but little
peculiarity in his phraseology. His language was never
elegant
,
and frequently ungrammatical. But he spoke better
than the peasantry of most countries, though he said some things
that a white man would not say; perhaps, because he had some
feelings to which the white man is a stranger. A white man,
for example, would have said he was
glad
to see Douglas,
whether he were so or not. Old Tom said he was
proud
to see
him, because he
was
proud to recognize his former pet in the
handsome and graceful youth before him.
I do remember you, Tom, said Douglas,
cordially
,
and many a time, on parade, have I been
thankful to you for teaching me to hold my reins
and manage my horse.
You will find it hard, said Mr. Trevor, gravely,
to convince Tom that you remember him, if you
call him by that name. Tom is Delia's daddy, and
Lucia's, and Arthur's, and Virginia's daddy, and so
will be to the day of his death. If ever he ceases
9*
to be your daddy, too, Douglas, I shall move to
reconsider the vote that we just now passed
unanimously
.
It is a vice the northern air has blown upon
me, said Douglas, blushing. I felt the truth of
what you said just now, and am not more sure of
being affectionately remembered by any that I used
to know, than by my good old daddy.
Mr. Trevor now requested Tom to see that the
horses of the travellers were properly attended to;
and the negro left the room.
What a graceful and gentlemanly old man!
said Douglas, looking after him.
His manners, said Mr. Trevor, are exactly
suited to his situation. Their characteristic is proud
humility. The opposite is servile sulkiness, of
which, I suspect, Douglas, you have seen no little.
I have seen nothing else, said Douglas,
among the servants in the North. If the tempers
of our negroes were as ferocious, and their feelings
as hostile, we should have to cut their throats in
self-defence
in six months.
I am glad, said Mr. Trevor, that you have
not learned to sacrifice your own experience to the
fanciful theories of the
Amis de Noirs
, at least on
this point. The time, I hope, will come when you
will see, if you do not already, the fallacy of all their
cant and sophistry on the subject of domestic slavery.
You will then bless God that your lot has been cast
where the freedom of all, who, in the economy of
Providence, are capable of freedom, is rendered
practicable by the particular form in which the
subordination
of those who must be slaves is cast.
I am not sure, said Douglas, that I exactly
comprehend you.
Perhaps not, replied the uncle. And that
reminds me that I am trespassing on forbidden
ground. Just there, the differences of opinion
between
your father and myself commence; and from
that point they diverge so much, that I do not feel at
liberty to speak to his son on certain topics.
But why not, my dear sir? You surely cannot
expect me to think with my father on all subjects;
and you would not have me do so, when you thought
him wrong. I do not profess to be deeply studied
in these matters; but, between your lights and his,
I might hope to find my way to the truth.
There are some subjects, Douglas, replied Mr.
Trevor, with solemnity, on which it is better to be
in error than to differ, totally and conscientiously,
from a father. Delia is but a girl; but should she
have come back to me changed in her sentiments
(opinions she cannot have) in regard to certain
matters
,
I should feel that I had been grievously wronged
by any one who had wrought the change. I know
your father has not done this; and I must do as I
would be done by, and as I am sure I have been
done by.
I cannot conceive, said Douglas, what sort
of subjects those can be, concerning which error in
opinion is better than truth, under any
circumstances
.
Those, replied Mr. Trevor, in which truth
would bring duty in conflict with duty.
Nay, then, said Douglas, there is no danger
of my conversion in such cases. I should take that as
an infallible proof that doctrines leading to such
consequences
must be false.
Your proposed test of truth is so specious,
observed
Mr. Trevor, that I will go so far as to say
one word to convince you of its fallacy. If ever I
take you in hand, my lad, my first lesson will be to
teach you to examine plausibilities closely, and to
distrust summary and simple arguments on topics
about which men differ.
Does any one, then, maintain, asked Douglas,
that two opinions which impose conflicting duties
can both be right?
I shall not answer that, answered Mr. Trevor.
You shall answer it yourself. You are a soldier of
the United States. Suppose an insurrection. What,
in that case, would be your duty?
To fight against the rebels, replied Douglas,
promptly.
And, thinking as you do, so it would be.
Now, suppose your father to be one of those same
rebels.
I see, said Douglas, after a pause, in which he
colored to the tips of his ears; I see that you are
right.
In what? asked Mr. Trevor.
In maintaining, he replied, that two opinions
which prescribe conflicting duties, may both be
right.
But I have not said so, replied Mr. Trevor,
smiling.
But you have proved it.
I am not quite sure of that. Here is another
summary and simple looking argument, on a
difficult
question. My own rule is, `
distrust and
reexamine
.'
He stopped short, while Douglas looked at him
with a perplexed and wondering eye. He at length
went on: I shall not break faith with your father
by teaching you to think. You have the
propositions
;
and you see there is fallacy somewhere.
Analyse
the subject, and find your own result. But
come, my boythis is poor entertainment for a
hungry
traveller. Your aunt has some dinner for you
by this time, and here is Tom come to tell us so.
Come, give me your arm, and help me to the dining
room.
My dear father, said Delia, that is my
office
.
Both! both! my children! exclaimed the old
man, throwing away his other crutch. Why, now
I am better off than a man with sound limbs.
In the dining-room, Mrs. Trevor awaited them.
A hasty greeting was all she had allowed herself on
the first arrival of the party; after which, she betook
herself to the duties of housewifery and hospitality.
They found her standing at the back of her chair; and
Douglas, as he entered, thought he had rarely seen a
more striking figure. She was matronly in her dress
and air; tall, majestic, and graceful in her person;
and with a countenance beaming with frankness,
animation, and intelligence. She had been a
beautiful
woman, and, being much younger than her
husband
,
was still handsome. She extended her hand
to Douglas as he entered, and placing him near her,
so mingled the courtesy due to a stranger with the
cordiality of an old acquaintance, as to make him
feel all the comfort and ease of home, without ever
losing a sense of that bland influence, which, while
it secures decorum, imposes no constraint.
Would you have known me? asked the lady.
I cannot say I could have
identified
you, he
replied; but I should have recognized you as one
I ought to know.
And your uncle?
Not by sight, certainly, said Douglas. I
remember him too distinctly for that. He is too
much altered. But I know him by his manners and
conversation. These I never could forget; and these
are the same, and peculiarly his own. I remember
how he used to exercise my mind, and make me talk;
and yet never let me talk without thinking.
And has he been at the old game already?
O yes! He has set me to revising and doubting
what have seemed to me to be self-evident truths,
and proposes to leave me to work out the problem
by myself. What conclusion I am to settle in, I
cannot
guess; but, from present appearances, I shall not
be surprised if I go away convinced that I have
seven fingers on one hand, and but two on the other;
nine in all.
He has not touched on politics?
O no! That subject he has
tabooed;
and I am
truly sorry for it; for while I never desire to waver
in my allegiance to the United States, I am anxious
to understand what may become me as a
Virginian
.
If I may judge from what my father says, there
is no man from whom I could learn more on that
subject than my uncle.
His lesson would not be a short one, replied
the lady. His commandments on behalf of the
State are only second in authority with him to the
decalogue; and they do not lie in as small a
compass
.
But he fears he might teach you some things
your father would wish you to unlearn.
I am not so sure of that, answered Douglas.
I meant to say that there is no man whose
judgment
my father holds in higher respect.
That is something new, said Mrs. Trevor,
coloring, and with a countenance in which there
was some expression of wounded pride. I should
be glad to be convinced of that.
Why should you doubt it? asked the young
man, with surprise.
Because it has not always been so; and, as I
claim a woman's privilege to admire my husband
above all men, I have felt hurt at it. Your uncle
thinks so highly of his brother's wisdom and
prudence
,
that he has always borne to be thought the
reverse of him in these things, and quietly submitted
to be condemned as a heretic on account of opinions,
of the correctness of which he found it impossible to
doubt.
There may
have been
something of this, said
Douglas, earnestly; but I assure you it is not so
now. I do believe one motive with my father for
wishing me to make this visit, is his desire that
I should hear both sides; and have the benefit of
the sagacity and manly sense which he imputes to
my uncle.
He will have to tell him so plainly, replied Mrs.
Trevor, before he will open his mouth to you.
But I shall be less scrupulous; and I am in daily
expectation of a friend whose frankness will leave
you no cause to regret your uncle's reserve.
Who is that? asked Douglas.
I shall leave you to find out. You will see
many here who feel and think with your uncle, and
who come to him to compare thoughts and concert
measures. Among them is the man on whom the
destinies of his country depend.
The only man of whom I should predicate
that, replied Douglas, with some quickness, is
one who, I am very sure, never comes here.
There is a good and an evil principle, said
Mrs. Trevor. Events alike depend on both.
You
speak of the one of these
I
of the other.
Douglas felt his cheek burn at this remark. His
aunt, observing it, added: You see, you will run
the risk of adopting dangerous heresies if you
encourage
us to be too unreserved. But your candor and
good sense may be trusted to lead you right, without
our guidance.
Douglas felt the truth of the first part of this
speech. Whether any thing more than a
complimentary
turn of expression was meant in the closing
words, he did not know. But if the lady intended
to express a hope that he might become a convert
to the disorganizing notions which he feared were
prevalent in her circle, he took the liberty to doubt
whether her anticipations would ever be realized.
He now changed the conversation, and determined
to take a second thought before he invited
discussions
which might mislead him. He found he had
to do with active and vigorous minds, against which
he might, perhaps, vainly strive to defend himself,
10
even with truth on his side. He resolved, therefore,
to yield to the inclination which led him to pass
his time with his young friends, and chiefly with
Delia.
CHAPTER XII.
My heart, sweet boy, shall be thy sepulchre;
I'll bear thee hence, and let them fight that will,
For I have murdered where I would not kill.
Shakspeare
.
I should
detain the reader with matters not
worthy of a place in this grave history, if I
descended
to the particulars of the intercourse between
Douglas Trevor and his charming cousin. It is
enough to say, that he found himself, daily, more and
more happy in her society; and was more and more
convinced that it was a necessary ingredient in his
happiness. It was not long before he concluded that
he would not live without her; and, having told her
so, was referred by her to her father.
Nothing doubting that his communication would
be favorably received, Douglas was eager to break
the matter to his uncle, and ask his approbation of
his suit. To his utter amazement, the old
gentleman
,
assuming an air at once serious and tender,
said: My dear boy, had I the world to choose from,
there is no man to whom I would sooner trust my
daughter's happiness. But circumstances forbid
your union. I speak advisedly and sadly. I have
seen what was passing. I anticipated this
communication
,
and deliberately decided on my answer.
For God's sake, sir! exclaimed Douglas,
trembling with impatience, what do you mean;
and what is your answer?
I mean, said Mr. Trevor, and my answer is,
that circumstances forbid it.
Surely, said Douglas, your objection is not
to the nearness of blood.
I am not addicted to any such exploded
superstition
,
said Mr. Trevor. But my daughter must
never marry one that wears that dress.
I like my profession, sir, said Douglas, but
will change it without hesitation.
God forbid! replied the old gentleman. I
would not have you do so; and were you so inclined,
it would not be in your choice.
I can resign when I will, and my resignation
will certainly be accepted.
Still you would be a soldier, and you must be a
soldier. Peace is not in our choice, and the time is
at hand when every man, who can wield a sword,
must do so.
I do not understand you, sir, said Douglas in
amazement.
I am aware you do not. It is time you should.
You have now a right to understand me; and I have
a right to be understood by you. We are on the
eve of what you will call rebellion. I shall call it a war
of right and liberty. I am old and infirm; but I am
not always imprisoned by the gout; and nothing but
physical inability shall keep me from sustaining,
with my sword, a cause that I have always
advocated
with tongue and pen. It will be bad enough
to meet the sons of my brother in arms against my
country. That I cannot help. But it is in my
choice whether I shall thus meet my daughter's
husband
.
That must never be.
He ceased to speak, and the young man, dizzy
with mixed thoughts and feelings, sat gazing at him
in mute astonishment. At length, starting up, he
was about to leave the room, when the old
gentleman
held out his hand. Douglas gave his, and his
uncle, pressing it cordially, went on: My son,
said he, you are the only male of my race in whom
I recognize any thing which tells me that the same
blood flows in our veins. We cannot help the
selfishness
that disposes us to love those who resemble
us even in our faults. It might be better for you not
to resemble me, and perhaps I ought to wish that
you did not. But I cannot. I find it easier to
forget
that you are not my son, and to love you as if
you were. The hope that you may yet be so, is
hardly less dear to me than to you. That you will
be so, if `you outlive the envy' of those awful
events which shall open your eyes, I can hardly
doubt. But these things must do their work. The
10*
convictions which shall make you throw off the
badges of allegiance to him whose sworn foe I am,
must come of themselves. While you wear them, I
am bound to respect your honor by saying nothing to
shake your faith in him, and to his cause. In the
mean time, I can but hope for the best. I do hope;
and I invite you to hope. But for the present, hope
must be our all. Things must remain as they are
until it pleases God so to order events as to make
your sense of duty to your country consistent with
that which, as my daughter's husband, you will owe
to her and to her father.
I leave the reader to imagine the consternation of
Douglas at this decisive condemnation of his
proposed
plan of happiness, and at the astounding
intelligence
that accompanied it. He saw plainly that
his uncle spoke not conjecturally, but from certain
knowledge; and he was sure, that under such
circumstances
,
no attachment could tempt Delia to
marry him. He did not therefore attempt to
continue
the discussion of the subject, but left the house
and wandered into the fields.
The tumult of his mind rendered him incapable of
reflection. I shall not attempt to analyze the chaos
of his thoughts. But light, not darkness, floated on
the surface. The hand of Delia was indeed
withheld
for a season, but he was not forbidden to hope
that it might one day or other be his. Should it
even be true that rebellion was awake, and that civil
war was at hand, he was not told that fidelity to his
standard would be imputed to him as a crime. The
strife must end one way or the other, and that being
past, he would no longer be condemned to the hard
alternative of relinquishing the object of his most
ardent wish, or exhibiting the shocking spectacle of
a husband warring against the father of his wife.
But what was to be done in the mean time?
Should the old gentleman take the field, he must
find some other theatre of action, and his father's
influence
with the President would readily procure him
that indulgence. As to the idea of renouncing what
he had been taught to call his allegiance to the
Federal Government, and aiding to maintain the
dishonored
sovereignty of his native State, it did not
enter his mind. Yet there was something in its
workings that suddenly awakened an undefined
interest
in the late correspondence between his father
and the President. He no sooner thought of this,
than his restless wanderings received a definite
direction
to the neighboring post-office.
He there found a letter from his father, containing
little more than the copy of one from the President.
Its contents were as follows:
Washington
,
March 20, 1849.
My dear sir
: Your letter has been received,
and,
to me
, is entirely satisfactory. But I regret to
inform
you that, to those friends whom I feel myself
bound to consult, it is not so. Such of them, indeed,
as are acquainted with your high character, do not
intimate a doubt that a full explanation of the affair
would entirely justify your assurance that I have
been misinformed.
But they remind me that my information comes
from a source entitled to all respect and confidence,
and that, by making thus light of it, I may estrange
a friend, whom they regard as hardly less valuable
and meritorious than him whose feelings I wish to
save. They represent, moreover, that the affair is
bruited in the army, and that some officers are
mal-content
at the thought that a charge so serious
should be passed over without enquiry, on the bare
assurance of a father's confidence in the innocence of
his son.
Under these circumstances, should Lieutenant
Trevor not demand a court of inquiry, I am fearful
I may be constrained, against my wish, to order a
court-martial. Need I tell you, my dear sir, how
earnestly I deprecate the necessity of a measure,
which must so nearly touch one to whose friendship
I feel so much indebted, and whose loyalty to the
Union and its officers has always been so conspicuous
and steady.
I remain, my dear sir,
Your assured friend,
M. V. B.
To this copy Mr. Trevor added these words:
The discretion, good sense, and proper feeling
you have already manifested in this affair, have been
so conspicuous, that I choose rather to trust its future
conduct entirely to yourself than to embarrass you by
any advice of mine. Yet, there is one person, my dear
boy, with whom I would have you to advise. Your
uncle has been a soldier in his youth, and is
profoundly
versed in all matters of military etiquette.
He is, moreover, a clear-sighted and sagacious man,
who will, at once, see this matter in all its bearings
and relations to other subjects. His views are not
only, in general, more comprehensive than mine, but
I suspect he is, at this moment, aware of
considerations
which might properly influence you, and which
are hidden from me. I know his guarded and
delicate
reserve, in all his communications with my
children, where he apprehends a difference of opinion
between himself and me. Tell him that he has my
thanks for it; but that I shall be yet more obliged,
if, in this instance, he will cast it aside entirely, and
give you the benefit of all his thoughts, as if you
were
his own
son. I fear my last days may be spent
in bitter regrets that I myself have not heretofore
made more avail of them.
CHAPTER XIII.
It is enough to grieve the heart,
To think that God's fair world hath been
The footstool of a thing so mean.
Byron
.
The
evening was far advanced, when Douglas
again reached his uncle's house. He went
immediately
to his room, and sent to request a private
interview with Mr. Trevor. He was accordingly
invited into the little study of the old gentleman,
where he commonly sat surrounded by books and
papers. On entering the room, he observed an
elderly gentleman, whom he had never seen before,
pass out at a door communicating with the
drawingroom
.
Douglas now silently handed his father's letter to
his uncle. Mr. Trevor read it attentively, and again
and again looked over it, resting his eye on
particular
passages, as if to possess himself of the full
meaning of every expression. The subject was in
itself interesting, and quite new to him. But he felt
a yet deeper interest in the obscure intimations of a
change in his brother's mind in regard to those
matters
about which they had so long and so painfully
differed. Even if he was mistaken in this, it was
consoling to find himself rising in the estimation of
Mr. Hugh Trevor; no longer regarded by him as
rash, reckless, and inconsiderate, but consulted as a
clear-sighted and sagacious man in an affair of
very great importance. He alone, who has been
conscious of being thus undervalued by a friend at
once beloved and respected, can estimate the
satisfaction
which Mr. Trevor felt at that moment. If
there was any mixture of alloy with this pleasure, it
flowed from self-reproach. He had sometimes found
it impossible to repress some little risings of
resentment
,
at finding his judgment habitually disabled by
his elder brother. He had indeed been once a little
white-headed boy, when the other was a highly
intelligent
and promising youth. But, at sixty, he was
not quite content to be still looked on as a child.
Yet, when he remarked the candor of his brother's
language, and the self-abasing sadness of his tone,
he was vexed to think that one unkind thought
toward
him had ever entered his mind.
At length, he interrupted this train of thought, to
ask of Douglas an explanation of the President's
letter
.
In answer, he received a detailed account of
the scene at the falls, and was permitted to read the
correspondence which had grown out of it.
I have heard something of this before, said
Mr. Trevor. Delia told me all that passed in her
presence, and showed me Baker's palinode, which is
rather the most extraordinary document that I ever
saw. Why, the dog acknowledges that he actually
intended to insult a lady. He might, at least, have
had the grace to lie about it.
False
shame is better
than no shame at all.
He would have been glad to put the matter on
that footing, said Douglas, could he have got
leave to do so. He sent me such a paper as you
suppose, but I refused to receive it. His apology
to me I knew to be false. It was, therefore, the more
satisfactory because the more humiliating. But I
sent him word that I would not take any thing to
my cousin but the truth. Here, continued
Douglas
,
is his first
projet
of an apology, and of my
rejection of it.
Mr. Trevor read them, and then said: This is
well. I knew you had acted handsomely, but
how
handsomely, I had not conceived of. But let me
hear, I pray you, how all this has been tortured into
an offence against majesty.
Douglas colored slightly at the word, and handed
his uncle a copy of the President's first letter to his
father. He had but to add an account of his
subsequent
conversation with his father, and Mr. Trevor
was in possession of the whole affair.
You see, said Douglas, that I am referred to
you for advice, and that you are invited to say to me,
unreservedly, what you will.
I do see, replied Mr. Trevor, that I have
carte blanche
, as far as depends on your father. But
there are some things I would
now
say to
his son
,
which it would not be proper to say to a
soldier of
the United States
. I cannot, therefore, discard all
reserve, but
all
that
he
has ever imposed on me, I
now shake off. Indeed, I should have done this
now, without his permission. You are my son, as
well as his. You have shown that you know how to
protect my daughter, and have fairly earned a right
to protect her through life. Nay, no raptures;
no thanks! The exercise of this right must be
postponed until affairs have taken a different shape
from that they bear at present. But,
revenons a nos
moutons!
The question is, what you are to do to
save this despicable, heartless wretch, from the
necessity
of offending a wretch even baser than himself,
whom even he despises.
Whom do you mean? asked Douglas.
I mean, replied the other, the President and
the elder Baker, that tame slave of power, that
shameless, mercenary pander, who, having both
talent
and reputation, sold the one and sacrificed the
other for office and infamy.
And is it for such a man, exclaimed Douglas,
that I am required to make disclosures before a
court of inquiry, or a court-martial, which delicacy
and self-respect forbid? Never! Be the alternative
what it may, I shall never consent to it.
You are right, my son, said Mr. Trevor, nor
11
can I relieve you from the difficulty by authorizing
the profanation of my daughter's name, to which
such an investigation would lead. My duty on that
head is peremptory, not discretionary. If your
father
were any thing but the perfect gentleman he is,
I might suspect that his reference to me was
intended
to elicit some such suggestion. But I know
him better. I infer from his letter more than you
discover there; and I am not sure that the advice
which I am most disposed to give, is that which he
would be best pleased to see you follow.
What would that advice be? asked Douglas,
anxiously.
Nay, replied the old gentleman, when I have
made up my mind, you shall know.
But why not give me your thoughts, said the
youth, and let us discuss them?
Because, circumstanced as you are, we cannot
properly discuss them. I can but give you my
judgment
,
when I have formed it, and leave you to find
out reasons for it.
My own first thought, said Douglas, is to
resign. Let us discuss that.
It was mine too, said the uncle, and there is
therefore no occasion to discuss it. Though I had
not sufficiently matured my opinion to announce it to
you, I think I may promise, that if you come to
that conclusion, I shall not dissent from it.
The only difficulty that I see in the way, said
Douglas, is that an offer to resign is, under such
circumstances, generally understood as a shrinking
from inquiry.
It is so; and the opinion is so far right, that,
when the charge is infamous, resignation doubles
the infamy. It is a tacit consent to be infamous,
only on condition that one may be safe.
You state the point with startling force, said
the youth. And how would you distinguish this
case from the one you suppose?
By distinguishing the accusation from one of
falsehood, peculation, or cowardice. Should you
plead guilty to such charges as these, or seek to
evade them by resignation, you stand dishonored.
But read over the President's bill of indictment.
Now suppose it true that you had entertained and
avowed the sentiments there imputed to you, would
there be any dishonor in that?
Certainly not; unless my being an officer of
the United States would make a difference.
Should that prevent you from thinking, or take
away a freeman's right to express his thoughts?
It would seem not. But does it not make some
difference?
Certainly. Shall I tell you what it is? Such
sentiments would make it your duty (not to the
United States, but to Virginia and to yourself,) to
resign. Now, it is because I have no mind to
seduce
a soldier from his standard, that I have been
careful not to infuse such sentiments into you. If
once you lay aside the panoply of the uniform, and
throw away the amulet of the commission, I would
not ensure you against opinions which you may have
to maintain at the hazard of your life. But time
presses. Your own suggestion disposes me to speak
more promptly and decidedly than I should
otherwise
have done. I therefore say, tender your
resignation
.
But, if you have no objection, I should like
to consult a friend, on whose most hasty opinions I
rely more than on the coolest judgment of others.
If you mean my aunt, said Douglas, I know
few persons on whose instinctive sense of propriety I
should place more reliance.
She would well deserve your confidence; but I
mean the gentleman who left the room as you entered.
He has been her friend for thrity years, and mine for
more than half that time.
But to me, said Douglas, he is an utter
stranger, and I feel some delicacy in consulting a
stranger on such an occasion.
You forget, said Mr. Trevor, that all there
is of delicacy in the case touches me as nearly as
you. It is not you, a stranger, but I, an intimate
friend, who propose to ask his advice. Charge
that matter to my account, then, and merely decide
for yourself, whether it may not be desirable to have
the counsel of one as remarkable for scrupulous
delicacy, as for sagacity and resource?
There can be but one answer to that question,
replied Douglas, and I shall therefore gladly take
the benefit of his advice.
The hand-bell sounded, and the ever-ready Tom
appeared. My respects to Mr. B, said Mr.
Trevor. Ask him, if he pleases, to walk into this
room.
Tom disappeared, and soon returned marshalling
in Mr. B. He was a man apparently of sixty years
of age, or more, slightly formed, but tall, erect,
clean-limbed
,
and sinewy. His vigor seemed little
impaired
by time, though his high and strong features
made him look at least as old as he was. A light
blue eye, clear and sparkling, quick in its glance,
but settled and searching in its gaze, was the
striking
feature of his face. The sun had burned out all
traces of his original complexion, and a silver hue
had usurped the color of his hair. His whole
appearance
was imposing, and while it commanded the
respect due to the wisdom of age, seemed to claim
no pity for its infirmities. To this sentiment, which
enters so largely into the composition of that
character
which the world calls
venerable
, he certainly made
no pretensions. No one would have called
him
venerable, though no man was held in higher
veneration
by those who knew him.
11*
CHAPTER XIV.
I had not loved thee, dear, so much,
Loved I not honor more.
Lovelace
.
The
frankness and cordiality of his manner, when
introduced to Douglas, gave assurance that he took
a great interest in the young man; who felt, on his
part, that he was in the presence of a man of no
common mould, and that in that man he had found
an efficient friend.
And now, Tom, said Mr. Trevor, pass the
word for coffee and privacy in this room.
Tom bowed and withdrew, and Mr. Trevor,
without
preface or apology, proceeded to lay the case
before his friend. This he did with great
precision
of statement, while the other listened with an
air which showed that no word was lost on him.
Having got through, Mr. Trevor added: We now
wish you to advise what should be done in this
case.
Resign, by all means, said Mr. B. Resign
immediately!
Your reasons? asked Mr. Trevor.
There are plenty of them, of which you are
aware, said B, and with which our young friend
shall be made acquainted after resignationnot
before
.
But there are others which may be spoken of
now. The alternative is a court of inquiry, a
court-martial
,
or resignation. To the two first the same
objection
applies. Your nephew cannot expect any
satisfactory
result from either, but by the use of means
which, I am sure, his delicacy would not permit him
to useI mean the public use of a lady's name.
Some people have a taste for that, and in other parts
of the world it is all the rage. I thank God that the
fashion has not reached us. A woman, exposed to
notoriety, learns to bear and then to love it. When
she gets to that, she should go North; write books;
patronize abolition societies; or keep a
boarding-school
.
She is no longer fit to be the wife of a
Virginia
gentleman. But there is no need to say this.
You, Trevor, were your nephew so inclined, would
never permit the name of your daughter to be thus
profaned.
I could oppose nothing to it, said Mr. Trevor,
but my displeasure. And though I might not wish
it, could I have a right to be displeased with
Douglas
for vindicating himself from a charge which has
grown out of his gallant defence of her? Think of
the favorable standing of his family; observe the
rapid promotion of his brother; and consider whether
a punctilio of this sort should bind him to renounce
prospects so flattering?
Were the prospect more flattering than you state
it, said B, it would not change my opinion. But
what prospect is there? Colonel Trevor is perhaps
a favorite at court. So, doubtless, is your brother.
But he is not a man whose fidelity is either to be
bought or rewarded; and he and his will be, at any
moment, postponed and sacrificed to the mercenary,
who might desert and even mutiny for want of pay.
Here is proof it.
Look at the shallow pretext for this proposed
court-martial. The President is pleased to say that
he believes your brother; but that
there are those
who do not. Who are they? Who can they be?
Who is there, worthy to be accounted among his
advisers, that can disbelieve any thing that Hugh
Trevor shall assert? Don't you see the cheat?
Don't you see that your brother, whose attachment
to the Union, based as it is on principle, may be
safely trusted, is to have his feelings wounded to
gratify the mortified pride of the elder Baker, and
the skulking malice of his son? You, Mr. Trevor,
know better than I do, who are about the President.
Is there one among them to whom your father's
word would need the support of other testimony?
Good old man! So little has he of pride or jealousy,
that this thought never occurs to him. He is
modestly
asking himself what right he has to expect
credence from those who do not know him. And
who are these malcontent officers? Think you
there is one of them who would venture to express
his dissatisfaction to you? No. There is no one
malcontent. No one dissatisfied but that son of
the horse-leech, whose mouth is ever agape, and
never can be filled.
Do look at this letter, continued B,
addressing
Mr. Trevor. How perfectly in character. Not
one traversable allegation (as the lawyers say)
except
that of his friendship for your brother. `Those
friends whom I feel bound to consult!' Who are
they? Press him, and I dare say some fellow
below
contempt, some scullion of the kitchen political
or the kitchen gastronomical, may be found to father
what it is alleged that these friends have said. `His
information is from a source entitled to all confidence!'
Does he even say that as of himself? No. He
charges that too on his friends, though it might not
be easy to find a sponsor for that compliment to old
Baker. Since the death of his brother pimp Ritchie,
I think that sort of thing has gone out of fashion.
`Hardly less valuable and meritorious than your
brother
.'
The same authority. `
On dit
,' `
they say
.'
I think this last
On
, would be as hard to find as that
universal author of mischief, Nobody.
But, when we come to the dissatisfaction of the
army, it is worse still. Here is
on dit
upon
on dit
.
Somebody says that somebody else is dissatisfied;
and such are the gossamer threads, woven into a
veil to hide this insult to your brother, and this
indignity
to your nephew. Take away these, and
what remains but a wish to soothe Baker? And
what must be the force of those favorable
dispositions
to your young friend, which are to be
counteracted
by such a motive? By a reluctance to offend
an abject wretch too spiritless to resent, and
without influence to make his resentment at all
formidable.
Enough! said Douglas. I will send on my
resignation by the next mail.
No, my dear sir, said B, don't yield too
readily to my suggestions.
It was his own suggestion, and already approved
by me, said Mr. Trevor. Had you dissented,
we would have reconsidered the matter. As it is,
we are but confirmed in our decision.
That being the case, said B, I have only
to say distinctly that the thing admits of no doubt
with me. I am not only sure that, in resigning, your
nephew will do what best becomes him as a
gentleman
,
but that he will make a fortunate escape from
the service of one whose maxim it is to reward none
but the mercenary.
Then go to work, my boy, said Mr. Trevor.
The mail goes at day-light. Enclose your letter of
resignation, unsealed, in one to your father. I will
have them mailed to-night, and you will get an
answer
in a week. Here are the materials. Write,
and we will chat and take our coffee. By the way,
Douglas, you have not dined.
Thank you, my dear uncle, I am too busy to be
hungry, said the youth.
Be it so, said the old gentleman. It is not
so long since I was young, but that I understand
your trim. Starving is better than blood letting, and
a full heart needs the one or the other.
When Douglas's letters were finished, he would
gladly have put them into Delia's hands before he
sent them off. But he found, what most men have
been surprised to find, that after what had passed in
the morning between him and Delia, it was much
harder to obtain an interview with her than before.
When a young gentleman makes a visit of some days
to a friend in the country, whose daughter suspects
that he has something to say to her that she is
impatient
to hear, it is amusing to see how many
chances will bring them together. Each of them is
always happening to have some call to go where the
other happens to be; and, when together, each is apt
to be detained in the room by some interesting
occupation
until the rest of the company have left it. They
are continually meeting in passages, and on
staircases
;
and, in pleasant weather, they are almost
sure to stroll into the garden about the same time.
But let the decisive word be once spoken, and all is
changed. Then, bless us, how we blush! and how
we glide through half-open doors, and slip away,
around corners!
Still it will happen, as love makes people
restless
,
that both will rise early, and so meet in the
parlor
before others are awake. And then there is the
dewy eve and rising moon, and the quiet walk
by wimpling burn and leafy shaw; but as to a
private word in the bustling hours of the day, that is
out of the question.
All this is the result of sheer accident. See how
innocent and artless she looks! And how light and
elastic is her step as she moves along; her swan-like
neck outstretched, her face slightly upturned, her eye
swimming in light, and looking as if the veil of
futurity
were raised before her, and all the gay visions
of hope stood disclosed in bright reality. Is she
not beautiful? O the charm of mutual love! Who
can wonder that each man's mistress, wearing this
Cytherean zone, is in his eyes the Queen of Beauty
herself?
But I forget myself. What place for thoughts
like these in a chronicle of wars and revolutions?
True, it is in such causes that the spring of great
events is found. But these belong to the history of
man in all ages, in all countries, under all
circumstances
.
It was so
before Helen;
and will be
so while the world stands. But it may not be
unprofitable
to look into the chain of cause and
consequence
,
and to trace the deliverance of Virginia from
thraldom, and the defeat of the usurper's well-laid
plans, to the impertinent speech of one of his minions
to a country girl, during a
pic nic
party at the falls of
James river.
But to return. Douglas took a copy of his letter
of resignation, and, meeting Delia the next morning,
put it into her hands. She read it with a grave and
thoughtful countenance, and then, looking sadly in
his face, said: This is what I feared.
What you feared! replied he, in amazement.
Can you then wish me to retain my place in the
army?
Until you resign it to conviction and a sense of
duty, certainly!
And can you doubt that I have done so?
How can it be so? she replied. But
yesterday
we spoke on this subject. What has since
happened
.
O! can it be that my noble father has
imposed
dishonorable conditions; and that you have
been weak enough to comply with them? O!
Douglas
!
Is my love fated to destroy the very qualities
that engaged it?
Dear Delia, said Douglas, I understand you
now. Your beautiful indignation reminds me that
you do not know what has passed.
What can have passed? asked she, with earnest
and reproachful sadness. All the eloquence and
address of Mr. Bhimself could not have convinced
your unbiassed mind in two hours' conversation. I
12
know his power. I know the wonders he has
wrought; and I trembled when I heard the
watchword
,
coffee and privacy. I feared your love
for me might be used to sway your judgment, and
hoped to have found an opportunity to invoke it for
the worthier purpose of guarding your honor. I did
not dream that, when I rose so early this morning, I
was already too late.
Sweet youth, I pray you chide a year together,
said Douglas, playfully. Your indignation is so
eloquent, that, cruel as it is, I would not interrupt
you to undeceive you. Your father and Mr. B
have made no attack on my opinions or allegiance,
and what was done last night you have had no
agency in, since our party at the Falls. It all
originated there.
He now gave her the full history of the affair, and
succeeded in convincing her that his standard of
honor was even higher than she had imagined. If
she requited him for her unjust suspicions with a
kiss, he never told of it. Perhaps she did. For
although, according to the refinements of the
Yankees
,
kissing was in very bad taste, yet the northern
regime had not reached the banks of the Roanoke.
The ladies there continued still to walk in the steps
of their chaste motherssafe in that high sense of
honor which protects at once from pollution and
suspicion
.
It is true, that when a people become corrupt,
they must learn to be fastidious, and invent
safeguards
to prevent vice, and blinds to conceal it when
it is to be indulged. Duennas are necessary in
Spain. They are at once the guarantee of a lady's
honor, and the safe instruments of her pleasures.
Black eunuchs perform the same functions in
Turkey
.
In the northern factories, boys and girls are
not permitted to work together. In their churches,
the gentlemen and ladies do not sit in the same
pew. What a pitch of refinement! Sterne's story
of the Abbe in the theatre at Paris affords the only
parallel.
Thank God! the frame of our society has kept us
free from the cause and its consequences.
Whatever
corruption there may be among us is restrained
to a particular class, instead of diffusing itself by
continuous contact through all grades and ranks. If
it were true, as the wise and eloquent, and pious, and
benevolent, and discrect Dr. Channing had said,
some fifteen years before, that below a certain line
all was corrupt, it was equally true that above it
all was pure. Nature had marked the line, and
established there a boundary which the gangrene of
the social body could never pass.
CHAPTER XV.
Mammon, the least erected spirit, that fell
From heaven, for e'en in heav'n his looks and thoughts
Were always downward bent, admiring more
The riches of heav'n's pavement, trodden gold,
Than aught divine or holy else enjoyed
In vision beatific.
Milton
.
On
the evening of the third day from that of
which I have just been speaking, the President of
the United States was sitting alone in a small room
in his palace, which, in conformity to the
nomenclature
of foreign courts, it had become the fashion to
call his closet. The furniture of this little apartment
was characterized at once by neatness, taste, and
convenience. Without being splendid, it was rich
and costly; and, in its structure and arrangement,
adapted to the use of a man, who, devoted to
business
,
yet loved his ease. The weariness of
sedentary
application was relieved by the most tasteful
and commodious variety of chairs, couches, and
sofas, while the utmost ingenuity was displayed in
the construction of desks, tables, and other
conveniences
for reading and writing. In the appearance
of the distinguished personage, to whose privacy I
have introduced the reader, there was a mixture of
thought and carelessness very much in character with
the implements of business and the appliances for
ease and comfort which surrounded him. He
occasionally
looked at his watch, and at the door, with the
countenance of one who expects a visiter; and then
throwing himself against the arm of his sofa, resumed
his disengaged air. That something was on his mind
was apparent. But, interesting as the subject might
be, it did not seem to touch
him
nearly. His whole
manner was that of a man who is somewhat at a loss
to know what may be best for others, but finds full
consolation in knowing precisely what is best for
himself.
As the events of the last ten years make it
probable
that none of my younger readers have ever
seen the august dignitary of whom I speak, and as
few of us are like to have occasion to see him in
future
,
a particular description of his person may not
be unacceptable. Though far advanced in life, he
was tastily and even daintily dressed, his whole
costume
being exactly adapted to a diminutive and
dapper person, a fair complexion, a light and
brilliant
blue eye, and a head which might have formed
a study for the phrenologist, whether we consider its
ample developments or its egg-like baldness. The
place of hair was supplied by powder, which his
illustrious example had again made fashionable.
12*
The revolution in public sentiment which,
commencing
sixty years ago, had abolished all the privileges
of rank and age; which trained up the young to
mock at the infirmities of their fathers, and
encouraged
the unwashed artificer to elbow the duke from
his place of precedence; this revolution had now
completed its cycle. While the sovereignty of
numbers
was acknowledged, the convenience of the
multitude had set the fashions. But the reign of an
individual had been restored, and the taste of that
individual gave law to the general taste. Had he
worn a wig, wigs would have been the rage. But
as phrenology had taught him to be justly proud of
his high and polished forehead, and the intellectual
developments of the whole cranium, he eschewed
hair in all its forms, and barely screened his naked
crown from the air with a light covering of powder.
He seemed, too, not wholly unconscious of
something
worthy of admiration in a foot, the beauty of
which was displayed to the best advantage by the
tight fit and high finish of his delicate slipper. As
he lay back on the sofa, his eye rested complacently
on this member, which was stretched out before him,
its position shifting, as if unconsciously, into every
variety of grace. Returning from thence, his glance
rested on his hand, fair, delicate, small, and richly
jewelled. It hung carelessly on the arm of the sofa,
and the fingers of this, too, as if rather from instinct
than volition, performed sundry evolutions on
which the eye of majesty dwelt with gentle
complacency
.
This complacent reverie was frequently broken by
the sound of the door-bell. At such moments, the
President would raise his head with a look of
awakened
expectation, which subsided instantly; until,
by frequent repetition, it called up some expression of
displeased impatience. At last, the sound was echoed
by a single stroke, which rung from what looked like
a clock within the room. He immediately sat erect,
assuming an air of dignified and complacent
composure
,
suited to the reception of a respected visiter.
The door opened, and the gentleman in waiting
bowed into the room a person who well deserves a
particular description, and then withdrew.
The individual thus introduced was a gentleman
whose age could not be much short of seventy. In
person he had probably been once nearly six feet
high, but time had at once crushed and bowed him
to a much shorter stature. Indeed, the stoop of his
shoulders, the protrusion of the neck, and the
projecting
position of the chin, made together that
peculiar
complex curvature which brings the top of the
cape of the coat exactly against the top of the head.
The expression of his countenance was, at once,
fawning
and consequential. His face had been originally
something between round and square. It was now
shortened by the loss of his teeth. The muscular
fullness of youth had not been replaced by any
accession
of fat, nor had the skin of his face shrunk, as it
often does, on the retiring flesh. The consequence
was, that his cheeks hung down in loose pouches,
and all his features, originally small and mean,
seemed involved in the folds of his shrivelled and
puckered skin. His voice was harsh and grating,
and the more so from an attempt at suavity in the
tones, which produced nothing more than a drawling
prolongation of each word. Thus, though he spoke
slowly, the stream of sound flowed continually from
his lips, reminding the hearer of the never-ending
chant of the locust.
As the President rose and gracefully advanced to
welcome him, he shuffled forward as if wishing to
prevent
the honor thus done him, while the increased
curve of his back and the eager humility of his
upturned
countenance, betokened the prostration of his
spirit in the presence of the dispenser of honor and
emolument. Having bowed himself on the hand which
had been graciously extended to him, he remained
standing in the floor as if unmindful of repeated
invitations
to be seated. The President had not yet
so entirely forgotten the manners which once
distinguished
him as a most accomplished gentleman, and
was not at first aware of the necessity of seating
himself
before his deferential guest. At length, he
resumed
his place on the sofa, and then the other,
with a new prostration, which seemed to apologize
for sitting in the presence of majesty, followed his
example. He did not, indeed, presume to share the
sofa, though invited to do so, but took his place on
a seat equally luxurious on the opposite side of the
fire-place. But the luxury of the
chaise longue
was
lost on him. He felt that to lean against the back
or arm would be quite unbecoming, and sat as nearly
erect as he could, in that precise posture which
indicates
a readiness to spring to the feet and do the
bidding of a superior.
I had begun to despair of seeing you this
evening
,
my dear sir, said the President, in a tone at
once kind and reproachful. I had given orders
that I should be denied to all but you.
You do me great and undeserved honor, replied
the other, but I
I wished to speak to you in private, continued
Mr. Van Buren, not noticing the interruption, of a
matter which deeply interests us both. Here is a
letter which I received this morning, which makes it
at least doubtful whether the last step which I took
in regard to that young man, Trevor, is quite such
as should have been taken.
He then took from a bundle of papers, one which
he read as follows:
Sir
: I have just learned that charges of a
serious nature have been made against Lieutenant
Trevor, which, it seems, grow out of certain
occurrences
to which I am privy. I can have little doubt
that the affair, to which I allude, has not been truly
reported to you. Had it been, you would have seen
that Lieutenant T. acted no otherwise than as
became a soldier and a gentleman, in whose
presence
a lady, under his protection, had been insulted.
The enclosed documents, to the authenticity of
which I beg leave to testify, will place the
transaction
in its true light. Were Lieutenant T. at
Washington, I should not lay these papers before
you, without authority from him. As it is, I trust I
do no more than my duty by him, and by your
Excellency
,
in furnishing such evidences of the real
facts of the case, as may aid you in deciding on the
course to be pursued in regard to it.
It may be proper to add, that, having acted as
Lieutenant T.'s friend on the occasion, these
documents
were left in my possession in that character.
It is this same character, in which I feel it especially
my duty to step forward as the guardian of his honor
and interests.
Hoping that your Excellency will excuse the
freedom which calls your notice to so humble a
name,
I have the honor to be,
Your Excellency's most obedient,
Humble servant,
Edgar Whiting
,
Lieut.
12
th Inf. U. S. A.
Having read this letter aloud, the President,
without
comment, placed in the hands of his guest a
bundle of papers. It is only necessary to tell the
reader that they were copies of the same documents
which Douglas had laid before his father and uncle,
each one duly authenticated by the attestation of
Lieutenant Whiting.
Mr. Van Buren now threw himself back upon the
sofa, and fixed his eye on the face of his companion
with an expression which betokened some concern,
not unmixed with a slight enjoyment of the
perplexity
with which the purblind old man pored over
the papers. Indeed, his uneasiness could hardly
have escaped the observation of a casual spectator.
He shifted his seat; he read; then wiped his
spectacles
,
and read again; then wiped his brow; and
having gone through all the documents, again took
them up in order, and read them all over again.
When, at length, he had extracted all their
substance
,
he turned on the President a perplexed and
anxious look, and remained silent.
At length, the latter spoke. I fear we have
made an unlucky blunder in this business, my dear
sir, said he.
I fear so too, sir, said the other. But I beg
leave to assure your Excellency that the information
I took the liberty to communicate was a simple and
exact statement of what I learned from my son, which,
I trust, your Excellency will see is in nowise
contravened
by these documents. I certainly was not
apprised of the provocation which, it is here said,
was offered to a lady under Lieutenant Trevor's
protection.
Make yourself perfectly easy on that head, my
dear sir, said the President. I give myself small
concern on Lieutenant Trevor's account. My
obligations
to his father are more than discharged by the
rapid advancement of his elder brother; and he can
have no right to complain that proceedings have
been instituted to enquire into a matter which, even
thus explained, places his loyalty in no very
favorable
light. My concern is, lest the prosecution of
this investigation should lead to results undersirable
to you.
I understand your Excellency, replied the
honorable
Mr. Baker. The object of this
communication
is to convey a covert intimation that, if
proceedings
against Lieutenant Trevor are not staid, he
will revenge himself by endeavoring to dishonor my
son. I never brought him up to be the `butcher of
a silk button,' and don't wonder that his notions of
gallantry, &c. &c. do not exactly square with those
of these
preux chevaliers
.
That view of the subject is doubtless quite
philosophical
,
said the President; and if you regard
it in that light, it will remove all difficulty out of the
way.
I cannot exactly say, replied the other, that
I should be quite willing to expose my son to the
pain of seeing these documents made public;
concocted
,
as they manifestly have been, by men who
have learned to quarrel by the book, and contrived
on purpose to shut the door against enquiry. I dare
say he would hardly have made the communication
I received, could he have anticipated the step which
I deemed it my duty to your Excellency to take in
consequence of it.
The misfortune is, replied the President, that
I have already caused an intimation to be given to
Lieutenant Trevor that it may be necessary to order
a court-martial, unless he thinks proper to demand a
court of enquiry. Either way, the whole affair must
come out.
Is there no other alternative? asked the
anxious father. Could not these papers be
suppressed
?
There is no other authentic evidence of
the facts.
Unfortunately, said the President, to whom
habitual intercourse with the base had made the
feeling of contempt so familiar that he repressed it
without difficulty, unfortunately these papers are
but copies. The originals are doubtless in the hands
of Lieutenant Whiting, whose honor cannot be
questioned, and probably they would be farther
verified
by the handwriting of your son.
What then can be done? asked the honorable
Mr. Baker, in a state of unutterable perplexity.
13
Receiving no answer, he sat musing, with the
restless
and fidgeting air of a man who seeks in vain for
some starting point for his thoughts. He was at
length roused from his reverie by two strokes of the
bell, which issued from the clock-case at the
President's
back. The signal was answered by the touch
of a hand-bell, which stood on a table near him.
The door opened. The gentleman in waiting
entered
,
advanced to the table, laid a packet of letters
before the President, and withdrew in silence.
He took them up, shuffled them through his hands
as a whist player runs over his cards, and having
fixed his eye on one, took it out of the parcel, and
threw the rest on the table. His companion having
in the mean time relapsed into unconscious reverie,
he opened this, and ran his eye over the contents.
Here is good news for us, my dear sir, said
he. Lieutenant Trevor here tenders his resignation,
which, perhaps, may put an end to the difficulty.
Perhaps! exclaimed the other, eagerly.
There can be no doubt about it, I hope.
None at all; if his accounts are all adjusted, of
which I have little doubt. But it is not customary
to let go our hold on an officer by accepting his
resignation, until that matter has been enquired
into.
It will be a great relief to me, faltered out Mr.
Baker, looking at the President with an anxious and
imploring countenance
To have this explained at once, said Mr. Van
Buren, interrupting him. You shall be gratified,
my dear sir.
The hand-bell was again sounded. The
gentleman
in waiting re-appeared; a few words were
spoken to him in a low tone, and he again
withdrew
.
CHAPTER XVI.
His thoughts were low,
To vice industrious, but to noble deeds
Timorous and slothful.
Milton
.
There
is something in this business, said the
President, after a silence of a few minutes, which
I do not well understand. I was not prepared to
find Lieutenant Trevor so ready to resign, and still
less to receive his letter of resignation through the
hands of his father, without one word of
expostulation
to his son, or to me. He does not even intimate
any the least regret at the event. What can this
mean?
It does not at all surprise me, said Mr. Baker.
Hugh Trevor was always a visionary and uncertain
man; and his influence over his sons is such, that I
should consider the manifest defection of Lieutenant
Trevor as a sure proof of the estrangement of the
father.
I thought, said the President, that he had
been always remarkable for his steadiness and
fidelity.
In one sense he is so, replied Baker. But
his steadiness is of the wrong sort. He is one of
those men who professes to be governed, and, I dare
say, is governed by principles. But his principles
are so numerous, and so hedge him around and beset
him on every side, that they have kept him standing
still the greater part of his life. When he moves, it
would take an expert mathematician to calculate the
result of all the compound forces which act upon
him, and to decide certainly what course he might
take.
How happens it, then, asked the President,
that I have always found him so loyal and faithful
in his devotion to me?
Because he identified your Excellency in his
own mind with the Union, to which he determined
to sacrifice every thing else. But now that disunion
has come, and the question is whether Virginia shall
adhere to the North or join the South, he has a new
problem to work, and how he may work it, no man
can anticipate. Hence I say he is uncertain.
But does he think nothing of the advancement
of his family?
It seems not, in this instance. That is what I
meant when I said that his principles were too many.
Your Excellency knows, continued the honorable
gentleman, with a contortion of the mouth meant for
a smile, and which, but for the loss of his teeth, might
have produced a grin, that the
cardinal number
of
13*
standard principles is the only one which can be
counted on.
Have you then any information, asked the
President
,
which leads you to suspect him of
disaffection
?
None, replied Baker; I do but speak from
my knowledge of the man. I do not think him
capable of that gratitude for the many favors he and
his family have received which should bind him
indissolubly
to your Excellency's service.
It is well, at least, said the President, that
one of his sons, on whom most of those favors have
been lavished, is made of different materials. The
principles of Colonel Trevor are exactly of the right
sort; or, as you would say, my dear sir, they are of
just the right number. Could I obtain any
information
of the father's movements, which might give me
just cause to doubt him, I would take occasion to
show the difference I make between the faithful and
the unstable. I would refuse to receive this young
man's resignation, and order a court-martial
immediately
.
I mistake if the father would not be glad
to extricate him from the difficulty, by renouncing
some of these fantastic notions which he dignifies
with the name of principles.
I beseech your Excellency, said Baker,
forgetting
his envious spleen against the virtuous and
upright
friend of his early youth, in his alarm at the
mention of the court-martial; I beseech your
Excellency not to understand me as preferring any
charge against Mr. Hugh Trevor. He is an
excellent
man, who well deserves all the favors he has
received, and will, doubtless, merit many more. I
pray that what I have said may not at all influence
you to any harsh measures against him or his.
The tact of the President at once detected the
revulsion
of Baker's feelings, and the cause. Indeed,
he well knew both the men. He was aware that all
that had been said of Mr. Trevor was essentially
true. He had, therefore, the more highly prized his
friendship, as one of the brightest jewels in his
crown. He had taught his advocates and minions to
point to him as one, whose support it was known
would not be given to any man but from a sense of
duty. He was himself not so dead to virtue as not
to respect it in another; and his favorable
dispositions
toward Mr. Trevor, and the benefits bestowed
on his family, had more of respect and gratitude than
commonly mingled in his feelings or actions. Of
Baker, he had rightly formed a different estimate.
He found him in the shambles, and had bought and
used him. To Baker, too, Mr. Trevor appeared
only as one, in whose life there was a daily
beauty that made his ugly; and he had seen, with
malignant envy, the honors and emoluments for which
he had toiled through all the drudgery of a partisan,
freely bestowed on the unasking and unpretending
merit of a rival. Gladly would he have improved
the distrust, which he saw had entered into the mind
of the President, had he not been warned that the
first effect of it might be to press an enquiry which
must eventuate in the irreparable dishonor of his own
son.
While he sat meditating on these things, and
subduing
his malice to his fears and his interest, the
door-bell sounded; the single stroke from the
clock-case
echoed the sound; the door opened; and a
new character appeared on the stage.
No person whose name appears in this history
better deserves a particular description than he who
now entered. Fortunately, I am saved the necessity
of going into it, by having it in my power to refer
the reader to a most graphic delineation of his exact
prototype in person, mind, manners, and principles.
In Oliver Dain, or Oliver le Diable, as he was
called, the favorite instrument of the crimes of that
remorseless tyrant Louis XI., he had found his
great exemplar. The picture of that worthy, as
drawn by Sir Walter Scott, in Quentin Durward, is
the most exact likeness of one man ever taken for
another. It is not even worth while to change the
costume; for although he did not appear with a
barber's apron girded around his waist, and the
basin in his hands, it was impossible to look upon
him without seeing that his undoubted talents, and
the high stations he had filled, still left him fit to be
employed in the most abject and menial services.
This happy compound of meanness, malignity,
treachery, and talent, was welcomed by the
President
with a nod and smile at once careless and
gracious
.
At the sight of him, Mr. Baker made haste
to rise, and bustled forward to meet and salute him
with an air, in which, if there was less of servility,
there was more of the eagerness of adulation than he
had displayed toward the President himself. The
earnest enquiries of Mr. Baker after his health, &c.
&c. were answered with the fawning air of one who
feels himself much obliged by the notice of a
superior
,
and he then turned to the President as if waiting
his commands. These were communicated by
putting
into his hands the letters of Mr. Hugh Trevor
and his son, which he was requested to read.
While he read, the President, turning to Mr. Baker,
said: While I thought of ordering a court-martial
on the case of Lieutenant Trevor, I deemed it
advisable
to have all his military transactions looked into,
intending, if any thing were amiss, to make it the
subject of a distinct charge. Then, turning to the
other, he added: You have, I presume, acquainted
yourself with the state of the young man's
accounts
.
I have, sir, was the reply. They have been
all settled punctually.
Then there is nothing to prevent the acceptance
of his resignation?
Nothing of that sort, certainly, sir. But has
your Excellency observed the date of this letter of
his? You may see that he does not date from his
father's house. I happen to know this place, Truro,
to be the residence of that pestilent traitor, his uncle.
Now, if the charge be well founded, I submit to
your Excellency whether the offender should be
permitted
to escape prosecution by resigning. If it be
not exactly capable of being substantiated, yet his
readiness to resign on so slight an intimation
renders
his disaffection at least probable, and his date
renders it nearly certain. Might it not then be
advisable
to retain the hold we have upon him? The
court-martial being once ordered, additional charges
might be preferred; and I much mistake the temper
of the country where he is, if he does not furnish
matter for additional charges before the month of
April passes by.
Why the month of April? asked the
President
.
Because then the elections come on; and there
is little doubt that exertions will be made to obtain a
majority in the Legislature of men disposed to
secede
,
and join the southern confederacy. In that
county, in particular, I am well advised that such
exertions will be made. A hen-hearted fellow has
been put forward as the candidate of the
malcontents
,
who can be easily driven from the canvass by
his personal fears. Let the affair once take that
shape, and immediately the fantastic notions of what
southern men call chivalry, which infest the brain of
this old drawcansir, will push him forward as a
candidate
.
I had made some arrangements which, with
your Excellency's approbation, I had proposed to
carry into effect for accomplishing this result, in the
hope of bringing him into collision with the law of
treason, and so getting rid at once of a dangerous
enemy. Now, if this young man's resignation be
rejected, and a court-martial be ordered, the part he
will act in the affair can hardly fail to be such as to
make his a ball-cartridge case.
Your plan is exceedingly well aimed, said the
President, but on farther reflection, my good friend
Mr. Baker is led by feelings of delicacy to wish to
withdraw his charges. I am loth to deny any thing
to one who merits so much at my hands, but still
there are difficulties in the way which will not
permit
us to pursue that course. The acceptance of
this resignation will effectually remove them, and
indirectly
gratify the wish of Mr. Baker. Now, what
do you advise?
In the act of asking this question, the President
shifted his position so suddenly as to call the minion's
attention to the motion. He looked up and saw his
master's face averted from Mr. Baker, and thought
he read there an intimation that he should press his
former objection. This he therefore did,
expressing
his reluctance to give advice unfavorable to
the wishes of one so much respected as Mr. Baker,
and highly complimenting the delicacy of his
scruples.
But, suppose, asked the President, we press
the passage of the law authorizing a court to sit
here for the trial, by a jury of this District, of offences
committed in Virginia. In that case, should our
young cock crow too loud, we might find means to
cut his comb without a court-martial.
That Congress will pass such a law cannot be
doubted, said the other, were it not vain to do
so, when it seems to be understood that none of the
judges would be willing to execute it. I am tired of
hearing of constitutional scruples.
I am bound to respect them, replied the
President
,
meekly. But I really do not see the grounds
for them in such a case as this. I beg pardon, Judge
Baker. I know it is against rule to ask a judge's
opinion out of court. But I beg you to enlighten
me so far as to explain to me what are the scruples
which the bench are supposed to feel on this subject.
I make the enquiry, because I am anxious to accept
this young fellow's resignation, if, in doing so, I
shall not lose the means of punishing the offences
which there is too much reason to think he
medidates
.
To try him in Virginia would be vain.
Indeed
,
I doubt whether your court could sit there in
safety.
I fear it could not, replied the Judge, and
have therefore no difficulty in saying, that the
necessity
of the case should overrule all constitutional
scruples. I have no delicacy in answering your
Excellency's question out of court. It is merely an
enquiry, which I hope is superfluous, whether I
would do my duty. I trust it is not doubted that I
would; and should I be honored with your
Excellency's
commands in that behalf, I should hold myself
bound to execute them. To speak more precisely:
should the court be established, and I appointed to
preside in it, I should cheerfully do so.
That then removes all difficulty, said the
President
.
The young man's resignation, therefore,
will be accepted, and measures must be taken to
distribute
troops through the disaffected counties in
such numbers as may either control the display of
the malcontent spirit at the polls, or invite it to show
itself in such a shape as shall bring it within the
scope of your authority, and the compass of a
halter.
Some desultory conversation now arose on various
topics, more and more remote from public affairs.
On these Mr. Baker would have been glad to
descant
,
and perhaps to hear the thoughts of the
President
and his minister. But all his attempts to
detain
them from talking exclusively of lighter matters
were effectually baffled by the address of the former.
All this was so managed as to wear out the
evening
,
without giving the gentleman the least reason
14
to suspect that he was in the way, or that the great
men who had seemed to admit him to their
confidence
,
placed themselves under the least constaint
in his presence. At length he took his leave.
CHAPTER XVII.
That just habitual scorn, which could contemn
Men and their thoughts, 'twas wise to feel.
Byron
.
As the door closed behind him, the countenance
of the President relaxed into a smile, indicative of
great satisfaction and self-applause, along with an
uncontrollable disposition to merriment. The smile
soon became a quiet laugh, which increased in
violence
,
without ever becoming loud, until he lay back
against the arm of the sofa, and covered his face
with his handkerchief. At length, his mirth
exhausted
itself, and he sat erect, looking at the
Minister
with the countenance of one about to make some
amusing communication. But he waited to be
spoken to, and remained silent. His minion took
the hint, and addressing himself to what he supposed
to be passing in his master's mind, said: I beseech
your Excellency to tell me by what sleight, by what
tour de main
, this hard knot about jurisdiction has
been made to slip as easily as a hangman's noose?
I feared we should have had to cut it with the sword,
and behold it unties itself.
How can you ask such a question? said the
President, with mock gravity. Did you not hear
the elaborate and lucid argument by which the Judge
proved incontestibly that it could not be
unconstitutional
to do his duty? The wonder is how they ever
contrived to make a difficulty. Surely none who
shall ever hear that demonstration can doubt again.
But may I be permitted to ask by what means
such a flood of light has been poured upon his mind?
But yesterday he was dark as the moon in its
perihelion
.
Has the golden ray of additional favors
again caused its face to shine?
No, said the President.
No new emoluments to him or his?
None at all, was the laughing answer.
No new honors?
None; but the honor of doing additional duty,
for the first time in his life, without additional
compensation
.
In the name of witchcraft, then, what has
wrought upon him?
That I shall not tell you, said the President,
still laughing. That is my secret. That part of
my art you shall never know. It is one of the jokes
that a man enjoys the better for having it all to
himself
.
I keep it for my own diversion. It is a sort
of royal game. You, I am sure, may be satisfied
with your share in the sport, having been admitted
to hear that argument. It was a lesson in dialectics
worth a course at a German university. But come!
There is a time to laugh, and a time to be serious.
What do you propose on the subject of these
Virginia
elections?
I propose, said the Minister, to distribute
some five hundred men in certain counties, with the
dispositions of which I have made myself acquainted,
to preserve order at the elections, as we should say
to the uninitiated; but in plain English, to control
them. They will succeed in this, or provoke
violence
.
Either way, we carry our point. We prevail
in the elections, or we involve the members elect in
a charge of treason. I think we may trust Judge
Baker for the rest. The more dangerous of our
enemies
will thus fall under the edge of the law, and the
less efficient, if not left in a minority, will be
powerless
for want of leaders.
But the scene of action, said the President,
is close to the line. The offenders may escape
into North Carolina, and from thence keep up a
communication
with their friends. They may even
venture
to Richmond at a critical moment, and effect
their great purpose, or they may adjourn to some
place of greater security.
It will certainly be necessary, said the
Minister
,
to guard against that, by increasing the
number
of troops at the seat of government. Besides, if
we can but get one day to ourselves, their chance of
14*
legislative action may be broken up by adjournment
sine die
.
Then, with so many points in the game in our
favor, replied the President, we have but to play
it boldly and we must win. It shall go hard, too, if,
in the end, we do not make this superfluous State
Legislature
,
this absurd relic of
imperium in imperio
,
abolish itself. At all events, the course of conduct
which they will necessarily pursue, must sink the body
in public estimation, and dispose the people to
acquiesce
in the union of all power in the hands of the
Central Government. We can then restore them all
the benefits of real and efficient local legislation, by
erecting these degraded sovereignties into what they
ought always to have beenmunicipal corporations,
exercising such powers as we choose to grant.
Some farther conversation ensued, in which
details
were settled. A minute was made of the points
at which troops should be stationed; the number of
men to be placed at each; and the corps from which
they were to be drawn. It was left to the Minister
to fix on proper persons to command each party, and
to devise instructions as to the part to be acted. In
some places it was proposed simply to awe the
elections
by the mere presence of the military. In some,
to control them by actual or threatened violence.
In others, insult was to be used, tumult excited,
resistance
provoked, and dangerous men drawn in, to
commit acts which might be denounced as criminal.
Having thus possessed himself of his master's will,
this modern Sejanus withdrew to give necessary
orders for effecting it.
The only truly wise man, that I know in the
world, said the President, looking after him. The
only one who knows man as he is; who takes no
account of human virtue, but as one form of human
weakness. In his enemies, it gives him a power
over them which he always knows how to use. In
his instruments, he desires none of it. Why cannot
I profit more by his instruction and example? Fool
that I am! I will try to practise a lesson.
He rung the bell, and directed that the Minister
should be requested to return.
He had not yet left the palace, and soon
re-appeared
.
As he entered, the President said: This
young Trevor! He has talent, has he not?
Talent of every kind, said the Minister.
That he has a superabundance of what fools
call honor and gallantry, I happen to know. I
suppose
his other
virtues
are in proportion?
I suspect so, from the example of the father, and
all I can learn of the son.
Can you then doubt of his ultimate course? or
even that of his father? Do you doubt that if the
standard of rebellion is once raised, the young man
will be found fighting under it, with the old man's
approbation?
Not at all. I know no man who would raise it
sooner than himself, after he has had time to be
thoroughly indoctrinated by his uncle.
Then the sooner the better. He is but a cockerel
yet. What if he can be brought to commit
himself
before his spurs have acquired their full length?
Nothing could be more judicious, and nothing
easier.
How would you go about it?
Let him have a letter neither accepting nor
rejecting
.
Intimating the necessity of farther
investigation
of his accounts, &c. &c. before we let him
off, and requiring him, for the convenience of farther
correspondence, to remain at the place from whence
his letter is dated. Keep him fretted in this way
until the election is near at hand, and, a day or two
before, let him receive a letter accepting his
resignation
.
My life upon it, he will spring to his
destruction
like a bow, when the string is cut, that snaps
by its own violence.
You are right, said the President. That will
do. Much will depend on the style of that letter.
You have your hands too full to be troubled with
such things, or I should ask you to do what no man
can do so well. But you have your pupils, who
have learned of you to say what is to be said, so as
just to produce the desired effect, and no other.
The instrument of the royal pleasure again
withdrew
.
Again the President looked after him, and
said, musingly: Were I not myself, I would be
that man. I should even owe him a higher
compliment
could one be devised, for, but for him, I had
never been what I am. What then? Is he the
creator, and am I his creature? No. I am wrong.
Could he have made himself what I am, he would
have done so. He has but fulfilled my destiny, and
I his. He has made me what I alone was capable
of becoming, and I, in turn, have made him all that
he ever can be. I owe him nothing, therefore; and
should he ever be guilty of any thing like virtue,
there is nothing to hinder me from lopping off any
such superfluous excrescence, even if his head should
go with it. But he is in no danger on that score. If
he held his life by no other tenure, his immortality
would be sure.
While the master thus soliloquized, the minion
was wending his way home, to the performance of
the various duties assigned him. Our present
business
is with the letter to Douglas alone. The pen
of a ready and skillful writer was employed, the
document was prepared, submitted to the inspection
of the President, approved by him, signed by
order
by the Secretary of War, committed to the
mail, and forwarded to Douglas. Let us
accompany
it.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Behold the tools,
The broken tools that tyrants cast away
By myriads.
Byron
.
Behold
us then, once more, at the door of Mr.
Bernard Trevor's little study. The uncle and
nephew
are together. A servant enters with letters
from the post-office, and we enter with him. The
letters are opened, and Douglas having read that of
the Secretary of War, hands it to his uncle. Let us
read with him.
Sir
: I have it in command from his Excellency
the President to say, that your letter of resignation
has been received with surprise and regret.
He has seen with surprise that, at a moment of
such critical importance, one who had been, as it
were, the foster-child of the Union, should seize,
with apparent eagerness, a pretext to desert the
banner
of his too partial sovereign.
His regret is not at the loss of service, which,
rendered by one capable even of meditating such a
step, would, at best, be merely nominal; but at the
thought that that one, is the son of a friend so long
cherished and so much respected as your father.
I am farther charged to remind you, that
resignation
,
when resorted to for the purpose of evading
military prosecution, is always deemed little short of
a confession of guilt. In most cases, this produces
no embarrassment. The loss of the commission is
generally an adequate punishment; and it is, in such
cases, well to leave the conscience and the fears of
the accused to inflict that punishment, ratifying the
sentence by prompt acceptance of the proffered
resignation
.
But this does not hold in all cases. The
President
bids me say that he is not yet prepared how to
act in one of so serious a character as this. His
regard
for your father is the source of this perplexity.
He requires time to reflect how far he can reconcile
to his public duty, that tenderness to the feelings of
a friend which makes him desirous, if possible, to
stay enquiry by accepting your resignation. Under
other circumstances, he would not hesitate to reject
it, and instantly order a court-martial, as the proper
means of bringing to prompt and merited
punishment
an offence which, I am charged to say, he
considers as virtually admitted by your attempt to
evade a trial; when, if innocent, you would
certainly
wish an investigation, in order to establish your
innocence.
In conclusion, I am instructed to say, that for the
purpose of farther communication, if necessary, and
to facilitate such measures as it may be deemed
proper
to take in relation to you, I am required to
keep myself advised of your locality. To save
trouble, therefore, I deem it advisable to command
you to remain at the place from whence your letter
of resignation was dated, and to which this is
directed, until farther orders.
Yours, &c. &c.
(By order of the President.)
This letter Mr. Trevor read with calm and quiet
attention, carefully weighing every phrase and word,
while Douglas, perceiving the handwriting of his
friend Whiting on the back of another, hastily tore
it open, and read as follows:
I never performed a more painful duty in my
life, my dear Trevor, than in putting the seal and
superscription to the accompanying letter from the
Secretary.
My situation in the Department should have
given me earlier notice of what was passing, but I
got no hint of it until yesterday. I immediately did
what I believed to be my duty as a friend; though
I am now fearful that what I did may not meet your
entire approbation. I am sensible you would not
have done it for yourself; but there are some things
which delicacy forbids us to do in our own case,
which we are not displeased to have done by others.
Indeed, had I known that the matter had gone so
far, I should have left it in your own hands. But I
had no reason to believe that any intimation of it
had, as yet, been given to you, and I wished to
prevent
any step whatever from being taken.
With this view I ventured to lay the whole
correspondence
before the President. I know that he
received and read it. You will therefore judge my
surprise at being required, to-day, to forward the
unprecedented document which accompanies this.
I am guilty of no breach of duty when I assure
you that that paper is sent, as it imports on its face,
`by the order of the President.' The Secretary is
not responsible even for one word of it. The very
handwriting is unknown to me, and it was sent to
the department precisely in the shape in which you
receive it.
Knowing what I did, I should have doubted
whether it had not been surreptitiously placed among
other papers transmitted to us at the same time.
But there is no room for mistake. It came
accompanied
by the most authentic evidence that it had
been read and approved by the President himself.
I find
myself
placed in a delicate situation.
Here is an avowal of full faith in a charge disproved
by my positive assurance: a charge that no one can
believe, who does not believe me capable of basely
fabricating the documents, copies of which the
President
has, authenticated under my hand.
15
Your own course leaves no doubt what you
would advise me to do, under such circumstances.
But my lot in life is different from yours. Impatient
as I am of this indignity, I fear I shall be constrained
to bear it. `My poverty but not my will consents.
I do not, therefore, ask you to advise me, for I would
not do so, unless prepared to give to your advice
more weight than I can allow it. It could add
nothing to the convictions of my own mind, and the
indignant writhings of my own wounded honor; and
even these, God help me, I am forced to resist!
This affair has, as yet, made no noise. It is not
at all known of in the army; but I think I can assure
you of the sympathy of all whose regard you value,
and their unabated confidence in your honor and
fidelity. I shall make it my business, be the
consequence
to myself what it may, to do you ample justice.
Indeed, my indignation makes me so reckless of
consequences, that, apart from the necessity of
bearing
insult from one from whom no redress can be
demanded, I am not sure that I do not envy your
lot.
That your resignation will eventually be
accepted
,
cannot be doubted. What is the motive to
this letter, it is hard to say; but certainly it does not
proceed from such a disposition as would willingly
afford you an opportunity of triumphant vindication.
God bless you, my dear Trevor. We have
indications
that stirring times are at hand, which will
tempt me to exchange the pen for the sword. Where
duty may call me, I cannot anticipate; but it will be
strange if the charms of a life of active service don't
bring us together again. Meet when we may, you
will find still and unalterably, your friend,
E. W.
Having read this second letter, Douglas passed it
also to his uncle, and, rising, hastily left the house.
It is needless to scan the thoughts that accompanied
him in his ramble. They were bitter and fierce
enough. But he had learned, in early life, to master
his feelings, and never to venture into the presence
of others until the mastery had been established.
Many a weary mile did he walk that day before his
purpose was accomplished, but having at last effected
it, he returned.
Mr. Trevor had found leisure, in the mean time, to
scrutinize the letters in whole and in detail, and had,
at length, arrived at a conclusion not far from the
truth. He was prepared, therefore, to welcome the
return of Douglas with a cheerful smile; and instead
of adding to his excitement by any expression of
resentment
or disgust, endeavored to calm and soothe
him. For such conduct the young man was
altogether
unprepared. Aware of his uncle's wishes in
regard to him, he had looked for something different,
and had endeavored to fortify his mind against such
impressions as he feared he might attempt to make
on it. The great principles by which he had been
taught to govern himself were not false because he
had been wronged. His duty to the Union was not
affected by the injustice of the President. So his
father would have reasoned the matter, and like his
father, he determined, if possible, to think and act.
But he had no idea that in this attempt he would
receive countenance and even aid from his uncle.
It may, therefore, be readily believed that the old
gentleman
rose yet higher in his esteem and confidence,
from the delicacy and forbearance which he so
unexpectedly
practised.
CHAPTER XIX.
Stone walls do not a prison make,
Nor iron bars a cage.
Lovelace
.
It
was settled, on consultation, that he should
abide the final event; and that, until then, nothing of
what had passed should be made known to his
father
,
to Delia, or to any of the family but Mrs.
Trevor
.
In her he had learned to seek an adviser, and
in her he always found onesincere, sagacious, and
discreet. Mr. Trevor, as I have said, was not a
man from whose opinions his wife would probably
dissent, but he had not contented himself to
command
her blind, unreasoning acquiescence. He had
trained her mind; he had furnished her with
materials
for thought; and he had taught her to think.
She was in all his confidence, and he consulted with
her habitually on plans which involved the welfare
of his country. From her, therefore, the history of
Douglas's entanglement with the authorities at
Washington was not concealed. From the rest of
the family it was a profound secret; and, as Mr.
Trevor's
health was now much restored, it did not
interrupt
15*
the enjoyments of the genial season which
invited them to seek amusement out of doors. By
means of this, the impatience of Douglas was
diverted
,
and he found it quite easy to accomplish his
philosophical determination to wait the result of the
affair in patience.
When, at length, a week had been allowed him to
fret his heart out, the deferred acceptance of his
resignation
was received. This, too, was couched in
phrases of decorous and studied insult. But he had
learned to think that the dastard blow struck by one
who screens himself behind the authority of office,
inflicts
no dishonor. The interval, which had been
intended
to give his passions time to work themselves
into a tempest, had subdued them. Reason had taken
the ascendant, and, though his reflections had not been
much more favorable to the authority of his former
master, than the promptings of his resentment, they
were much less suited to his present purpose. He
was effectually weaned; divested of all former
prepossessions
,
and ready to yield to the dictates of
calm, unbiassed reason. He sought his uncle, and
with a quiet and cheerful smile, handed him the
letter.
As soon as Mr. Trevor read it, he exclaimed,
Thank God! you are now a freeman.
I am truly thankful for it, replied Douglas,
though I feel as if I shall never lose the mark of
the collar which reminds me that I have been a
slave. But, until within a short time past, I have
never felt that I was.
When the bondage reaches to the mind, said
Mr. Trevor, it is not felt.
And was mine enslaved, asked Douglas,
when my thoughts were as free as air?
Their prison was airy, replied the old
gentleman
,
and roomy, and splendidly fitted up. But
look at the President's letters, and see the penalties
you might have incurred, had your freedom of thought
rambled into such opinions as many of your best
friends entertain.
Still, replied Douglas, the penalty would
have attached, not to the opinion but to the
expression
of it.
And do you think your mind would work
without
constraint, in deciding between opinions which it
might be unsafe to express, and those which would
be regarded as meritorious?
I can, at least, assure you that such a thought
as that never occurred to me.
But it occurred to your friends. It tied my
tongue, and, I suspect, your father's too, of late.
Now that I am free to speak, let me ask, wherein
would have been the criminality of
expressing
the
opinions imputed to you?
It would have been inconsistent with my duty
of allegiance.
Allegiance
! To whom? You will not say
to King Martin the First? To what?
To the constitution of the United States. I
was bound by oath to support that.
And what if your views of the constitution had
shown you that the acts of the Government were
violations of the constitution, and that the men
denounced
by Baker as traitors were its most steady
supporters. What duty would your oath have
prescribed
in that case? Would you support the
constitution
by taking part with those who trampled it
under foot, against those who upheld it as long as
there was hope?
I should have distrusted my own judgment.
Surely, you would not have me set up that against
the opinions of the legislative, executive, and
judiciary
,
all concurrently expressed according to the
forms of the constitution.
What then must
I
do? asked Mr. Trevor.
Be the opinions of all these men what they may, the
constitution, after all, is what it is. As such, I am
bound to support it. Now, when I have schooled
myself
into all possible respect for their judgment, and
all possible diffidence of my own, if I still think that
they are clearly in error, is it by conforming to their
opinion or my own that I shall satisfy my own
conscience
,
to which my oath binds me, that I do
actually support the constitution?
I suppose, said Douglas, you must, in that
case, conform to your own convictions.
Then
I
may, at last, trust my own judgment
when I have no longer any doubt.
You must, of necessity.
And you, said Mr. Trevor, who were not
free to do sowho, in the matter of an oath, were
to be guided, not by your own conscience, but by
the consciences of other menwas your mind
free?
Douglas colored high, and, after a long pause,
said: I see that I have been swinging in a gilded
cage, and mistook its motions for those of my own
will. I see it, and again respond cordially to your
ejaculation: Thank God! I am free.
I rejoice at it, especially, said Mr. Trevor,
because now all reserve is at an end between us.
Heretofore, in all my intercourse with you, my
tongue has been tied on the subject of which I think
most, and on which I feel most deeply. I find it
hard to speak to a son of Virginia without speaking
of her wrongs, and the means of redressing them. It
is harder still, when he to whom I speak is my own
son too.
I have long ago learned from my father, said
Douglas, that the whole South had been much
oppressed
.
I know, too, that he attributes the
oppression
to the exercise of powers not granted by the
constitution. But, with every disposition to resist
this oppression, he taught me to bear it sooner than
incur the evils of disunion.
What are they?
Weakness, dissention, and the danger to liberty
from the standing armies of distinct and rival
powers
.
Hence you have never permitted yourself to look
narrowly into the question.
I never have. I have no doubt of our wrongs;
but I have never suffered myself to weigh them against
disunion. That I have been taught to regard as the
maximum
of evil.
But disunion has now come. The question now
is, whether you shall continue to bear these wrongs,
or seek the remedy offered by an invitation to join
the Southern Confederacy. The evils of which you
speak would certainly not be increased by such a
step. We might weaken the North, but not
ourselves
.
As to standing armies, here we have one
among us. The motive which that danger
presented
is now reversed in its operation. While we
remain as we are, the standing army is fastened upon
us. By the proposed change, we shake it off. Then,
as to dissention, if there is no cause of war now,
there would be none then. Indeed the only cause
would be removed, and it would be seen that both
parties had every inducement to peace. Even in the
present unnatural condition, you see that the
separation
having once taken place, there remains nothing
to quarrel about.
What, then, said Douglas, is the meaning
of all this military array that I see? Are no hostile
movements apprehended from the Southern
Confederacy
?
Not at all. They have no such thought. The
talk of such things is nothing but a pretext for
muzzling Virginia.
How do you mean? asked Douglas.
You will know if you attend the election in this
county to-morrow. You will then see that a
detachment
of troops has been ordered here on the eve of
the election. The ostensible use of it, is to aid in
the prevention of smuggling, or, in other words, in
the enforcement of the odious tariff, and a
participation
in the advantages our southern neighbors enjoy
since they have shaken it off. But you will see this
force employed to brow-beat and intimidate the people,
and to drive from the polls such as cannot be brought
to vote in conformity to the will of our rulers. Go
back to Richmond next winter, and you will see the
force stationed there increased to what will be called
an army of observation. In the midst of this, the
Legislature will hold its mock deliberations; and you
will find advanced posts so arranged as to bridle the
disaffected counties, and prevent the people from
marching to the relief of their representatives. By
one or the other, or both of these operations; Virginia
will be prevented from expressing her will in the only
legitimate way, and her sons, who take up arms on
her behalf, will be stigmatised as traitors, not only to
the United States, but to her.
CHAPTER XX.
Ah, villain! thou wilt betray me, and get a thousand crowns
of the King for carrying my head to him.
Shakespeare
.
As Mr. Trevor had intimated, the next day was
the day for the election of members to the State
Legislature. The old gentleman, in spite of his
infirmities, determined to be present. He ordered his
barouche, and provided with arms both the servant
who drove him, and one who attended on
horseback
.
He armed himself also with pistols and a
dirk, and recommended a like precaution to Douglas.
You must go on horseback, said he. It
may
enable
you to act with more efficiency on an emergency.
At all events, were you to drive me, I should have
no excuse for taking one whose services I would not
willingly dispense with. Give me the world to
choose from, and old Tom's son Jack is the man I
would wish to have beside me in the hour of danger.
As to you, my son, I think your late master would
not be sorry to get you into a scrape. You should,
therefore, be on your guard. My infirmities will
render your personal aid necessary to help me to the
polls. Keep near me, therefore; but keep cool, and
16
leave me to fight my own battles. Prudence and
forbearance are necessary for you. As to me, I have
nothing to hazard. The measure of my offences is
full already. I have sinned the unpardonable sin,
and though there is no name for it in the statute book,
I have no doubt if they had me before their new
Court of High Commission at Washington, your
special friend, Judge Baker, would find one.
Why do you call him my special friend, asked
Douglas.
Because I have means of being advised of what
is doing among our rulers, and know that he was at
the bottom of the whole proceeding against you.
Therefore, I warn you to be prudent to-day.
Depend
upon it, if you can be taken in a fault, he will
find means `to feed fat his grudge' against you.
On reaching the election ground, the stars and
stripes were seen floating above the door of the
court-house, which was still closed. A military
parade was being enacted for the amusement
of the boys and cake-women, and the uniform
showed
that the men were regulars in the service of the
United States. They were twenty or thirty in
number
,
all completely armed and equipped. As soon
as Mr. Trevor appeared, they were dismissed from
parade, the door was thrown open, and they rushed
into the house. Presently after, it was proclaimed
that the polls were opened.
As Mr. Trevor approached the door, Douglas
observed
that a multitude of persons, who before had
been looking on, in silent observance of what was
passing, advanced to salute him, and, falling behind
him, followed to the court-house. On reaching the
door, they found it effectually blocked up by half a
dozen soldiers, who stood in and about, as if by
accident and inadvertence. But the unaccommodating
stiffness with which each maintained his position, left
no doubt that they were there by design. They
were silent, but their brutish countenances spoke
their purpose and feelings. Mr. Trevor might have
endeavored in vain to force his passage, had not the
weight of the crowd behind pressed him through the
door. In this process he was exposed to some
suffering
,
but made no complaint. The effect appeared
only in the flush of his cheek, and the twitching of
his features. The blood of Douglas began to boil,
and, for the first time in his life, the uniform he had
so long worn was hateful in his sight.
On entering the house, they were nearly deafened
with the din. It proceeded from quite a small
number
,
but they made amends for their deficiency in this
respect, by clamorously shouting their
hurras
for
the President, and his favored candidate. Besides
the soldiery, there were present the sheriff, who
conducted
the election, and some twenty or thirty of the
lowest rabble. On the bench were two candidates.
The countenance of one of those was flushed with
insolent triumph. The other looked pale and
agitated
.
He was placed between his competitor and
a subaltern officer of the United States army. He
seemed to have been saying something, and at the
moment when Mr. Trevor and his party entered, was
about to withdraw.
Meeting him at the foot of the stair leading down
from the bench, that gentleman asked him the
meaning
of what he saw; to which he answered that he had
been compelled to withdraw. The meeting of these
two gentlemen had attracted attention, and curiosity
to hear what might pass between them, for a moment
stilled the many-tongued clamor. Mr. Trevor took
advantage of the temporary silence, and said aloud:
You have been
compelled
to withdraw. Speak out
distinctly, then, and say that you are no longer a
candidate.
Fellow-citizens, responded the other, in the
loudest tones his tremor enabled him to command,
I am no longer a candidate.
And I am a candidate
, cried Mr. Trevor, in
a voice which rang through the house. I am a
candidate
on behalf of
Virginia
, her
Rights
, and her
Sovereignty
.
The shout from behind the bar, at this
annunciation
,
somewhat daunted the blue coats, and Mr.
Trevor was lifted to the bench on the shoulders of
his friends; when the officer was heard to cry out,
Close the polls.
Place me near that officer, said Mr. Trevor, in
a quiet tone. The sheriff, a worthy but timid man,
looked at him imploringly. He was set down by the
side of the officer, and, leaning on the shoulder of
Douglas, thus addressed him
I shall say nothing, sir, said he to the sheriff
about his duty. He is the judge of that, and he
knows that, without my consent, he has no right to
close the polls before sunset. Unless compelled by
force, he will not do it. He
shall not
be compelled
by force; and, if force is used, I shall know whence
it comes. Now mark me, sir; I am determined that
this election
shall
go on, and that peaceably. If
force is used, it must be used first on me. Now, sir,
my friends are numerous and brave, and well armed,
and I warn you that my fall will be the signal of your
doom. Not one of your bayonetted crew would
leave this house alive. As to
you
, sir, I keep
my
eye upon
you
. You stir not from my side, till the
polls are closed. I hold you as a hostage for the
safety of the sheriff. If an attack is made on him,
I shall know you for the instigator. And, more than
that, sir, I know he is disposed to do his duty, and
will not think of closing the polls prematurely. A
menace addressed to him may escape my ear. If he
offers to do it, if he does but open his mouth to
declare
that the polls are closed, I blow your brains out
on the spot.
Suiting the action to the word, he, at the same
moment, showed a pistol, the finish of which gave
16*
assurance that it would not miss fire. The officer
started back in evident alarm, and made a movement
to withdraw; but he found himself hedged in by
brawny countrymen, who closed around him, while
every hand was seen to gripe the handle of some
concealed
weapon.
Be patient, sir, said Mr. Trevor, you had no
business here; but, being here, you shall remain. No
harm shall be done you. I will ensure you against
every thing but the consequences of your own
violence
.
Offer none. For if you do but lift your hand,
or touch your weapons, or utter one word to your
myrmidons, you die.
These words were uttered in a tone in which,
though loud enough to be heard by all, there was as
much of mildness as of firmness. Indeed his last
fearful expression was actually spoken as in kindness.
The officer seemed to take it so, and quietly seated
himself.
Not so the rival candidate. He rose, with a great
parade of indignation, saying: Let
me
pass, at least.
This is no place for me.
Do you mean to leave us, sir, said Mr. Trevor,
with great courtesy.
I do, said the other. To what purpose should
I remain?
Do you then decline? Are you no longer a
candidate
?
I am; but I will not remain here beset by armed
violence.
Will you leave no one to represent you?
No; I leave you to work your will. I have no
farther part in the matter. I shall do nothing, and
consent to nothing. When the law closes the poll,
it will be closed.
Saying this, he withdrew, and Mr. Trevor
observed
that, as he went out, he spoke aside to the
sergeant
of the company, who followed him from the
house. Soon after, the men, one by one, dropped
off, and all at length disappeared.
The election now went on peaceably, and nearly
every vote was cast for Mr. Trevor. But it did not
escape his observation that there were persons
present
whom he knew to be hostile to him, and
devoted to the rulers at Washington, who yet did
not vote. He saw the motive of this conduct, but
determined to make it manifest to others as well as
himself, and to expose the disingenuous and
unmanly
artifice which he saw his enemies were using
against him. Catching the eye of a well dressed
man he said, You have not voted, I think, Mr. A?
I have not, was the answer, and I don't
mean to vote.
I beg that you will, sir, said Mr. Trevor. I
know you to be my enemy, personal as well as
political
;
but I sincerely wish the name of every voter
in the county to appear on the poll book, though my
defeat should be the consequence.
It may be so, sir, replied the other; but I
shall not vote at an election, controlled by force, and
where those commissioned by the Government to
keep order, are either driven off or detained in
durance.
I do not understand you, sir, said Mr. Trevor.
Am I to infer that the presence of the military here
is under the
avowed
orders of their master?
I dare say, replied the other, that Lieutenant
Johnson will show you his orders, if you will
condescend
to look at them.
I will do so, with great pleasure, said Mr.
Trevor, and promise myself great edification from
the perusal.
I will read them, sir, said the officer, taking a
paper from his pocket, which he read accordingly in
the following words:
As there is reason to believe that evil disposed
persons design to overawe or disturb the election of
members to the Legislature from the county of ,
Lieutenant Johnson will attend at the day and place
of election with the troops under his command, for
the purpose of preserving order. Should his
authority
be opposed, he is, if permitted to do so, to make
known that he acts by the command of the
President
,
to the end that all who may be disposed to
resist him, may be duly warned that in so doing
they resist the authority of the United States, and
take heed lest they incur the penalties of the law.
Why, this is well, said Mr. Trevor. And it
is to give color and countenance to a charge of
resistance
to the authority of the United States, that
you, Mr. A, refuse to vote.
No, sir, replied A; it is because I never
will vote at an election controlled by force.
Be it so, sir, said Mr. Trevor. I perceive
your drift. Go, then, and tell your master that the
means used to vindicate the freedom of election
were used to control it. Go, sir, and show that you
are as much an enemy to truth and honor as to me.
To this A made no reply, and soon after
withdrew
.
Indeed, hardly any person remained but the
friends of Mr. Trevor, and it was obvious that the
result of the election was not to be changed by any
votes which could be given. The necessity of
keeping
open the poll till sunset was, nevertheless,
imperious
.
But the scene became dull and irksome.
Douglas, therefore, proposed that his uncle should
return home.
By no means, said he. You don't
understand
this game. Should we disband, the sheriff
would be required, at the peril of his life, to make a
false return. But he shall have his will. Mr. Sheriff,
shall I withdraw also?
No! no! For God's sake, stay, sir!
exclaimed
the alarmed sheriff; and either see me
home, or take me home with you. I have not the
influence which makes you safe in the midst of
enemies
,
and am not ashamed to say that I fear my
life.
I will protect you, then, sir, said Mr. Trevor,
until you have made out your return, and given
your certificate. When these are done, I hope you
will be safe.
The scene again subsided into its former dullness.
The enemy had disappeared, with the exception of
the captive officer, who looked on ruefully, while an
occasional vote was given at long intervals. At
length, Mr. Trevor observed that some of the voters
were about to withdraw. He therefore rose, and
begged them to remain.
This business is not over, said he. It is not
for nothing that the polls are to be kept open until
sunset, when all who have not voted have
withdrawn
.
An attack on the sheriff or myself is certainly
intended. Perhaps on both. I beseech you,
therefore
,
not to disperse, but to see us both safe to my
house. When once among my own people, I will
take care of him and myself. I am sorry, sir,
continued
he, addressing the officer, that the
movements
of your friends make it necessary to detain
you longer than I had intended. You must be a
hostage for us all, until this day's work is over.
But assure yourself of being treated with all courtesy
and kindness. Should I even find it necessary to
compel your company to my own house, doubt not
that you will receive every attention due to an honored
guest. I beg you to observe that I do not even
disarm you. The warning you have received is my
only security that you will attempt no violence.
This speech was heard in sullen silence by him to
whom it was addressed. But some conversation
with others ensued, in which Mr. Trevor took pains
to enlighten the minds of his hearers in regard to
public affairs. The day wore away somewhat less
wearily; the sun went down, and Bernard Trevor
was proclaimed to be duly elected.
Our party now took up the line of march. The
sheriff and officer were placed in Mr. Trevor's
barouche
;
the former by his sidethe latter in front
of him, by the side of the driver. A numerous
company
on horseback surrounded them.
They were scarcely in motion, before the drum
was heard, and the regulars were seen advancing to
meet them in military array. Mr. Trevor
immediately
commanded the driver to stop, and draw his
pistol. Then calling to the servant on horseback,
he made him station himself, pistol in hand, close to
the officer. Having made this arrangement, he
addressed
him:
You see your situation, sir. Those fellows
would not scruple to shoot your master himself at
my bidding; and my orders to you both, boys, are,
that if we are attacked, you are both to shoot this
gentleman upon the spot. I shall do the same thing,
sir; so that between us you cannot escape. Now,
sir, stand up and show yourself to your men, and
speak distinctly the words of command that I shall
dictate.
The officer did as he was directed. The
advancing
platoon was halted, and wheeled backward to
the side of the road; the arms were ordered, and
the barouche passed on. After passing, a
momentary
stop was made, while the sergeant was
ordered to march the men back to their quarters.
This was done, and as soon as the two parties were
at safe distance asunder, Lieutenant Johnson was
released, and courteously dismissed. Mr. Trevor
and his friends reached home in safety, and without
interruption, and thus ended the election day.
CHAPTER XXI.
I tell you, my lord fool, that out of this nettle, Danger, we
pluck this flower, Safety.
Shakspeare
.
The
domestic party that we left at the house of
Mr. Trevor were variously affected by the history of
the occurrences detailed in the last chapter. Arthur
had been slightly indisposed, and his uncle had made
that a pretext for keeping him out of harm's way.
But when he heard what had passed, his spirit was
roused, and he felt as a soldier who hears the history
of some well-fought battle where he was not
permitted
to be present. To Virginia the whole story was
a subject of wonderment and alarm. The idea that
her dear uncle, and her dearer brother, had been
engaged
in an affair where dirk and pistol was the
word, threw her into a flutter of trepidation. She
could not refrain from asking the former whether he
would have shot the poor man sure enough; and
received his affirmative answer with a shudder. The
feelings of Lucia did not much differ from hers,
except
in intensity. She had heard too much to be
17
wholly unprepared for such things, and her mind
was too much accustomed to take its tone from those
of her mother and sister.
On these ladies the impression made by the events
of the day was wholly different. If the countenance
of Mrs. Trevor was more thoughtful than before, it
only spoke of higher thoughts. Her eye was
brighter, her carriage more erect, her step more free,
while her smile had less, perhaps, of quiet
satisfaction
,
but more of hope. The flutter of youthful
feelings
,
and the sweeter and more tender thoughts
proper to one newly betrothed, made the chief
difference
between Delia and her mother. But while
Douglas saw in the latter all the evidence of those
high qualities which fit a woman to be not merely
the consolation and joy of her husband, but his sage
adviser and useful friend, he saw enough in Delia to
show that she, in due time, would be to him all that
her mother was to his uncle.
A few days afterwards, Mr. B arrived, and his
appearance was a signal of joy to the whole family.
Douglas now, for the first time, discovered that he
stood in some interesting, though undefined relation
to them, and especially to his aunt. That there was
no connexion of blood or marriage he knew; yet the
feelings of the parties towards each other were
mutually
filial and paternal. The imposing dignity of
Mrs. Trevor's manner seemed to be surrendered in
his presence. Her maiden name of Margaret, which
no other lip but that of her husband would have
ventured
to profane, was that by which alone he ever
accosted her, and that generally accompanied with
some endearing epithet. The girls would sit upon
his knee, and play familiarly and affectionately with
his grey locks; while the servants, in the proud
humility of their attention to his wants and wishes,
seemed hardly to distinguish between him and their
beloved and honored master. It was not to be
believed
that the family kept any secrets from him, so
that Douglas could not doubt that he was privy to
his little affair of the heart. And so he was; and his
manner toward the young man was, from the first,
that of a near kinsman, hardly differing in any thing
from that of his uncle. As far as coincidence of
sentiment
and similarity of character could explain this
close intimacy, it stood explained. Between him
and Mr. Trevor there were many points of strong
similitude. But to Mrs. Trevor the resemblance was
more striking. Age and sex seemed to make the
only difference between them.
But, in addition to this domestic relation, which
embraced every member of the household down to
the scullion and shoe-black, there was obviously
some understanding between the gentlemen in
regard
to matters of much higher concernment.
Indeed
,
no pains were taken to conceal this fact,
though, during Mr. B's former visit, Douglas had
not been admitted to any of their consultations but
that which concerned himself.
It was not long before the two were closeted, in
the little study, in close conclave; and soon after,
a message was delivered to Douglas requesting his
presence.
I am the bearer of important intelligence, said
B, holding out his hand to the youth as he
entered
;
and as it particularly concerns you, as well
as your uncle, you must perforce consent to become
privy to our council.
I am not sorry to hear it, replied Douglas.
If any thing was wanting to banish all reserve
between
us, I would be content to suffer some loss to
effect that object.
I believe you, said B, and therefore expect
you will the less regret an unpleasant circumstance,
which, without your act or consent, and even in
spite of you, binds you in the same bundle with us.
That was already done, said Douglas. What
new tie can there be?
One of the strongest. The union of your name
with your uncle's in a warrant for high treason from
the court of high commission at Washington.
You speak riddles, said Douglas. The only
instance in which I ever incurred the displeasure of
the President, was one which no human ingenuity
could torture into treason; and certainly my uncle
had no hand in that.
But, having
then
incurred the displeasure of the
Government, what if you should
since
have been
concerned in any matter which might be called
treason?
But there has been no such matter.
My dear boy, said Mr. Trevor, the question
is not of what we
have
done. Had we actually done
any thing culpable, there would be no occasion for
this warrant from Washington. Our own courts,
and a jury of peers, may be trusted to try the guilty.
But when men are to be tried for what they have not
done, then resort must be had to this new court of
high commission at Washington, and to a jury of
office-holders.
But where, asked Douglas, is the warrant
of which you speak?
That I cannot exactly say, said B. I am
not even sure that it is yet in existence. But that it
is, or will be, is certain. I need not explain to you
my means of knowledge. Your uncle is acquainted
with them, and knows that what I tell you is certain.
The transactions of the election day will be made the
subject of a capital charge, and it is intended to
convey
you both to Washington to answer it there. I
am come to advise you both of this, that you may
determine what course to pursue.
My course is plain, said Douglas. To meet
the charge, and refute it.
17*
Are you aware, said B. who is the Judge of
this court of high commission?
I think I have somehow understood that it is
Judge Baker.
The father of your friend, Philip Baker, the
younger. Now are you aware that, but a few days
before the court was constituted, he and other judges
were consulted, and declared it to be so grossly
unconstitutional
that no judge would preside in it?
I see that so it should be declared, but did not
know that such opinion had been given.
Yet so it was. Now where, do you think, the
considerations were found by which the honorable
gentleman's honorable scruples were overcome? Of
course, you cannot conjecture. You
would
find it,
all too late
, if you, by placing yourself in his power,
afforded him an opportunity of gratifying the malice
of his son, without exposing his cowardice and
meanness. I see you doubt my means of knowledge.
Your uncle told me nothing of young Whiting's
communication to the President. Yet I knew of it.
I know, continued B, not regarding the
amazement
of Douglas, that, but for that letter, you
would not have been permitted to resign; and that
Judge Baker's scruples about presiding in this new
court were overcome by hushing up the enquiry,
which would have dishonored his son, and
substituting
a proceeding which should number you among
the victims of his power, without implicating the
name of his son. As to my means of knowledge,
when knaves can get honest men to be the
instruments
of their villany, they may expect not to be
betrayed. Until then, they must bear the fate of all
who work with sharp tools.
There can be no doubt, said Mr. Trevor, of
the fate prepared for us, should we fall into the hands
of our enemies. To be summoned to trial before a
court constituted for the sole purpose of entertaining
prosecutions which cannot be sustained elsewhere, is
to be notified of a sentence already passed. To obey
such a summons, is to give the neck to the halter.
The question is, then, what is to be done to evade it.
Our friend B proposes that your brother and sister
be sent home, and that you and I, and my family,
withdraw to Carolina. How say you?
I have the same difficulty that I had, the other
day, about tendering my resignation. But, in this
instance, it appears with more force. To fly from
justice is always taken as evidence of conscious
guilt.
About that, said Mr. Trevor, I feel small
concern on my own account, as I certainly
mean
to
commit what all who deny the sovereignty of Virginia
will call high treason.
Then why not take up arms at once? I have
much misunderstood appearances, since I have been
here, if the means, not of evading, but resisting
this attack, are not already organized.
The time is not yet ripe for action, said Mr.
Trevor. Had it been so, I should not have waited
until my own head was in jeopardy, before striking the blow. Nor should my own personal danger
precipitate it.
But what fitter time can there be to call the
people
to arms, than at this moment, when their minds
are heated by the late violent invasion of the elective
franchise? What more exciting spectacle could be
presented than the sight of a citizen seized as a traitor,
and dragged away in chains, to answer, before an
unconstitutional
tribunal, for maintaining this
franchise
?
Are
you
then prepared to resist, at the point of
the bayonet, this unconstitutional warrant, as a thing
void and of no authority?
I
am
, replied Douglas, with energy. And I
will say more, said he, speaking with solemn
earnestness
.
I have seen enough to make my duty plain;
and I am prepared to go as far as you, yourself, in
asserting and maintaining the sovereignty of Virginia
at every hazard.
That being the case, said B, as you will
not disagree about the end, you must not differ about
the means, nor lose time in discussing them.
We
are not thinking of this subject for the first time. We
see the whole ground, and act under the influence of
considerations which we have no time to detail. Are
you then, my young friend, prepared to give us so
much of your confidence as this. We say to you,
`Go with us where we go, and trust our assurance
that when we have leisure to explain all, you will
find our plan the best.' Are you content? Are you
now ready to carry into execution our matured plan,
so far as it has been disclosed to you, trusting all
the details to us? Rememberif you say yes to this,
we stop no more to deliberate or explain until we are
in a place of safety. Until then, you place yourself
under orders; and you have learned how to obey.
How say you? Are you content?
Douglas paused, reflected a minute or two, and
then, extending a hand to Mr. B, and one to his
uncle, said earnestly: I am; command, and I
will obey. But which of you am I to obey?
Mr. B, said Mr. Trevor, under whose
command
I now place myself.
Then to business, said B. Warn your
brother, at once, of the necessity of returning home
with your sister, and see that he makes the needful
preparations for his departure at an early hour
to-morrow
.
The boy's heart will have some hankerings
that will make it necessary for you to look after him,
and urge him to exertion. You, Trevor, must
expedite
the arrangements for the removal of your family.
Pass the word to Margaret and Delia. You may
trust much to their efficiency. I am afraid we cannot
expect much more from my poor little Lucia, just
now, than from Arthur. Now, Trevor, give me the
keys of your arm-room; let Douglas join me there,
as soon as he has set Arthur to work, and, in the
meantime, send Jack to me there. I will play
quartermaster
,
while you make arrangements for the
muster of the black watch.
The
black watch!
said Douglas, with an
enquiring
look.
Aye, said B. The
sidier dhu
the trusty
body guard of a Virginia gentleman. His own
faithful
slaves.
The slaves! said Douglas. What use shall
we have for them?
I have no time to answer now, said B.
Ask me that when you come to me in the arm-room.
At present you must attend to Arthur. We have no
time to lose.
Douglas now remembered his enlistment, and
betook
himself, with the prompt alacrity of an old
soldier, to the fulfilment of his orders.
END OF VOL. I.Mr. Baker begs leave to throw himself on the
mercy of Miss Delia Trevor. He confesses his
offence against her on Saturday last. He admits,
with shame, that he did intend to wound her
feelings
,
and that he has nothing to offer in extenuation
of his offence. He does not even presume to ask a
pardon, which he acknowledges to be unmerited,
and respectfully tenders the only atonement in his
power, by assuring Miss Trevor that he will never
again, intentionally, offend her by his presence.
Signed,
Philip Baker
.Washington
,
March 3d, 1849.
My dear sir
: I hasten to lay before you a piece
of information which touches you nearly. Though I
receive it at the hands of one who has the highest
claims to my confidence, I yet trust it will prove to
have originated in mistake.
It is said that your son, Lieutenant Trevor, on
receiving the news of the late treasonable
proceedings
of some of the southern States, openly
vindicated
them; and that he spoke freely in defence of
the principal agent in their most wicked attempt to
league themselves with the enemies of their country.
It is said, moreover, that, in doing this, he insulted
and fastened a quarrel on one, whom I have great
reason to esteem for his uniform devotion to the
Union. The regular course for such a charge against
an officer, holding a commission in the army of the
United States, is one which I would not willingly
pursue, in the case of the son of one of my earliest
and most cherished friends. As Lieutenant Trevor
is now at home, on furlough, I address this letter to
you, to be laid before him. I have no doubt he will
readily give the necessary explanations, and, in so
doing, afford me a new occasion for displaying that
regard for you and yours, with which I am,
Dear sir, your friend,
Martin Van Buren
.Washington
,
March 20, 1849.
My dear sir
: Your letter has been received,
and,
to me
, is entirely satisfactory. But I regret to
inform
you that, to those friends whom I feel myself
bound to consult, it is not so. Such of them, indeed,
as are acquainted with your high character, do not
intimate a doubt that a full explanation of the affair
would entirely justify your assurance that I have
been misinformed.
But they remind me that my information comes
from a source entitled to all respect and confidence,
and that, by making thus light of it, I may estrange
a friend, whom they regard as hardly less valuable
and meritorious than him whose feelings I wish to
save. They represent, moreover, that the affair is
bruited in the army, and that some officers are
mal-content
at the thought that a charge so serious
should be passed over without enquiry, on the bare
assurance of a father's confidence in the innocence of
his son.
Under these circumstances, should Lieutenant
Trevor not demand a court of inquiry, I am fearful
I may be constrained, against my wish, to order a
court-martial. Need I tell you, my dear sir, how
earnestly I deprecate the necessity of a measure,
which must so nearly touch one to whose friendship
I feel so much indebted, and whose loyalty to the
Union and its officers has always been so conspicuous
and steady.
I remain, my dear sir,
Your assured friend,
M. V. B.Sir
: I have just learned that charges of a
serious nature have been made against Lieutenant
Trevor, which, it seems, grow out of certain
occurrences
to which I am privy. I can have little doubt
that the affair, to which I allude, has not been truly
reported to you. Had it been, you would have seen
that Lieutenant T. acted no otherwise than as
became a soldier and a gentleman, in whose
presence
a lady, under his protection, had been insulted.
The enclosed documents, to the authenticity of
which I beg leave to testify, will place the
transaction
in its true light. Were Lieutenant T. at
Washington, I should not lay these papers before
you, without authority from him. As it is, I trust I
do no more than my duty by him, and by your
Excellency
,
in furnishing such evidences of the real
facts of the case, as may aid you in deciding on the
course to be pursued in regard to it.
It may be proper to add, that, having acted as
Lieutenant T.'s friend on the occasion, these
documents
were left in my possession in that character.
It is this same character, in which I feel it especially
my duty to step forward as the guardian of his honor
and interests.
Hoping that your Excellency will excuse the
freedom which calls your notice to so humble a
name,
I have the honor to be,
Your Excellency's most obedient,
Humble servant,
Edgar Whiting
,
Lieut.
12
th Inf. U. S. A.Sir
: I have it in command from his Excellency
the President to say, that your letter of resignation
has been received with surprise and regret.
He has seen with surprise that, at a moment of
such critical importance, one who had been, as it
were, the foster-child of the Union, should seize,
with apparent eagerness, a pretext to desert the
banner
of his too partial sovereign.
His regret is not at the loss of service, which,
rendered by one capable even of meditating such a
step, would, at best, be merely nominal; but at the
thought that that one, is the son of a friend so long
cherished and so much respected as your father.
I am farther charged to remind you, that
resignation
,
when resorted to for the purpose of evading
military prosecution, is always deemed little short of
a confession of guilt. In most cases, this produces
no embarrassment. The loss of the commission is
generally an adequate punishment; and it is, in such
cases, well to leave the conscience and the fears of
the accused to inflict that punishment, ratifying the
sentence by prompt acceptance of the proffered
resignation
.
But this does not hold in all cases. The
President
bids me say that he is not yet prepared how to
act in one of so serious a character as this. His
regard
for your father is the source of this perplexity.
He requires time to reflect how far he can reconcile
to his public duty, that tenderness to the feelings of
a friend which makes him desirous, if possible, to
stay enquiry by accepting your resignation. Under
other circumstances, he would not hesitate to reject
it, and instantly order a court-martial, as the proper
means of bringing to prompt and merited
punishment
an offence which, I am charged to say, he
considers as virtually admitted by your attempt to
evade a trial; when, if innocent, you would
certainly
wish an investigation, in order to establish your
innocence.
In conclusion, I am instructed to say, that for the
purpose of farther communication, if necessary, and
to facilitate such measures as it may be deemed
proper
to take in relation to you, I am required to
keep myself advised of your locality. To save
trouble, therefore, I deem it advisable to command
you to remain at the place from whence your letter
of resignation was dated, and to which this is
directed, until farther orders.
Yours, &c. &c.
(By order of the President.)I never performed a more painful duty in my
life, my dear Trevor, than in putting the seal and
superscription to the accompanying letter from the
Secretary.
My situation in the Department should have
given me earlier notice of what was passing, but I
got no hint of it until yesterday. I immediately did
what I believed to be my duty as a friend; though
I am now fearful that what I did may not meet your
entire approbation. I am sensible you would not
have done it for yourself; but there are some things
which delicacy forbids us to do in our own case,
which we are not displeased to have done by others.
Indeed, had I known that the matter had gone so
far, I should have left it in your own hands. But I
had no reason to believe that any intimation of it
had, as yet, been given to you, and I wished to
prevent
any step whatever from being taken.
With this view I ventured to lay the whole
correspondence
before the President. I know that he
received and read it. You will therefore judge my
surprise at being required, to-day, to forward the
unprecedented document which accompanies this.
I am guilty of no breach of duty when I assure
you that that paper is sent, as it imports on its face,
`by the order of the President.' The Secretary is
not responsible even for one word of it. The very
handwriting is unknown to me, and it was sent to
the department precisely in the shape in which you
receive it.
Knowing what I did, I should have doubted
whether it had not been surreptitiously placed among
other papers transmitted to us at the same time.
But there is no room for mistake. It came
accompanied
by the most authentic evidence that it had
been read and approved by the President himself.
I find
myself
placed in a delicate situation.
Here is an avowal of full faith in a charge disproved
by my positive assurance: a charge that no one can
believe, who does not believe me capable of basely
fabricating the documents, copies of which the
President
has, authenticated under my hand.
15
Your own course leaves no doubt what you
would advise me to do, under such circumstances.
But my lot in life is different from yours. Impatient
as I am of this indignity, I fear I shall be constrained
to bear it. `My poverty but not my will consents.
I do not, therefore, ask you to advise me, for I would
not do so, unless prepared to give to your advice
more weight than I can allow it. It could add
nothing to the convictions of my own mind, and the
indignant writhings of my own wounded honor; and
even these, God help me, I am forced to resist!
This affair has, as yet, made no noise. It is not
at all known of in the army; but I think I can assure
you of the sympathy of all whose regard you value,
and their unabated confidence in your honor and
fidelity. I shall make it my business, be the
consequence
to myself what it may, to do you ample justice.
Indeed, my indignation makes me so reckless of
consequences, that, apart from the necessity of
bearing
insult from one from whom no redress can be
demanded, I am not sure that I do not envy your
lot.
That your resignation will eventually be
accepted
,
cannot be doubted. What is the motive to
this letter, it is hard to say; but certainly it does not
proceed from such a disposition as would willingly
afford you an opportunity of triumphant vindication.
God bless you, my dear Trevor. We have
indications
that stirring times are at hand, which will
tempt me to exchange the pen for the sword. Where
duty may call me, I cannot anticipate; but it will be
strange if the charms of a life of active service don't
bring us together again. Meet when we may, you
will find still and unalterably, your friend,
E. W.